
This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 
to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 
to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 
are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other marginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 
publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we have taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 

We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain from automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attribution The Google "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liability can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at http : //books . google . com/| 






V ^ 




The Persian Letters 



Charles de Secondat Montesquieu, C J Betts 



Digitized by^LjOOQlC 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 









C ^- .' 






Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



THE PERSIAN LETTERS: WITH 

INTRODUCTION AND NOTES, NOW 
COMPLETELY DONE INTO ENGLISH, 
FROM THE ORIGINAL^ BY MONTES- 
QUIEU.IN ONE VOLUME. ' ^-^^ '^' ^* -^^'^^ 



LONDOli 
tUNTED FOR SUBSCRIBERS ONLV 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 






.01 

\30\ 
40794 



Copyright, 1897, 

BV THB ATHBN^fiUM PUBLISHING Ca 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



CASHAhl EDITION 
Limited to One Thousand Copies 

Nn. 563 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



PREFACE. 



In 1721 Montesqttieu was thirty-two years old. 
He had been entered as counsellor in the parliament 
of Bordeaux in 1714; had married Mademoiselle 
Jeanne de Lartigues, who bore him three children ; in 
the following year had become president d mortier 
in the same parliament, on the death of an uncle, in 
1 71 6; and had been now for five years a member of 
the Bordeaux Academy of Science, Belles-Lettres 
and Arts, established by letters patent on the 5th of 
September, 17 12. He founded, during the year of 
his reception, a prize for anatomy, and read, at 
various sessions of the society, dissertations on the 
causes productive of echo, the renal glands, the 
weight and transparency of bodies, etc. He an- 
nounced his intention of writing a physical history 
of the globe, and sent forth circulars throughout the 
scientific world inviting communications and memoirs 
on the subject, and expressing his willingness to pay 
for the expense of carriage. In the mean time, 
although he was equipping himself for the two works 
that were destined to render him immortal by writing 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



VI 

the Politique des Romaim dans la Religion^ the 
Systhne des Idies (1716), and the Diffirence des 
Genies{i7i7), he was not known as the author of any 
important literary production until the appearance of 
two little volumes entitled Lettres persanes^ ** which 
he did not own, but which he did not disown either." 
It is unnecessary to say that the paternity of these 
letters has never been seriously disputed. 

The famous epigraph prefixed to the Esprit des 
Lois — Prolem sine matre creatam — cannot, however, 
be applied to them; indeed, it is doubtful if there 
ever has been an instance of spontaneous generation 
in literature, even in the case of a work of genius. 
It is probable that Montesquieu borrowed the first 
idea of the Lettres persanes from Addison's Spectator, 
or, perhaps, from some lines in Dufresny's Amuse- 
ments sirieux et comiques} His contemporaries had 
naturally no knowledge of his indebtedness to these 
writers ; but they suspected him, on the other hand, 
of having had two collaborators, — Bel, a counsellor 
in the parliament, for the "sportive articles," and 
President Barbot for the " moral reflections." This 
imputation, which first received publicity in the Abb^ 
Denina's Prusse littiraire (1790), had been already 
given expression to by the Marquis de Paulmy on 
the fly-leaf of his copy of the CEuvres computes 

^ This work has been reprinted for the Cabinet du Biblio- 
phile, Paris, Librairie des Bibliophiles, 186^ in ^16 (same 
shape as that of the present edition). 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



VII 

published in I/SS. Reduced to its just value, the 
charge simply means that Montesquieu submitted his 
manuscript to the small number of literary friends 
with whom he was intimate at Bordeaux, and of these 
Bel and Barbot were the most distinguished. In 
any case, only the former can be credited with the 
honor of furnishing some hints which Montesquieu 
might have turned to account Bel was by no means 
unwilling to shirk the duties of his office. He was 
frequently in Paris, where he published, besides 
various satirical pamphlets on Voltaire, La Motte- 
Houdart, and Moncrif, a Dictiannaire niologique in 
co-operation with the Abb^ Desfontaines, and where 
his life came to a close. Montesquieu, on the con- 
trary, did not make his appearance in Paris before 
1722. Of this period of his existence we know but 
little ; and most of our knowledge is derived from 
the Abb6 de Guasco, who annotated certain letters 
of the president written in the full maturity of his 
powers. These annotations were not published until 
twelve years after Montesquieu's death, and their 
accuracy is justly liable to suspicion. Has not the 
abb6 asserted that the Lettres persanes were dashed 
off merely as an amusement? Others, and they are 
far nearer to the truth, affirm that the original manu- 
script contained passages erased four or five times. 
M. Vian has published three variants of the same 
billet-doux. 
After the letters had been revised, corrected, an4 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Vlll 

it is said, submitted to a learned Oratorian, Fire 
Desmolets, who predicted that they would " sell like 
hot cakes/' it was necessary to find a printer. Not a 
very long time ago, bibliographers, though they 
might admit that Pierre Marteau or Jean Nourse 
were something more than names, and judged that 
the volumes decorated with their fantastic rubrics 
had in reality come forth from the presses of Amster- 
dam, Cologne, or London. But now since a patient 
study of the typographical characters and ornaments 
has enabled certain scholars to demonstrate that in 
reality these same volumes had come forth from the 
presses of Rouen, Troye, Nancy, etc., a new field is 
thrown open to those investigators who are trying to 
reconstitute the too long neglected history of our 
provincial printing-presses. So a consummate bibli- 
ographer, M. A. Claudin, while engaged in editing 
the catalogue of the library of M. Rochebili^re, has, 
by a laborious and minute collation, succeeded in 
proving that the first edition of the Lettres persanes 
saw the light neither on the Rhine nor on the 
Amstel, but in Rouen, like all the other editions that 
bear the name of Pierre BruneL Is it not significant 
that three of our classical masterpieces, the Lettres 
persanes^ the Lettres de Madame de SMgnS (1726), 
and the Histoire de Charles XII. (1731)1 should have 
been first printed in the presses of Rouen? 

However, I have no intention of inviting the reader 
to the very arduous task of examining the btbHog- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



DC 

raphy of the eight known editions, dated 1721, which 
were scattered over all literary Europe, and I shall 
return to one of those editions only on account of 
the part it played in the life of the author. 

The success of the work was immediate and 
lasting, and Montesquieu was not chary of expressing 
his satisfaction at the popularity of his first pro- 
duction; but, in spite of the ''prodigious sale," of 
which he speaks with evident pleasure, it is rather 
strange that there should not have been a single new 
edition for eight years afterwards, for we have yet to 
see a copy bearing the date between 1722 and 1729. 
The veto with which, according to Malesherbes, Car- 
dinal Dubois, out of his excessive regard for modesty, 
tried to diminish its circulation, would surely not 
have hurt the sale of pirated editions; the very 
contrary was likely to be the case. 

Public opinion designated Montesquieu as the 
occupant of the first chair vacant in the French 
Academy. Madame de Tencin had received him 
among her " b£tes " on his arrival in Paris, and was 
now quarrelling for the possession of him with 
Madame de Lambert Both ladies were influential 
enough to be of material assistance to him in his 
candidature. He published, without letting his 
name appear, the Temple de Gnide^ read in certain 
houses his Voyage d PapAos, and allowed the Dialogue 
eU Sylla et d^Eucrate to be printed in the Mercure 
d$ France; but the author of the Lettres persanes 



Digitized by VjOOQIC 



could not be suffered to triumph, and he foiled in 
his first attempt, notwithstanding the support he had 
received, on the ground that one of the statutes of 
the Academy forbade the election of a non-resident 
member. He had been sure of victory, nor was he 
alone in his belief: Fontenelle had, in fact, composed 
the reply which it was his duty to deliver on the 
occasion of the reception as director ; his manuscript 
fell later on into the hands of M. de Secondat, who 
mislaid it 

Furious at his failure, Montesquieu returned home 
and sold his presidentship ; then he settled in Paris, 
and waited for another opportunity of achieving the 
coveted distinction. This was soon to be afforded 
him by the death of the avocat Louis de Sacy, the 
oracle of the salon of Madame de Lambert, on 
the 26th of October, 1726. The Abh6 Dubos, per- 
petual secretary, informed Cardinal Fleury, who was 
an Academician as well as prime minister, of the 
vacancy. "I have no personal preferences," the 
prelate replied the next day, " in favor of any candi- 
date for the chair of M. de Sacy ; I shall be perfectly 
satisfied with the choice of the majority, and all I 
desire is that the Academy may select the person 
most worthy of its suffrages. I believe that M. de 
Montesquieu has offered himself, but I have entered 
into no engagement with him, nor do I intend 
supporting any candidate on the present occasion.^ 
After so plain a declaration of neutrality, the success 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



XI 

of Montesquieu seemed assured, especially as he was 
the only candidate; but he had reckoned without 
the rancor of P^e Tournemine; he had offended 
him by his somewhat disdainful refusal to continue 
his attendance at the reunions of the Abb^ Oliva, 
librarian to the Prince de Soubise, where the Jesuit 
monopolized the conversation and, perhaps, posed 
unconsciously, for the picture of the "universal 
dogmatist" in the Lettres persanes. We have it on 
the authority of the Abb6 de Guasco that it was the 
Pire Tournemine who brought to the attention of 
the Cardinal "a very faithful extract" from the 
Lettres, in which doubtless figured, among other 
quotations, the passages where the King persuades 
his people that "paper is money" and the Pope 
demonstrates to the King that '^ three are one " and 
"the bread which he eats is not bread" (Letter 
XXIV.). Probably this was the reason why a suffi- 
cient number of members was not present on the 
I ith of December, the day on which the voting was 
to take place, and the election had to be adjourned 
to the 20th of the same month. During the interval 
an unexpected competitor appeared in the person 
of the avocat Mathieu Marais, who was supported 
by the Abb* d 'Olivet and by President Bouhier. 
The danger was serious. Montesquieu obtained an 
audience from the Cardinal. Both of them have 
been reticent as to what occurred on that occasion. 
All we know is that Fleury wrote to the director, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Xll 

intiinating his consent to the election of the president, 
after the explanations the latter had given him. 
Two days afterwards, Montesquieu received a plu- 
rality of the votes ; Marais had at least two votes, 
doubtless those of his sponsors. A new ballot was 
necessary, which was appointed for the 5th of 
January, and Cardinal de Fleury wrote another 
letter to the director. " It seems to me," he wrote 
from Marly, " that your method of drawing up the 
register is very precise and sagacious. There are 
certain things which it is best not to enter into too 
deeply because of the consequences that may result 
from them, and because in such a case there is 
danger of saying too much or too litde. The sub- 
mission of M. le President de Montesquieu has been 
so thorough that the use of any language calculated 
to injure his reputation in the slightest degree would 
do him a serious injustice, and every one is so well 
informed of what has passed that no inconvenience 
can arise from the silence which the Academy ought 
to maintain. 

" This is simply the expression of my opinion ; I 
do not claim any authority in the matter. Nothing, 
indeed, could be farther from my thoughts than the 
idea of speaking as a judge on matters which are 
entirely under the jurisdiction of the Academy. But 
I cannot help thinking that, as a rule, the safest 
plan is always to anticipate and remove the causes 
of ill-feeling." 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Xlll 

After such a pronouncement the Academy had 
nothing to do but to give way. Montesquieu was 
elected on the very same day. When we have said 
that he read his address at his reception on the 24th 
of January; that Jean Roland Malet, the director 
appointed for the ceremony, replied by a speech 
which contained the usual eulogies tempered by the 
not unusual malicious reservations ; and that, shortly 
afterward, Montesquieu began his protracted tours 
through Italy, Germany, and Italy, — we have bor- 
rowed all the facts from his biography that it is im- 
portant to recall under the present circumstances. 

Nevertheless, we cannot dismiss the subject with- 
out referring to the most singular circumstance of 
all connected with his election, and asking what was 
at the bottom of Fleury's sudden change of opinion. 
The contemporaries of the illustrious writer have left 
us the choice of six different explanations. Accord- 
ing to his son, Montesquieu declared that he did 
not acknowledge the Lettres persanes, but that he 
would not disclaim their authorship either ; if we are 
to believe the Chevalier de Solignac, secretary of the 
Acad^mie de Stanislas at Nancy, the Cardinal, after 
reading the book, pronounced it more amusing than 
dangerous; Maupertuis opines that the talent of 
Montesquieu as a reader won him his cause ; D'Alem- 
bert insinuates that certain apochryphal letters had 
been slipped in among the real ones ; Voltaire asserts 
that a new edition had been printed in a few days, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



XIV 

and tkat everything a cardinal or a minister would 
be inclined to condemn had been toned down in 
this edition or entirely omitted; and Soulavie only 
modifies a certain detail by claiming that Montes- 
quieu introduced some Cartons^ into the copy offered 
to Fleury. 

" Voltaire/' says Beuchot, ** is the only author that 
mentions this edition, but we must not on that 
account conclude that the anecdote is false. Voltaire 
had access to many private sources of information 
with regard to contemporary facts." 

There does exist an edition — of which Beuchot 
had no knowledge — bearing this characteristic sub* 
title : Seconds Edition, revue, corrigee, diminueb 
ET AUGMENTEE PAR l'auteur; d Cologne, chez Pierre 
Marteau, 1721, 2 vol, petit in— 12 de 312 et 347 p.\ 
Utre rouge et noir. Now this ''seconde Edition 
Marteau/' as the bibliographers designate it, has a 
hundred and forty letters instead of a hundred and 
fifty^ and, furthermore, many of these letters contain 
omissions and passages that have been soflened down. 
But these latter have not the importance which M. 
Vian attached to them when he first discovered what 
he thought was the only copy in existence, — a 
second has since been found in the Arsenal by M. 

^ Leaves substituted for others containing phrases or words 
disagreeable to the government. Their presence ordinarily 
indicates that the book has been submitted to the censorship^ 
and that it required changes before it could be allowed to 
appear ; it is frequently the proof, or first, edition. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



XV 

Andr6 Lef&vre. The dialogue of Rica and the blind 
man of the Quinze-Vingt (XXXII.), the struggle of 
Pharan with the eunuchs who try to enroll him in 
their confraternity against his will (XLI.-XLIIL), the 
advice of Usbek to his wives (LXV.), their trip into 
the country (XLVIL), the outrage inflicted by Suphis 
on Soliman (LXX.), must have been modified for 
purely literary reasons. If the fact that we do not 
find in the new text '' the Virgin who gave birth to 
twelve prophets/' and the " three who are one/' has 
any significance, why does the author allow an 
allusion lower down to the Eucharist to stand which 
is quite as irreverent? How could the abbrevia- 
tion R. P. J. for R^v^rend Pfere J^suite, have ren- 
dered him any safer? In a word, does this famous 
"deuxi^me Marteau" reveal to us the real reason 
of the triumph which, according to some, Montes- 
quieu won by such a Gascon trick? 

Two objections, exclusively material, at once 
present themselves. How could Montesquieu have 
thought in 1721 of disconcerting the adversaries 
of a candidature which was not to take place 
until 1727? How could he have found time in the 
space of eight days — between the nth and 20th of 
December — to send his corrections abroad, to get 
the proofs revised and to receive a copy just ready 
to his hand for his audience with the cardinal? If 
the ** seconde Marteau " has been prepared in view 
of an election, it might naturally have been ante- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



XVI 

dated; M. Vian has been the more inclined to 
consider that this was the case, because he had 
discovered in the youmal litUraire of 1729 an 
account of this edition; but he forgot that this 
journal did not appear from 1723 to 1728, and the 
new editor had to liquidate his rather long arrears. 
As to the hasty and stealthy reprinting of a first 
volume — and it is a noticeable fact that the second 
volume contains no modifications or omissions — it 
would not appear so impossible if it were admitted 
that the new edition was printed in France and not 
in Holland. Now M. Claudin holds for certain that 
this " seconde Edition, revue, corrig^e, diminu^e " is 
Dutch. It must, therefore, have been the one which 
Montesquieu's secretary, the Abb6 Duval, super- 
vised, and to which the president alludes in the 
postscript of a letter to M. de Caupos ; though this 
letter is not dated, certain passages enable us to 
assign it to 1721 or 1722: "I am informed by a 
person in Holland that the second edition of the 
L. P. is about to appear with some corrections." 

"I am afflicted," he wrote later on, "with the 
disease of writing books, and also with the disease 
of being ashamed of them when I have them 
written." These scruples must have been peculiarly 
keen with regard to his first work, and there is 
nothing improbable in his having set about correct- 
ing the text immediately after it appeared. As to 
the nature of the corrections, some are such as a 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



XVll 

writer might consider needed to contribute to the 
perfection of his work, their value depending entirely 
on his own judgment ; others do not at all imply the 
retraction which the orthodoxy of the prime minister 
required. Nevertheless, it must have been a copy of 
this second edition that Montesquieu had in his 
pocket on the day of his audience, and he doubtless 
asked his Eminence's permission to read a few pages 
of it; the Cardinal, charmed by the diction, may 
have declared them " more amusing than dangerous," 
and they parted on the best terms. Such is the 
most plausible denouement of the bibliographic 
comedy, whose real secret has perhaps been sleeping 
for a century and a half among the archives of the 
chateau of La Br^de. 

If the genesis of the book is obscure, its plan, aim, 
and influence can be summarized with the greatest 
ease. 

Three Persians — Rica, Usbek, and Rhedi, — set 
out for Europe to study its manners and institutions. 
Rhedi stops at Venice, while Rica and Usbek push 
on to Paris. Very soon after their departure there is 
a brisk interchange of letters between Usbek and his 
wives Zachi, Zephis, Fatme, Roxana, and the eunuchs^ 
as well as between the three travellers and the friends 
they have left at Ispahan. Soon disorders break out 
in the seraglio of Usbek ; the eunuchs try to restore 
discipline by inflicting on one of the favorites, Zachi, 
''that punishment which begins by shocking one's 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



XVlll 

modes^ and takes one back to tjhe tiaie of her 
childhood/' Roxana, another favorite, poisons ker- 
self, and then bids an ironical farewell to the noaster 
she has deceived. ''At the present day/' says 
Sainte-Beuve, "this part of the book seems to us 
cold and artificial ; indeed, it would become utterly 
wearisome, if it were longer/' This was certainly 
not the opinion of Montesquieu's contemporaries, 
and there can be no stronger evidence of the fact 
than the numberless imitations by which the Lettres 
persanes was succeeded The attraction of the East 
for European imaginations dates from the Crusades, 
and has never ceased since. Without going farther 
back than the seventeenth century, the travels of 
Tavemier, Chardin, and Paiil Lucas, the translation 
of the Thousand and One Nights by Galland, the 
residence of a Persian ambassador at Paris in 171 5 
and of a Turkish one in 1721, the visit of the Czar 
Peter I. to the little King Lx)uis XV., excited or 
revived a curiosity which the literary men and 
women of Paris were not shy of turning to account 
Madame de Villedieu had published her M^oires du 
sirail long before, and Madame de Gomez' Anecdotes 
ou Histoire secrite de la Maison ottomane appeared 
about the same time, to be soon followed by her 
Anecdotes persanes. Saint-Foix was a still more 
resolute imitator, and his Let ires d*une Turqufi d 
Paris icrites h sa sotur au s/raH had the homor of 
betog reprinted conjointly with the book they cer- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



xtx 

Uftity did no credit to. Did not Montesquieu make 
allusion to this circumstance when he observed ** that 
a sequel is inadmissible, and that any admixture 
with the letters of others, however ingenious such 
letters may be, is still more so"? The floodgates 
once opened, there is a deluge : the LeUres juives 
and Lettres chitwises of D'Argens, the Mhnoires 
turcs of Godard d'Ancourt, the Cousin de Mahomet 
of Fromaget, the Mille et un quarts d'heure of 
Gueullette, etc., etc., are drawn from the same 
source from which Cr^billon the younger will not 
disdain to take his Sopha and his Tanzau Diderot 
his Bijoux indiscrets, and even Voltaire his Lettres 
d'Amabeb, 

If the Lettres persanes had to depend on the 
superannuated framework of the story, they would 
have at the present day but a slight interest; but 
when the faded frame disappears the picture it- 
self is found to be without blemish, and to be 
one of those masterpieces that defy the assaults of 
time. 

There are several causes which account for the 
high rank the Lettres persanes occupies. In the first 
place the language has not become more antiquated 
than that of the Neveu de Rameau and Candide; and 
it is always a piece of good fortune for a work of 
genius to be able to dispense with a commentary^ 
Then, the book attacks errors and vices that will last 
as long a§ humanity, and the latter will be very Mar 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



XX 

its last gasp when it ceases to insist that preceding 
generations were much superior to ours ; and finally, 
it is universally acknowledged that the Lettres 
persanes inaugurated a struggle which still continues. 
" The eighteenth century," says Sainte-Beuve, " was 
not to confirm its incredulity by a slow process of 
induction, and to spell it out, as it were, word by 
word. The books of Doctor Launoy and Richard 
Simon were to remain very nearly strangers to it. 
The Persian Letters and Voltaire, these were the 
enemies that were approaching, these were the light 
troops that were to take possession of the heights, 
after the French fashion, without saying, By your 
leave! and who never could be dislodged after- 
wards." Marivaux shows, in the Spectateur franqais, 
S* /eui/le, itist he foresaw the danger. "We should 
be careful," says he, ** how we tamper with the mind 
of man who is connected with his duties by very 
weak ties, and no longer attaches importance to 
them if they are presented to him undek* a trivial 
light" Though he did not, like the Abbfe Gaultier, 
author of the Lettres persanes convainfues d^Impi/t^, 
invoke the aid of the spiritual and even of the 
temporal power against such abominations, he would 
have cordially agreed with D'Argenson that *'the 
work contains strokes a witty man might conceive, 
but a wise man would never print" The reader 
will decide the point according to his disposition, 
opinions, or prejudices ; Montesquieu left him free to 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



xxi 

do so when he wrote with good-natured irony: 
'' Certainly the nature and design of the Persian 
Letters are so self-evident that they can never 
deceive any except those who wish to deceive 
themselves."* 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized'by LjOOQ IC 



SOME REFLECTIONS ON THE PERSIAN 

LETTERS. 

('7S4-) 

NoTHiMO ID the ** Persian Letters " has given more pleasiire 
than the unexpected revelation of the fact that they con- 
tained a kind of romance, the beginning, progress, and end 
of which can be perceived. The connection between the 
various characters is very close and very apparent. The 
longer they remain in Europe the less marvellous and strange 
do the customs of that part of the world seem to them, and 
the strange and marvellous aspect of what they see increases 
or diminishes in accordance with their several dispositions. 
On the other hand, the growth of the disorders in the 
Asiatic seraglio bear a relative proportion to the time of 
Usbek's absence ; for this absence is in exact relation with 
the increase of delirium and the lessening of love. 

Moreover, romances of this sort are generally successful, 
because the characters involved portray situations in which 
they were really and truly actors, and this gives the reader a 
conception which no mere description by an uninterested 
person could ever afford. We must attribute the success of 
certain charming works that have appeared since the ** Persian 
Letters " to a similar cause. 

In fine, in ordinary romances, digressions cannot be 
allowed, except these digressions form a new romance. 
Neither can arguments be introduced, because the characters 
did not come together for the purpose of arguing, and to do 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



10 would be altogether oat of harmony with the design and 
nature of the work. But in the form of letters, in which no 
selection is made of the actors, and in which the subjects 
treated do not depend on any previously formed design or 
plan, the author has had the advantage of being able to intro- 
duce philosophy, politics, and ethics into a romance, and to 
unite the whole by an unseen chain of a nature to some 
extent heretofore unknown. 

The " Persian Letters " had such a prodigious sale when 
first published that publishers used every effort possible to 
obtain sequels to the work. They importuned every writer 
they met : " Write, I entreat you," they would say, " some 
* Persian Letters' for me." 

But what I have just remarked ought to be enough to show 
that a sequel is inadmissible, and that any admixture with the 
letters of others, however ingenious such letters may be, is 
still more so. 

Many persons have objected to the audacious character 
of certain observations ; I would entreat such persons to have 
regard to the nature of the work itself. The Persians who 
naturally play so great a r61e in it, are on a sudden trans- 
planted into Europe, into another world as it were. There 
was a time, therefore, when it was necessary to represent 
them as filled with ignorance and prejudice, the intention 
being simply to unfold the generation and progress of their 
ideas. Their first thoughts must have been singular, and 
surely it was the writer's duty to reproduce this singularity in 
the liveliest and most spirited manner he could ; for this pur- 
pose, he had to p^int the feeling excited in their minds by 
things which to them appeared extraordinary. So far was 
he firom imagining that he had treated any principle of 
our religion lightly that he never suspected he could be 
charged even with imprudence. Such observations will be 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



3. 

always found connected with feelings of surprise and aston* 
ishment, and not with any idea of investigation, still less of 
criticism. Surely these Persians ought not to be made to 
appear better informed as to our religion than they were 
as to our manners and customs ; and if they sometimes find 
our dogmas singular, this circumstance merely proves their 
ignorance of the relation which these dogmas have to other 
truths. 

This justification is advanced by the author, as well on 
account of his love for these great truths as on account of 
his respect for the human race, whose tenderest feelings 
he would certainly never think of wounding. The reader, 
then, is entreated to consider, always and in all cases, 
the observations to which I allude as the effects of surprise 
in people who ought to be surprised, or as paradoxes made 
by men who were in no condition to make paradoxes. He 
is also entreated to reflect that the whole charm of the work 
consists in the perpetual contrast between existing things and 
the singular, artless, or odd manner in which they are per- 
ceived. Certainly, the nature and design of the " Persian 
Letters " are so self-evident that they can never deceive any 
except those who wish to deceive themselves. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



INTRODUCTION. 
(1721.) 

Tms is not a dedication, nor do I ask any protection fof 
my book : it will be read, if it is good ; and I do not care 
that it should be read» if it is bad. I have issued these first 
letters in order to test the taste of the public ; I have a 
large number of others in my portfolio which I may issue 
hereafter. 

Should I do so, however, it must be on condition that I 
remain unknown; the moment my name becomes public 
property, I stop writing. I am acquainted with a lady who 
walks well enough, but limps as soon as any one turns his 
eye on her. The defects of my work are numerous enough 
without having those of my person added to them. If it 
were known who I am, persons might say : " His book is 
inconsistent with his character; he could have made a 
better use of his time ; this is unworthy of an earnest man." 
Critics are never at a loss for such reflections, because they 
can alwajTS be made without calling for the exercise of any 
noticeable capacity. 

The Persians who wrote these letters were my guests, and 
we spent our time together. As they regarded me as a 
man belonging to another world, they concealed nothing 
from me. In fact, people transplanted from such a distance 
could no longer have any secrets. They communicated 
most of their letters to me ; I copied them. I even suc- 
ceeded in getting possession of some which they assuredly 
would never have dreamed of making me acquainted with, these 
letters being so mortifying to Persian vanity and jealousy. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I am^ then, simply a translator ; my sole difficulty cos* 
sisted in harmonizing the work with our manners. I have 
spared the reader, as far as I could, the extravagance of 
Asiatic diction, and have saved him from an infinite number 
of sublime expressions that would have driven him crazy. 

Nor is this all I have done for him. I have abridged the 
prolix compliments, of which the Orientals are quite as 
prodigal as ourselves ; and I have struck out a great many 
insignificant details which might amuse a couple of friends, 
but could hardly survive the light of publicity. If most of 
those who have given us collections of letters had done the 
same, there would have been litde left of their works. 

There is one thing that has often astonished me : namely, 
that those Persians were sometimes as well informed as my- 
self as to the manners and customs of the nation. This 
knowledge of theirs often extended to the most delicate 
matters, and embraced circumstances which, I am quite sure, 
have entirely escaped the attention of those Germans who 
have travelled in France. I attribute this to their long resi- 
dence among us, not to mention the fact that it is easier 
for an Asiatic to become acquainted with the habits of the 
French in a year than it is for a Frenchman to become 
acquainted with the habits of the Asiatics in four, because 
the latter are as reticent as the former are communicative. 

Usage aUows every translator, and even every barbarous 
commentator, to adorn the beginning of his version or of 
his axmotation with a panegyric on the original, proclaiming 
its utility, merit, and excellence. I have not done so, and 
the motives of my forbearance can be very easily guessed. 
One of the best of these motives is that such a proceeding 
on my part would render additionally irksome that which 
it irksome enough in itself, — a prefisu:e. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



PERSIAN LETTERS. 



LETTER I. 

USBEK TO HIS FRIEND RUSTAN 
At Ispahan. 

We remained only one day at Koum. When we had per* 
formed our devotions at the tomb of the virgin who gave 
birth to twelve prophets, we resumed our journey, and 
we arrived at Tauris on yesterday, the twenty-fifth day 
since our departure from Ispahan. Rica and myself are 
perhaps the first Persians whom a love of knowledge has 
driven firom their country, and who have renounced the 
pleasures of a quiet life in order to toil painfully in search 
of wisdom. 

We were bom in a flourishing realm, but we did not be- 
lieve that its boundaries should circumscribe our knowledge, 
and that the light of the East should alone enlighten us. 

Let me know what is said of our journey ; do not flatter 
me : I do not expect that many will approve of it Address 
your letter to Erzeroum, where I intend remaining for some 
time. Adieu, my dear Rustan. Rest assured that, in 
whatever part of the world I am, you have there a faithful 
friend. 

Taukis, the 15th of the moon of Saphar, 1711. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



LETTER 11. 

USBEK TO THE FIRST BLACK EUNUCH 
At his Skiaguo in Ispahan. 

You are the £Edthfiil guardian of the fairest women in Persia ; 
I have confided to you all that is dearest to me in the world; 
you hold in your hands the keys of those fatal doors that 
open for none but me. As long as you watch over this 
precious treasure of my heart, it enjoys perfect repose and' 
security. You are on guard during the silence of the night 
as well as during the uproar of the day. Your indefatigable 
care supports virtue when it totters. If the women whom 
you guflud should wish to transgress the limit of their duty, 
you would immediately destroy their hopes of doing so suc^ 
cessfully. You are the scourge of vice and the pillar of 
fidelity. 

You command and you obey them. You execute blindly 
all their wishes, and, at the same time, compel them to be 
subservient to the laws of the seraglio ; it is your glory to 
render them the vilest services; you submit with respect 
and fear to their lawful orders ; you serve them as the slave 
of their slaves. But no sooner do you find cause to dread 
any relaxation of the laws of chastity and modesty than you 
resume the supreme authority you have derived from me, 
and speak as a roaster. 

Al ways remember the abject condition from whigb I 
|[^^5secryQii. when ynii wi'lf! Llw, mi' ^iii'm Af wy ftlaVgs^ rnnrder 
to place you in your present position and intrust you with 
the guardianship of the delights of my heart Humble your- 
self to the dust in presence of those who share my love ; 
but make them at t he same time feel their utter helplessne^ 
Procdre fbr^em every pleasure that IS mnocent; cheat 
them out of their anxieties ; amuse them with music, dancing, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



and delicious drinks ; penuade them to meet one another 
often. If they desire to go into the countiy, you may con- 
duct them thither ; bi)t lay hands on any man who comes / 
into their presence. Exhort them to cleanliness, which is 
the image of purity of soul ; speak to them sometimes of 
me. I wish I could again see them in that charming spot I 
which they adorn. Adieu. 
TAuaiSy the i8th of the moon of Saphar, 171 1. 



LETTER III. 

ZACHI TO USBEK 
At Taukis. 

Wb have ordered the chief of the eunuchs to conduct us 
into the country ; he will tell you that no accident occurred 
to us. When we were obliged to cross the river and there- 
fore abandon our litters, we entered boxes, according to the 
usual custom ; two slaves carried us on their shoulders, and 
we escaped being seen by anybody. 

How can I exist, dear Usbek, in your seraglio at Ispa- 
han ! — a spot that, by recalling my vanished pleasures un- 
ceasingly, adds every day fresh fuel to my violent passions. 
I wander from apartment to apartment, ever seeking and 
never finding thee, and meeting at every turn the cruel 
memory of a happiness that has fled. At one time I behold 
myself in that place where, for the first time in my life, I 
received thee into my arms ; at another, in the room where 
the famous dispute between thy wives was decided by thy 
wisdom. Each of us claimed to be superior to her fellow 
in beauty. We appeared before you, bedecked with all 
the ornaments and jewels that our fancy could form an 
idea of. You viewed with pleasure the miracles of our art ; 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



10 

the lengths to which we had gone on account of our aident 
desire to please you excited your admiration. But you soon 
compelled those borrowed charms to yield to more natural 
graces ; you ruined the effect of all our efforts ; we had to 
get rid of those ornaments of which you had now become 
weary; we had to appear before you in the simphcity of 
nature. I caied nothing for modesty, I thought only of 
victory. Happy Usbek! what charms did thy gaze en- 
counter then 1 Long did you wander from enchantment to 
enchantment ; long did yoiu: wavering soul recoil from mak- 
ing a choice ; each new grace demanded a tribute, and in 
a moment you devoured each one of us with kisses ; your 
inquisitive eyes inspected the most hidden recesses; you 
made us assume a thousand different postures, and every 
fresh command was met by fresh obedience. Let me con- 
fess it, Usbek, a passion far more vehement than ambition 
excited me to try to please you. Gradually I saw that I . 
might become the mistress of your heart ; you took me, 
left me, and returned to me again ; I was able to retain 
your affection. I triumphed, and my rivals despaired. We 
two felt as if we were alone in the world : all that was around 
us was unworthy of our attention. Would to Heaven that 
my rivals had had the courage to remain witnesses of all the 
marks of affection I received from thee ! Had they beheld 
our transports, they would have known the difference be- 
tween my love and theirs ; they would have seen that, al- 
though they might rival me in charms, they could not rival 
me in sensibility. — But where am I wandering? Where 
have these vain details led me? Not to be loved is a mis- 
fortune, but to be abandoned is an — outrage. You leave 
us, Usbek, and roam through barbarous lands. What ! do 
you consider there is no advantage in being loved ? Alas I 
you do not even know what you are losing ! The sighs I 
heave are not heard; the tears I shed you cannot enjoy. 
Every heart in the seraglio beats with love for you, and your 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



'^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 









i 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 






Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



II 

insensibility is ever carrying you farther away fix>m tts I Ah I 
dear Usbek, if you only knew how to be happy ! 

The Sera^o at Fatme, th« tist of the moon of Maharram, 171 1. 



LETTER IV. 

ZEPHIS TO USBEK 
At Erzeroum. 

At length that black monster has resolved to drive me to 

despair. Nothing can prevent him from depriving me of 

my slave Zelida, Zelida who serves me with such affection, 

and whose deft fingers add new graces and charms to my 

person. That this separation should be painful to me does 

not content him ; he wishes to render it dishonorable to me 

as well. The traitor pretends to regard the motives of my 

confidence in her as criminal ; and because to stand behind 

the door, where I always insist on his remaining, fatigues 

him, he dares to assert that he has heard or seen things 

which I cannot even imagine. What an unfortunate being 

I am I Neither the solitude in which I live nor my virtue 

can shelter me from his extravagant suspicions ; a vile slave 

attacks me in your heart, and I must defend myself there t 

No, I have too much respect for myself to condescend to 

justify my actions. I will have no guarantee of my conduct 

except myself, your love and mine, and if there be any need 

of saying so, dear Usbek, my tears. 

The Seraglio at Fatme, the 29th of the moon of Maharram, 171 1. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



12 



LETTER V. 

RUSTAN TO USBEK 
At EKZKRoaM. 

EfBRT one in Ispahan is speaking about you ; your departure 
is the topic of general conversation ; some attribute it to 
levity, others to some severe affliction ; your friends are the 
only people who defend you, but they can get no one to 
share their opinion, for no one can understand why you 
should abandon country, wives, relations, and friends for- the 
purpose of seeing lands unknown to the Persians. The 
mother of Rica is inconsolable ; she asks you to restore to 
her the son whom, she asserts, you have robbed her ot 
As far as I am personally concerned, my dear Usbek, I feel 
naturally inclined to approve of everything you do. Still, I 
cannot pardon your absence, nor does it matter how good 
your reasons for it may be, my heart can never sanction 
them. However, you must always give me a place in your 
regards. 

IsPAHiiN, the 28th of the moon of Rebiab i, 171 1. 



LETTER VL 

USBEK TO HIS FRIEND NESSIR 
At Ispahan. 

AFnot travelling a whole^ay from Erivan, we left Persia, and 
entered the territory which owns the sway of the Turk. 
Twelve days after, we reached Erzeroum, where we remained 
three or four months. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



13 

I must confess, Nessir, I felt an inward pang when I loit 
sight of Persia and found myself among the treacherous 
Osmanli; and the further I advanced into the lai^^ ^f thpfi#>^ 
heathens, the more'of a heathc " I sfifir"**^ ♦^ ^^^"^f JDj:«irl^ 
My country and family and friends rose up before my imag- 
ination ; my affections awoke ; I became troubled and rest- 
less, and saw at last that I had undertaken an enterprise 
which imperilled my peace of mind. 
. But what afflicts my heart most grievously is the thought 
of my wives. Every time my mind goes back to them my 
sorrow becomes more poignant 

And yet, Nessir, it is not that I love them; I discover 
in myself an insensi >>'iit y m ^^^ rripm irhirh i i fnrnmpit 
J Me with desire. In the crowded seraglio where I lived, I 
anticipated love ; its very fruition destroyed it ; but my very . 
coldness is the source of a secret and devouring jealousy.! 
I see a band of women left almost entirely to themselves, 
and the only persons responsible for them are a few base 
creatures. Even if my slaves were faithful, I could hardly 
feel secure ; how will it be if they are not faithful? What 
sad news may not reach me in those distant lands I am 
about to traverse ! This is an evil for which my friends 
cannot supply a remedy, a problem whose gloomy secrets 
they must not investigate ; and, in any case, what aid could 
they afford ? Would I not a thousand times prefer to let 
such crimes remain unpunished in obscurity rather than that 
their correction should become a subject of public gossip? 
I lay bare my sorrows before you, dear Nessir ; it is the only 
consolation I have in my present situation. 

'EMZMMoxjUf the loth q£ the moon of Rebiab 2, 171 1. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



14 



LETTER VII. 

FATME TO USBEK 
At Erzkroum. 

It is now two months since you left us, my dear Usbek, and 
I cannot persuade myself, in the depressed condition in 
which I am, that such is the case. I run into every room 
in the seraglio^ as if you might be there ; I cannot rid me of 
this beguiling fancy. What do you wish to be the fate of a 
woman who loves you, who has been accustomed to hold 
you in her arms, whose sole care was to give you proofs of 
her affection; a woman free by birth^ but, enslaved by the* 
violence of her love ? 

''^''When 1 married you my eyes had not yet beheld the 
features of a man, and you are still the only man whom I 
have been permitted to behold; for I reckon not among 
men those hideous eunuchs, whose least imperfection is that 
they are not men. When I compare your beauty with their 
deformity, I cannot help thinking how fortunate I am ; my 
imagination forms no more enchanting picture than that of 
the enrapturing charms of your person. I swear to you, 
Usbek, that though I had free leave to quit this place in 
which the nature of my position confines me ; though I could 
escape the guards who siuround me ; though I were at liberty 
to choose a partner among all the men who live in this 
capital of nations, — I swear to you, Usbek, you alone should 
be my choice. You alone are the only man in the world 
worthy to be loved. 

Think not that your absence has led me to neglect that 
beauty which you hold so dear ; although I must not be seen 
by any one, and although the ornaments wherewith I deco- 
rate my person are useless, as far as your happiness is con- 
cerned, I continue, nevertheless, to utilize every contrivance 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



15 

calculated to render me pleasing, and never retire to my 
couch until I have been perfumed with the choicest essences 
I recall the happy time when I clasped you in my arms ; a 
flattering and seductive dream shows me the dear object of 
my love, and my fancy cheats itself with delusive hopes, and 
is lost in unavailing desires ; sometimes I think that you are 
disgusted with your wearisome journeys and about to return 
to us ; the night is passed in dreams that belong neither to 
waking nor to slumber ; I seek for you at my side, and you 
seem to fly from me ; at last the fire that bums within me 
dissipates these delusions and recalls me to myself. Then 
my excitement is so great — You may not believe it, 
Usbek, but it is im possi ble for me to live in my present c on- 
d ition; fir r; f nnritfi Thrmigh "7y v^im ^W^y^in^^t T **^pVf'^t 
to you what I feel so deeply ; and how is it that I feel so 
deeply what I cannot express? At these moments, Usbek, 
for a kiss from thee I would surrender the empire of the 
universe. How hapless the lot of a woman who has such 
violent desires and yet is deprived of the society of the only 
person who can satisfy them 1 Left to herself, with nothing 
to preoccupy her mind, her whole life is spent in sighs anc^ 
in the delirium of exasperated passion. Far from being 
happy herself, she has not even the advantage of being sub- 
servient to the happiness of another ; a useless ornament of 
the seraglio, she is kept for the honor of her spouse, not f oi 
his felicity ! 

~You men are very cruel ! You are delighted that we 
should have desires which we cannot satisfy ; you treat us as 
if we were destitute of susceptibility, though you would be 
very sorry if such were the case ; you think that our passions, 
so long mortified, will be excited as soon as you appear. 
Yet it is not so easy for a man to gain our love ; the shortest 
way is to obtain from our constitutional disposition that 
wluch you would never venture to hope obtaining through 
your own merit 



Digitized by VjOOQIC 



i6 

Farewell, my dear Usbek, farewell Be assured thai; I 
only live to adore you ; your image fills my scui; and your 
absence, hi from making me forget you» would render my 
love more impassioned, if that were possible. 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the 12th of the moon of Reblab I9 171 !• 



LETTER VIIL 

USB£K TO HIS FRIBND RUSTAN 
At Ispahan. 

Your letter was given to me at Erzeroum, where I am at 
present I suspected my departure would create con- 
siderable excitement, but that gives me little concern: 
which would you have me accept as a guide, — the fore* 
sight of my enemies or my own ? 

From my earliest years I frequented the court I can 
assert with truth that my heart was not corrupted by it; 
I adopted a great resolution, I dared to be virtuous even 
in a court Not content with avoiding vice when I rec- 
ognized it, I sometimes approached and unmasked it 
I carried truth to the foot of the throne : there I spoke 
a language unheard of before; I disconcerted flattery, 
and astonished the idolaters and their idol at the same 
time. 

But when I saw that my sincerity made me enemies, 
that I aroused the jealousy of the ministers without gaining 
the favor of the prince, and that, in a corrupted court, my 
sole support was my own unaided virtue, I determined to 
withdraw. I feigned a great devotion to science, and, 
by dint of feigning, acquired a real love for it. I ceased 
to meddle with affairs, and retired to a house in the country. 
But even this line of conduct had its disadvantages: I 
continued to be exposed to the malice of my enemies^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



17 

while I had abandoned the means of parrying their assaults. 
Certain secret warnings induced me to think seriously of 
my situation; I resolved to become an exile from my 
native land, and my retirement from court furnished me 
with a plausible pretext I went to the king ; I made him 
acquainted with my desire to become familiar with the 
sciences of the West; I insinuated that my travels might 
be productive of utility to the state ; I found favor in his 
eyes ; I started on my journey, and so robbed my enemiesi 
of a victim. 

And now, Rustan, you have the real cause of my travels. 
Let Ispahan talk ; do not speak in my defence except to 
those that love me. Let my enemies interpret my action in 
the way their malice dictates : I am too happy at die thought 
that this is the only harm they can do me to mind them. 

I am a subject of conversation for the moment ; perhaps 
I shall only be too soon forgotten, and that my friends — 
No, Rustan, I will not give way to these sad thoughts : 
I will be always dear to them ; I reckon on their fidelity as 
I do on yours. 

Erzeroum, the aoth of the moon of Gemmadi 2, 1711. 



LETTER IX. 

THE FIRST EUNUCH TO IBBI 
At Erzeroum. 

You follow your old master in his travels; you traverse 
provinces and kingdoms; sorrow can make no impression 
on you ; every instant brings new objects before your eyes : 
all that you see amuses you and makes you oblivious to 
the flight of time. 

It is not the same with me : confined in a frightful prison, 
I am always surrounded by the same objects and devoured 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i8 

by the same regrets. I groan under the crushing burden of 
the cares and anxieties of fifty years j and during the course 
of a protracted life I can safely say that never have I known 
an unclouded day or a tranquil moment 

When my first master formed the cruel design of intrust- 
ing me with the care of his wives, and forced me by seduc- 
tive promises, supported by a thousand threats, to surrender 
my manhood forever, I reckoned, weary as I was of the 
laborious employments incidental to my occupation, that 
ease and riches would compensate me for the sacrifice of 
my passions. Wretched creature that I was ! my mind, 
entirely possessed by illusions, showed me the gain and 
not the loss! I hoped I should be delivered from the 
assaults of love by my inability to gratify its claims. Alas ! 
the effect of passion was extinguished, but not its cause ; 
and, far from being relieved, I found myself surrounded 
by objects that continually excited my desires. I entered 
the seraglio, where all that I saw inflamed my sorrow for 
what I had lost : every moment increased my agitation ; a 
thousand natural graces seemed to expand before my gaze, 
only to drive me to despair. To crown my misfortune, the 
happy man who owned all these treasures was never absent 
from my sight During that time of distress, never did I 
conduct a woman to the bed of my master, never did I 
disrobe her, but that I retired to my apartments with rage 
in my heart and frightful despondency in my souL 

Thus passed the days of my miserable youth, myself my 
only confidant. I had to suffer in silence the grief and 
regret that overwhelmed me, and those same women whom 
I was tempted to gaze upon with eyes of tenderness, became 
now the objects of my stem and austere glances. Had they 
been able to penetrate my feelings, I should have been 
ruined ; what an advantage over roe would not such knowl- 
edge have given them I 

I remember one day, when I was placing a lady in the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



19 

bath, I was so transported with excitement that I entirely 
lost self-control, and dared to lay my hand on a forbidden 
spot No sooner did reflection resume its sway than I 
thought I had seen my last day. I was fortunate enough, 
however, to escape a death of torture ; but the beauty to 
whom I had revealed my weakness made me pay dearly for 
her silence : I lost all authority over her entirely, and she 
has since compelled me to connive at caprices that have 
again and again endangered my life. 

Well, at length the fires of youth have become ex- 
tinct ; I am old, and my condition in this regard is tran- 
quil ; I regard all women with indifferent eyes, and all the 
contumely and mortifications they have made me endure, I 
now repay with interest. I never lose sight of the fact that 
I was bom to command them, and on every occasion when 
I do command them, it seems to me as if I had become a 
man once more. I hate them ever since I have been able 
to look upon them dispassionately; and my recovered rea- 
son enables me to discover all their weaknesses. Although 
I p, narH thf>m fnr f nn tli<>r. the plea^urP of mil i i i n|- tl i rin r i ? i r f 
me^ fiUs my heart with a secret joy : when I deprive them 
of some indulgence in which their senses take delight, I 
feel as if I were the sole arbiter of their pleasures, and this 
to me is the source of an indirect satisfaction : the seraglio 
is a little empire which I control, and my ambition, the only 
passion now left me, is to some degree contented. It grati- 
fies me to note that everything depends on me, and that my 
presence can never be dispensed with ; I am perfectly will- 
ing to incur the hatred of all these women, for that very 
hatred strengthens me in the post I occupy. And my con- 
duct shows them that I am not ungrateful for their dislike ; 
they find in me an obstacle to their most innocent pleasures, 
a barrier which they despair of crossing; the plans they 
form I put a sudden stop to ; I am armed with refusals, I 
brisde with scruples; such words as duty, virtue, chastity, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



20 

modestjr are always on my lips. I drive them to despair 
by talking incessantly of the weakness of their sex and the 
authority of their master; I bewail the necessity of the se- 
verity I am forced to use, and I act as if I would have them 
understand that my guiding motive was their own interest 
and the deep attachment I felt for them. 

For all that, I meet with coundess disagreeable incidents, 
and these vindictive women are ever on the lookout for the 
means of retaliating on me the evils I make them endure ; 
and sometimes they are able to take terrible vengeance. 
There is a constant fluctuation of authority and submission 
going on between us. They are always requiring the most 
humiliating services at my hands ; the contempt they affect 
for me is unexampled, and, without regard for my age, they 

the meres t ^pflff; I am constantly overwhelmed with di- 
rections and orders and fanciful employments; apparently 
they take turns in harassing me, and their caprices succeed 
one another in due order. Often they find a delight in 
making me redouble my vigilance; they confide to me 
things that have no existence : now it is that a young man 
has been seen prowling around the walls ; at another time, I 
am told that a strange noise has been heard, or that some 
one has received a letter. All this troubles me, and my 
trouble is to them an occasion of laughter. They are de- 
lighted to see me become my own tormentor. Sometimes 
they station me behind the door, and compel me to remain 
there day and night; they are adepts in pretended faints, 
sicknesses, and terrors. They never fail in their search for 
some plan to make me miserable. On such occasions, 
there is nothing left for me but blind obedience and unlim- 
ited submission ; a refusal in the mouth of such a being as 
I am would be a thing unheard of, and if I showed the 
slightest reluctance in complying with their wishes, they 
would have the right to inflict such punishment on me as 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



21 

they chose. I would rather lose my life, my dear IbU, 
than submit to such humiliation. 

Nor IS this all : I am never sure for a moment of my 
master's favor ; his heart is the abode of the enemies who 
seek to ruin me ; to them belong certain fractions of the 
twenty-four hours when I am not heard, when their master 
can refuse them nothing, when, in a word, I am always in 
the wrong. I conduct angry women to his bed : think you 
they are likely to take my part, or admit that it is they who 
are in the wrong? 1 have evervthing to fear from thei r 
tears and sighs, from their embraces a nd fro m their very 
J&ieasures. i ney are m the piarp n f their triumph s ; their 
cha rms are the most terrible weapon »hfy ^"^ "°^ <ifpit*ct 
^me ; t heir present services e£&ce all my past ones, and 
nothing can avail me with a master who is no longer himself. 

How often have I laid me down in the full enjoyment of 
my master's favor and awakened disgraced I Tlie day I was 
shamefully whipped around the seraglio, what had I done 
to merit such punishment ? I left a woman in the arms of 
my master. As soon as she saw him inflamed, she shed tor- 
rents of tears ; she complained, and graded her complaints 
so skilfully that they increased in proportion to the love she 
inspired. At such a critical moment, what could I do to 
vindicate my innocence? I was the victim of an amorous 
negotiation and of a treaty the clauses of which were sighs. 
Such, dear Ibbi, is the cruel situation in which I have always 
lived. 

How fortunate you are I your duties consist in waiting on 
Usbek. It is easy for you to please him, and to retain his 
£ivor to the end of your days. 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the last day of the moon of S^>har, 171 1. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2t 



LETTER X. 

MIRZA TO HIS FRIEND USBEK 
At Erzk&oum. 

You alone could repay me for the absence of Rica^ and none 
but Rica could console me for yours. You are missed^ 
Usbek : you were the life of our company. How hard it 
must be to break the ties which the heart and the intellect 
have formed 1 

There is much discussion amongst us. Our disputes gen- 
erally turn on moral questions. Yesterday, the subject of 
our arguments was Trhrfhrr mrn were ramliiii il 1ifl|i|i^ by llii 
p leasures and gratifiStion of the senses or by virtue . I 
have often heard it said that men are naturally virtuous, and 
that justice is as much a property of humanity as existence. 
Fray, explain to me what are your ideas on this question. 

I have spoken to certain mollahs who drive me wild with 
their quotations from the Koran ; for I have not spoken as a true 
believer, but as a man, a citizen, and the father of a family. 

Farewell. 

Ispahan, the last day of the moon of Saphar, 171 1. 

LETTER XL 

USBEK TO MIRZA 
At Ispahan. 

You renounce your own judgment in order to yield to mine ; 
you even condescend to consult me, you believe me capable 
of instructing you. My dear Mirza, there is one thing which 
flatters me even more than your good opinion of me does ; 
namely, the knowledge that your friendship for me is based 
on the view you take of my character. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



23 

In order to comply with your request, I do not feel that 
there is any necessity for me to adduce arguments of an 
abstract character. . There are certain truths that must be 
made felt^ rather than inculcated by any process of reason- 
ing : the truths of morality^ for instance. Possibly you may 
be more touched by the following story than by the most 
subtle philosophical analysis. 

There formerly lived in Arabia a little tribe called the 
Troglodytes. They were the descendants of those Trog- 
lodytes of old who, if we are to beUeve historians, resembled 
beasts more than men. But the race of which I speak were 
not the counterparts of the lower animals ; they were not 
shaggy like bears, they did not hiss, and they had two eyes ; 
but they w ere so malipiant and ferocious that no principle 
o f iustide"Or equity could abide in their hear ts. 

They were governed by a king of foreign origin, who, with 
the view of correcting their natural malice, treated them with 
severity ; but they conspired against him, killed, him and ex- 
terminated all the royal family. 

Having brought about this catastrophe, they met for the 
purpose of choosing a government, and, after many dissen- 
sions, elected magistrates. These officials had hardly en- 
tered upon the duties of their charge when they became 
odious to the Troglodytes, and were massacred in turn. 

Liberated from this new yoke, these people were swayed 
only by the savagery of their nature. All agreed to render 
obedience to nobody, and it was decided that each Individ- 
ual should attend to his own interests, without troubling his 
mind about those of his neighbor. 

This resolution, which was adopted unanimously, was re- 
ceived with much favor by our Troglodytes. They said : 
*' W hy should I wear my life out working for persons in 

whom T Hf> nn\ lalfA tho dtghfr/xgf in^fi yest? I will think ^ of 

fnyR<>lf snifly, T mV ^"'^ K^ppy . ^\^^* concem of mine is it 
whether others are so or not ? I will procure whatever is 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



necessary for my own well-being. If I succeed in this^ 
it matters little to me how wretched the other Troglodytes 
may be.'' 

When the month for sowing the seed arrived, each one 
said : ** I shall till sufficient land to produce wheat for my 
personal needs, and no more; a larger quantity would be 
useless ; I have no intention of working for nothing." 

The land in this litde kingdom was not all of the same 
nature : one portion of it was barren and mountainous, while 
another, which was low-lying, was watered by numerous 
streams- This year there was a drought of such severity that 
the high lands Med absolutely to produce anything ; the low- 
lying lands, however, brought forth an abundant harvest, as it 
had been easy to irrigate them. In consequence of this, the 
people living in the mountains nearly all died of hunger, for 
their hard-hearted neighbors refused to share their crops 
with them. 

The following year was very rainy ; the mountainous lands 
gave evidence of extraordinary fertility, and the low lands 
were flooded. Again half the people were the victims of 
femine; these unfortunates found that others could be as 
unfeeling as they had been themselves. 

One of the principal inhabitants had a very beautiful wife ; 
a neighbor of his fell in love with her and carried her olT; 
there was a great conflict in consequence, and, after many 
insults and blows, it was agreed to leave the decision of the 
matter to a Troglodyte who had been somewhat respected 
during the republic. They went before him and attempted 
to plead their antagonistic claims. '^ What does it matter to 
me," said this man, " whether the woman belongs to you or 
to him? I have my land to plough ; I have not the slightest 
intention of wasting my time in settling your differences and 
regulating your affairs while my own are neglected. Be so 
good as to let me alone, and do not disturb me with your 
quarrels." Thereupon, he left them and went to work on 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



25 

his farm. The ravisher, who was the stronger of the two, 
twore that only death should force him to give up the woman ; 
and the other, who was keenly affected by the injustice of 
his neighbor and the judge's harshness, was returning home 
in despair, when he came across a beautiful young woman 
coming back from the fountain. As he had no longer a wife, 
he felt drawn towards her, the more so when he learned she 
was the wife of the man whom he had wished to act as judge 
in his case, and who had been so little moved by his mis- 
fortune ; he seized her and carried her to his house. 

Another man possessed a rather fertile field, which he cul- 
tivated with great care. Two of his neighbors entered into 
a plot to chase him from his house and take possession of 
his property. They made a solemn agreement to hold it 
against all who should attempt to eject them ; and, in fact, 
they were successful in doing so for several months ; but one 
of the two, tired of sharing with the other that which might 
belong to himself exclusively, killed his companion and be- 
came sole owner of the land. His ownership was not of long 
duration. Two or three Troglodytes attacked him ; he was 
too weak to resist, and he was massacred. 

A Troglodyte, who was almost naked, saw some wool for 
sale; he asked its price. The seller said to himself: " The 
real price of my wool would be as much money as would 
purchase two measures of wheat ; but I shall ask four times 
its value, and so be able to buy eight measures." The buyer 
had to submit and pay the price demanded. " I am very 
well pleased," said the seller ; " I can purchase some wheat 
now." — "What is that you are saying? " rejoined the stranger ; 
" you want wheat ? I have some for sale. The price, though, 
win perhaps surprise you. You know that wheat is now ex- 
tremely dear, — in fact, there is a famine almost everywhere ; 
but give me back my money, and I will give you one measure 
of wheat. I would not abate a jot in the price, even if you 
were dying of hunger." 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



26 

In the mean time, a dreadful disease was ravaging the 
country. A skilful physician came from one of the neighbor- 
ing states, and his prescriptions were so successful that all 
who entrusted themselves to his care were cured. When the 
epidemic had ceased, he went to those whom he had treated 
and demanded his fees. He was met with refusals on every 
side. He returned to his native country, exhausted by the 
fatigues of his long journey ; but he soon learned that the 
same malady had broken out anew, scourging that ungrate- 
ful land with more severity than ever. This time they came 
in search of him, instead of waiting for him to visit them. 
" Begone/' he said, ** ye iniquitous men ; your souls contain 
a poison more deadly than that of which you would be cured. 
You deserve not to occupy a place upon the earth, for you 
are destitute of humanity, and the laws of justice are un- 
known to you. I would offend the gods who punish you, 
were I to oppose their righteous anger." 

E&ZEROUM, the 3d of the moon of Gemmadi 2, 1711. 



LETTER Xn. 

USBEK TO THE SAME 
At Ispahan. 

You have seen, my dear Mirza, how the very wickedne ss, of 
the TrnglnHytggjraji th^ occasion qf their ruin^ and how they 
became th^victims of their own unrighteousness. Only two 
families out of the whole race survived its misfortune. There 
were two extraordinary men in that country: they were 
humane; they cherished righteousness and loved virtue. 
They were united by the integrity of their hearts as much as 
by the corruption they had seen around them. They beheld 
the general desolation, and it moved them only to pity ; it 
created new ties between them. They labored with mutual 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



27 

solicitude for the common interest ; no differences divided 
them, except those that occasionaUy spring from the tenderest 
friendship ; and in the most remote part of the country, fo 
from those who were unworthy of sharing their society, they 
led a calm and happy life ; the earth, cultivated by these 
virtuous hands, seemed to yield its fruits spontaneously. 

They loved their wives, and were in turn tenderly beloved 
by them. Their whole ambition was to rear their children 
virtuously. They constantly placed before their eyes the 
misfortunes of their fellow-countrymen, and proved to them 
by this thrilling example that the interest of the individual is 
on^^jnUi the interest of the c ommunity ; that to attempt to 
sep^te them id 10 court ruin ; that virtue is a thing the 
practice of which ought to be found easy ; that we should 
never regard its cultivation as a painful exercise, and that 
j ustice to others is a blessing to ourselves. They had soon 

thff rnng^^^tjnn nf Yirft^^"^ fefViAre^ whl ^^ is tO g^e \hetir 

c hildren ^j[r9w up in thejr ^keness. T he young people, 
reared Under their eyes, made happy marriages, and the 
community increased in number ; but, though it grew larger, 
the bond of union remained as strong as ever ; g nd virtue , 

far fro m beCO" *^"p[ ^"^^l ^hl**^ omi'Hcf n nnllUlfl1r^n ^ mnnTfranf^T ^- 

ene Oj on the contrary, by the multiplication of the e^mpl^« nf 
it^ jpower^ 

Who could depict the felicity of these Troglodytes now? 
A people so righteous would surely become the special object 
of divine predilection. They were taught to know the gods 
from their earliest years, and having known them, they learned 
to fear them ; and thus whatever lack of refinement nature 
had left in their manners was supplied by religion. 

They instituted festivals in honor of the gods. Maidens, 
adorned with flowers, and young men celebrated them with 
dancing and rustic minstrelsy ; then followed banquets in 
which gayety and frugality were equally important elements. 
It was at these gatherings f\\^^ artl^cc nature gpnkf j it was 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



28 

there that the young people learned to exchange their hearts ; 
it was there the blushing virgin was surprised into a confession 
soon to be sanctioned by the consent of parents ; it was there 
that tender mothers delighted to foresee the certainty of a 
sweet and loyal union. 

When they entered the temples to entreat the favor of the 
gods, it was not affluence and an abundance of superfluities 
that they asked for, — such prayers would be unworthy of the 
happy Troglodytes ; they desired them only for their fellow 
citizens. T liey approached the foot of the alta r P ^^^^ ^^^^ 
petitions for the health of their parents, the union of the ir 
brethren, the Jove of tneir wives, the affection and obedience 
of^then- chiHren; Maidens brought thither the tender sac- 
fiftcrof their hearts, and sought no other boon than that of 
being able to make a Troglodyte happy. 

In the evening, when the flocks had left the meadows and 
the weary oxen returned with the ploughs, they gathered to- 
gether. During a frugal repast, they sang of the wickedness 
of the early Troglodytes and of their misfortunes, of the revival 
of virtue among a new people and of that people's felicity ; 
they next sang of the greatness of the gods, the bounteous 
favors they bestow on those who seek their aid, and the inexor- 
able vengeance they inflict on those who do not fear them ; 
they then described the delights of a country life, and the 
happiness of a condition wh irh '»»^^pnr#> aHnryig, Soon 
afterwards, they enjoyed a blissful repose, which no sorrow or 
anxiety ever interrupted for a moment. 

Nature was not less generous to their pleasures than to 
their wants. In that happy land, cupidity was a stranger: 
they made presents to one another , but he who gave alway s 
beli eved^ that he had the advantage over him who received . 

[le^TroglodyteT regarded themselves as one single fiimily ; 
their herds were almost always intermingled, and the only 
trouble they ever avoided was that of separating thenii 

Erzbxoum, the 6th of the moon of Gemmadi t, 171 1. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



29 

LETTER XIIL 

USBEK TO THE SAME 

I GOULD never give an adequate description of the virtae 
of the Troglodytes. On a certain day one of them said : 
*^ My father is to work to-morrow in his field. I shall rise two 
hours before him, and when he enters the field he will find 
all the work done." 

Another said to himself: ''If I am not mistaken, my 
sister has a fancy for a young Troglodyte who is one of our 
relations ; I must speaJc to my father on the subject, and 
prevail on him to consent to their marriage.'^ 

Another was told that robbers had carried off his herd* 
'^I am very sorry/' he said; ''for there was a white heifer 
belonging to it which I intended offering to the gods." 

A Th>glodyte was heard saying to a companion : '' I must 
go to the temple and return thanks to the gods ; my brother, 
whom my father and I love so dearly, has recovered his 
health." 

And another one said : '' There is a field which borders 
on my father's, and those who work in it are every day 
exposed to the heat of the sun. I must plant a couple of 
trees in it, so that these poor men may sometimes rest in 
their shade." 

One day when several Troglodytes were assembled, an 
old man spoke of a young one, whom he suspected of having 
committed a bad action, and reproached him for having done 
80. " We do not believe him guilty of this crime," said the 
young Troglodytes ; " but if he is, may he be the last of his 
fiimily to die ! " 

A Troglodyte was informed that strangers had piUaged his 
bouse and carried away everything. " If they had not been 
wicked men," he replied, " I would pray that the gods might 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



30 

gfare tfaem a longer enjoyment of my possestiona than I have 
had myself." 

Such prosperity was not regarded without envy. The 
nations on their borders assembled, and decided on some 
wretched pretext or other to carry off their flocks and 
herds. As soon as this became known, the lYoglodytes 
sent ambassadors who spoke to these people as follows : 

"What have the Troglodytes done to you? Have they 
carried off your wives, stolen your cattle, or ravaged your 
lands ? No, we are just men, and we fear the gods. What do 
you want from us? Do you need wool to make clothes? 
Do you need the milk of our herds or the products of our 
fields ? Lay down your arms ; come amongst us, and all you 
desire you shall have. But we swear by all we hold most 
sacred that, if you enter our country as enemies, we will regard 
you as an unrighteous people, and treat you as vrild beasts." 

These words were dismissed with scorn ; the savages who 
heard them invaded the country of the Troglodytes in arms, 
believing that innocence was the sole defence of the latter. 

But the Troglodytes were quite capable of defending 
themselves. They had placed their wives and children in 
their midst. They were appalled by the injustice of their 
enemies, not by their numbers. An ardor to which they 
had hitherto been strangers burned in their hearts; one 
wished to die for his fether, another for his wife and children, 
this one for his brothers, that one for his friends, and all for 
the Troglodyte race. The place of him who fell was at 
once taken by his neighbor, who had the death of a friend as 
well as the common cause to avenge. 

Such was the conflict between injust ice and righteousness. 
The cowardly invaders, wnose sole^m was plunder, were 
not ashamed to fly ; and they succumbed to that virtuous 
daring of the Troglodytes by which their hearts couW never 
be touched. 

EazKROUM, the 9Ch of the moon of Gemmadi 2, 1711. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



3» 

LETTER XIV. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

As the race was becoming every day more numerous the 
Troglodytes thought they ought to choose a king: they 
agreed that the crown should be offered to the most right- 
eous man amongst them, and their eyes were directed to 
an aged individual whose long and virtuous career had exp 
cited their veneration. He had not cared to be present at 
their assembly, but had withdrawn to his home, a prey to 
sadness of heart. 

When deputies were sent to inform him that he was the 
people's choice, he said : " God forbid that I should do the 
Troglodytes such a wrong as to lead them to believe that 
there is no man amongst them more just than II You 
offer me the crown, and, if you insist, I must accept your 
offer. But rest assured that I shall die of shame on the 
day I behold the Troglodytes, who have been free ever 
since I saw the light of day, willing to submit to a master." 
Having spoken thus, he shed a torrent of tears. *' O miser- 
able day!" he exclaimed, " why have I lived, so long?" 
Then he cried out in a severe tone : *' I see how the matter 
stands, O Troglodytes! your very virtue is becoming a 
burden to you. In your present condition, as you have 
no ruler, you are forced to be virtuous in spite of yourselves. 
Unless you were so, you could not exist, and would fall 
again into the despicable state of your forefathers. But the 
yoke of virtue galls you : you prefer to obey a prince, and 
be subject to his laws, — laws that might be less rigid than 
your own customs. You know that then you would be able 
to gratify your ambitious instincts, acquire wealth, and pass 
your days pleasandy in voluptuous indolence, and that, pro- 
vided you avoided the greater crimes, you would have no 
need of virtue." He paused a moment, and the tears 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



' 32 

ooiined down his cheeks more rapidly than ever. ^ And 
what would you have me do? What commands could I 
give a Troglodyte? Would you have him do a virtuous 
act because I commanded it, an act he would do of himself 
from natural inclination ? O Troglodytes I my life is near its 
dose, my blood is frozen in my veins, soon shall I join the 
com[>any of your sacred sires : why do you wish that I should 
cause them sonow ; why do you wish that I should have to 
tell them I left you under other yoke than that of virtue? " 
EazaaouM, the xoth of the moon of Gemmadi a, 171 1. 



LETTER XV. 

THE FIRST EUNUCH TO GARON, THE BLACK 

EUNUCH 

At Erzsrouic. 

I PRAY to heaven for your return ; may it guard you from 
every danger. 

Although I have never known the tie which men call 
friendship, and although I be entirely wrapped up in my- 
self, you have made me feel that I have still a heart, and 
while I was a man of bronze to the other slaves subject to 
my authority, I took a pleasure in watching your childhood 
and growth. 

The time came when my master cast his eyes upon you. 
Long before nature had told you her mysteries, the knife 
separated you from nature. I will not say whether I pitied 
you, or whether I felt a certain satisfaction in seeing you 
brought to a level with myself. I dried your tears and 
stopped your cries. It seemed to me as if you had been 
bom again, and were about to issue from a servitude in 
which you were compelled to obey and enter on a servitude 
in which it would be your right to command. I attended 



t 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



33 

to your education. The severity which is inseparable from 
the task of instruction left you long in ignorance of the &ct 
that you were dear to me. Yet dear to me you were, and 
I will now tell you that I loved you as a father loves his son, 
if the name of father and son be compatible with our destiny. 

You are about to wander through lands inhabited by 
Christians^ men without faith in the prophet. It will be 
impossible for you to entirely avoid pollution. How could 
he regard you with favor amid so many millions of his ene- 
mies? I hope my master will, on his return, perform the 
pilgrimage to Mecca : you would both be purified in that 
angelic spot 

The Seraglio in Ispahan, the loth of the moon of Gemmadi a, 1711. 



LETTER XVI. ^ 

USBEK TO THE MOLLAH MEHEMET AU, 
Guardian op the Three Tombs at Koum. 

Why, O divine mollah, do you live in tombs? You are 
far better qualified to dwell among the stars. Doubdess, 
fear that your brightness might obscure that of the sun, is 
the motive of your concealment : there are no spots on you, 
as there are on that luminary ; but, like him, you enwrap 
yourself in clouds. 

Your knowledge is an abyss deeper than the ocean ; your 
mind is more piercing than Zufagar, the double-pointed 
sword of Ali ; you are familiar with all that passes in the 
nine heavenly choirs; you read the Koran on the breast 
of our divine prophet, and when you encounter an obscure 
passage, an angel, by his order, unfolds his rapid wings and 
descends from the throne to reveal to you its secret 

I might, if aided by you, enter on a familiar correspond* 
ence with the seraphim; for, in fine, O thirteenth Imaa, 

3 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



34 

mrt you not the centre where earth and heaven meeti and 
the point of communication between the abyss and the 
empyrean? 

^-L^S S^ now_ dwflh ' ng nwiHngsl a htallien ^>f*op l f ; ro n« 
descend to bestow on me the means of being purified 
through your agency; suffer me to turn my eyes towards 
the sacred spot in which you abide ; distinguish between me 
and the wicked, just as, at the dawning of the day, the 
observer distinguishes the white thread firom the black; 
help me with your counsels; take care of my soul; 
animate it with the spirit of the prophets ; foster it with 
the science of paradise, and permit me to lay its wounds 
bare before you. Address your sanctified letters to Erzeroum, 
where I intend stopping a few months. 

£bzeroum, the nth of the moon of Gemmadi J, 1711. 



LETTER XVIL 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

I AM unable, divine moUah, to calm my impatience; I 
cannot wait with composure for your sublime ancwer - I 
I have'7Kubt s,_an^ fhpy must hr rf^mny^d I feel as if my 
reason were wandering : help it back to the right path. 
Shed your beams upon me, O source of all light 1 destroy 
with the thunderbolts of your heavenly pen all the difficul- 
ties I am about to place before you ; make me blush with 
shame for the questions I am about to propound. 

Why does our lawgiver deprive us of the flesh of swine 
and of the other meats he deems unclean? Why does he 
forbid us to touch a dead body ; and why has he decreed 
that, in order to purify our souls, we must wash ourselves 
so fi-equently? It ^seeipg *n |pp tha t thincp in them selves 
are neither pure nor impure: I cannot conceive of any 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



35 

in herent quality t hat should render the m either the one 
XSf ^ other. Mu^' app tais lu us lu b gtErty only bec ause 
it otfends our sight or somfi'Otber oi the senses^ but in 
itself is no more so than gold or diamonds. The idea 
of the pollution we contract by touching a corpse arises 
from the natural repugnance we feel to do so. If the 
bodies of those who do not wash were not repulsive to our 
sight or smell, how could we discover that they were 
impure? 

Must the senses then, divine moUah, be the sole judges 
of the purity or impurity of things? But, inasmuch as 
objects do not afifect all men in the same manner, — for 
what produces an agreeable sensation in some excites 
disgust in others, — it follows that the testimony of the 
senses cannot serve as a guide, unless it be asserted that 
each individual can decide for himself according to his 
fancy, and discriminate between the dean and unclean, 
just as his own prepossessions dictate. 

But would not this, O holy mollah, annihilate the dis-i 
tinctions established by our divine prophet, as well as the .. 
fundamental points of that law which was written by angelic 
hands? 

Erzeroum, the 20th of the moon of Gemmadi 2, 171 1. 



LETTER XVITI. 

MEHEMET AU, SERVANT OF THE PROPHETS TO 
USBEK 

At Erzeroum. 

You are ever asking questions that have been laid before 
our holy prophet a thousand times. Why do you not read 
the traditions of the doctors? Why do you not go to that 
pure source of all intelligence? If you did S0| you would 
find all your doubts resolved. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



30 

Unhappy man 1 Always embanassed by the thingi of . 
earthy you have never riveted your eyes firmly on those 
of heaven ; you reverence the life of the moUahs, but do nol 
dare to embrace or follow it ! 

O profane beings who never enter into the secrets of 
the Eternal, your light resembles ♦^^fUtorV*^^'"' ^^ »*^*^ oKy«»^ 
and the reasonings of your mind are like unto the dust 
which your feet set in motion when the sun is at its noon in 
the burning month of Chahban ! 

And so the zenith of your intellect does not rise as high 
as that of the lowest of the Imans. Your vain philosophy / 
is like the lightning flash, foreboding storm and darkness: 
tempest-driven, you wander where the wind listeth. 

Your difficulties are easily answeted : to solve them, all 
that is necessary is to relate what happened to our holy 
prophet on a certain day, when^ tempted by the Christians 
and harassed by the Jews, he confounded with equal skill 
the arguments of both. 

The Jew Abdias Ibesalon * asked him why God had for- 
bidden the use of swine's flesh. ** He did not do so with* 
out good reason," returned the prophet; ''the animal is 
unclean, and I am about to convince you of the fact" 
Thereupon he formed the image of a man out of mud, laid 
it upon the ground, and cried : " Arise ! " The man at once 
arose and said : " I am Japhet, the son of Noah." — " Was 
your hair as white when you died as it is now?" inquired 
the holy prophet " No," was the answer ; " but when you 
awoke me I thought the day of judgment was at hand, andi 
I was so terribly frightened that my hair suddenly tumedj 
white." ^ 

" Now relate to me," said the ambassador of God, *' the 
whole history of Noah's ark." Japhet obeyed, and gave a 
correct and detailed account of all that had happened dur« 
ing the first months ; after doing so, he continued : -~ 

^ A Mahometan tradition. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



37 

^ We placed the excrements of all the animals on one side 
of the ark, and this made it lean so much that we were all in 
deadly fear, especially our wives, who howled as if their last 
end had come. Our father Noah consulted God about the 
trouble, and was by him commanded to take the elephant 
and turn its head towards the side that pitched forward* 
This big animal made so much excrement that a pig came 
forth from it" Now do you not see, Usbek, why we have 
ever since abstained from swine's flesh, and why we regard 
the pig as unclean? 

'' But, as the pig wallowed every day in this excrement, 
there arose such a stench in the ark that the animal itself 
could not avoid sneezing, and from its nose sprang a rat, 
which began gnawing everything it met This conduct of 
the rat became so painful to the feelings of Noah that be 
saw it was time to have another consultation with God. He 
was ordered to hit the lion smartly on the forehead; the 
beast thereupon sneezed also; and from its nose a cat 
leaped." 

Do you believe now that these animals are unclean? Do 
you require any frirther answer? 

The cause of your Mure to perceive the reason for the 
uncleanness of certain things is your ignorance of many 
other things besides; you have no knowledge of what has 
passed between God and angels and men. You are not 
acquainted with the history of eternity ; you have not read the 
books that were written in heaven ; what has been revealed 
to you is but a small part of the divine library ; and even 
those who, like us, are nearer heaven, though living on earth, 
than others, are still in obscurity and darkness. Adieu. May 
Mahomet dwell in your heart 

KouM, the last day of the moon of Chahban, 1711. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



38 



LETTER XIX. 

USBEK TO HIS FRIEND RUSTAN 
At Ispahan. 

We 8ta3red only eight days at Tocat, and after a journey of 
thirty-five days are now in Smyrna. 

Between Tocat and Smyrna there is not a single city 
worthy of the name. 

I have seen with astonishment the weakness of the Osmanli 
empire. This diseased body is not supported by a mild and 
temperate regimen, but by violent remedies that exhaust and 
undermine it continually. 

The pachas, who buy their offices, are without money when 
they enter their provinces, and ravage them as if they were 
conquered countries. An insolent rabble of soldiers obey 
only their own caprices. Fortresses are dismantled, towns 
deserted, country districts left desolate, and commerce and 
agriculture entirely abandoned. 

Impunity reigns supreme in this rigorous government, and 
the Christians who till the soil and the Jews who collect the 
taxes are exposed to every kind of violence. 

Property in land is uncertain, and, as a necessary conse- 
quence, the desire to improve it has been weakened. Neither 
title nor possession can withstand the caprices of those who 
govern. 

To such a degree have the arts been disregarded by those 
barbarians that they have neglected even that of war. While 
the other nations of Europe are advancing further in civili* 
zation every day, they continue in their original igno- 
rance, and never think of adopting new inventions until they 
have been a thousand times used against them. 

They have no experience on sea and no skill in manoeu- 
vring. It is said that a handful of Christians, issuing firom a 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



39 

rocky frighten these Ottomans into a cold penpixationy and 
shake the very foundations of their empire.^ 

Unfit for commerce themselves, they look with an evil 
eye on those industrious and enterprising Europeans who 
come amongst them to manage their trade ; they think they 
are doing a favor to those foreigners in permitting them to 
add to the wealth of the country. 

Notwithstanding the large extent of land I have -travelled 
over, Smyrna is the only city which I can consider rich and 
powerful It is indebted to the Europeans for its prosperity ; 
if it had to rely on the Turks it would resemble all the 
others. 

And now, my dear Rustan, you have, I trust, a correct 
idea of this empire, which, before two centuries, is sure to be 
the scene of some conqueror's triumphs. 

Smyhna, the 2d of the moon of Rhamazan, 171 1. 



LETTER XX. 

USBEK TO HIS WIFE ZACHI 
At thb Isfahan Sbraglio. 

You have offended me, Zachi, and I feel the presence of 
emotions in my heart which should assuredly terrify you, 
did not my long absence leave you time to change your con« I 
duct, and t hus appease the vio lent jcalniny by which lam 
to rmente d. 

I learn that you were found alone with Nadir, the white 
eunuch, whose death shall atone for his infidelity and perfidy. 
How could you forget yourself so far as not to feel that you 
are not allowed to admit a white eunuch into your chamber, 
as long as you have black ones at your service ? It is in 
nun for you to tell me that eunuchs are not men, and that 

^ The Knights of Malta, apparently. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



40 

your nrtae renders you superior to such thoughts as these 
counterfeits of men might excite. Such an answer is noC 
sufficient for you nor for me : not sufficient for you, because 
you have done a thing forbidden by the laws of the seraglio ; 
not sufficient for me, because you dishonor me by exposing 
yourself to the gaze — what do I say? — perhaps to the 
adventurous efforts of a traitor who may have polluted you 
by his crimes, and still more by his regrets and the despair 
engendered by his impotence. 

You will teU me, perhaps, that you have always been futb- 
fuL Pray, how could you be otherwise ? How could yoa 
e ver have suc ceg^gdJfl deceiving th e vigila^cC-flLthcJilack 
eu nuchs, wh o are so^mazed at thcT^fe j^ou lead ? How 
could you have broken ihrougR those bars and doors behind 
wnicb you are coniihed? You boast of a virtue which is not 
ftte, -tttd, for -all I Inow^ your impure desires may have | 
regeatediy ^cspoflerf yo u of i hejnsnt and value of that J 
fi deli ty y o u vauu rig"'T6udly. 

I do norwish to think that you have done all that I had 
good grounds for suspecting; I do not wish to think that the 
traitor has laid his sacrilegious hands upon you, that you were 
so prodigal as to let his eyes look on the delight of his master ; 
I will believe that, covered with your garments, you have 
placed that weak barrier between him and you ; . that, stricken 
inth a holy dread, he has lowered his eyes, and that, aban- 
doned by his audacity, he trembled at the anticipation of the 
punishment to which he had rendered himself liable — though 
all this were true, it is not the less certain that you have vio- 
lated your duty. And if you have done so gratuitously, with- 
out satisfying your irregular inclinations, what would you not 
have done if such gratification were possible? Again, what 
would you do if you were at liberty to leave the sacred spot 
which you regard as a hard prison, but which your companions 
kx>k upon as a pleasant asylum sheltering them from the 

aults of vice, — a sacred temple, in which your sex loses 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



41 

its weakness and becomes invincible, in spite of all the dis* 
advantages of nature ? What would you do if, abandoned to 
you r own instincts, y ou had nothing to protect you but your ] 
l ove for me, which ha ^^^en so^ grievousTy" disturbed, and / 
your duty, which has been so shamduIlyTbctrayed? . Holy I 
arelne customs oi tne counffy in which you dwell I They 
rescue you from the attempts of the vilest slaves 1 You 
ought to thank me for the compulsory retirement in which I 
force you to live, since it is onhLlh gcby that you d ggrve. tp_ 
l ive at alL _ 

You cannot endure the chief of the eunuchs, because he is ' 
ever watchful of your demeanor, and ever ready to give you 
the sagest advice. ** His ugliness is so great," say you, *' that it 
pains you to look at him ; " as if persons were selected for 
these sorts of positions on account of their beauty ! Your « 
real grief is that you cannot have in his place the white ( 
eunuch who dishonors you. 

But what has your chief slave done to you ? She has told 
you that the familiarities between you and 2^1ida were of an 
improper character ; that is the motive of your hatred. 

It is my duty, Zachi, to be a rigorous judge ; and yet I 
am simply a husband who wishes to discover that you are! 
innocent The affection I feel for Roxana, my new wife,? 
does not impair the love I am bound to cherish for you, who I 
are quite as beautiful as she. Both of you are equally the 
objects of my tenderness, and Roxana has no advantage over 
you, except that which virtue adds to beauty. 

Smyrna, the 12th of the moon of ZUcade, 1711. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



42 



LETTER XXI. 
USBEK TO THE FIRST WHITE EUNUCH. 

You ought to tremble when you open this letter, or rather, 
you ought to have done so when you permitted the treachery 
of Nadir. You who, although you are enfeebled by years, 
cannot without crime lift your eyes to the dread objects of 
my love ; you who are forbidden to set a sacrilegious foot 
across the threshold of the awful place which hides them torn 
every eye, you allow those for whose conduct you are respon- 
sible to do what you yourself would never have the temerity 
to do ! — and does not the thought of the thunderbolt ready 
to fall upon their heads and yours strike you with dismay? 

AnH yViQt a^^ y ou but VJlc instrume nts that T may break 
at m y pleasure ?r — creatures who exist only as long as you 
^kaa^Thowto obey ; who have been sent into the world to 
live under my laws and to die when I order it ; who breathe 
the^ breath of li fe just as In pg «« "ly ^^rp'nti Ss, my love, o r 
even my-^ggl OTgy, has need of your vile service, and n o 
long STwho, m fi ne, have no privilege but that of submi s- 
si on^ nosoiil hut mv will^ and no hope ^cept th at which / 
springs from contributin g to my felicity. 

I know that some oi fAy WivdS SJt^ impatient under the 
austere laws of duty ; that the constant presence of a black 
eunuch vexes them ; that they are weary of the frightful 
objects entrusted with the task of keeping them fiedthful to 
their husband; I know all this; but as for you who have 
encouraged this disorder, you shall be punished in a man- 
ner that will make all who abuse my confidence tremble. 

I swear by all the heavenly prophets and by Ali, the 
greatest of them all, that if you falter in your duty, I shall 
feel as little compunction in crushing you as I do in crush- 
ing the insects I tread under my feet 

Smyrna, the 12th of the moon of Zilcade, 171 1. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



43 

LETTER XXII. 

GARpN TO THE FIRST EUNUCH. 

The farther Usbek travels from the seraglio, the more 
eagerly does he turn his thoughts to his sacred wives ; he / 
sighs and weeps, h is regrets grow keener, and his jealousy ' 
b ecom es stronger. He wishes lo mcrease tne number of 
their guardians. ±le is about to send me back with all the 
blacks who accompany him. He has no longer any fear on 
his own account, — ^is ^^^r ^ ^ for that which is a thousand | 
t imes dearer to him »^an ^^^"^°^^^ 

I am about, then, to live under your laws and to partici- 
pate in your cares. Gr eat heavens ! how many things are^ 
needed to render one single man happy I 

Nature wouia seem to have at uiw t ime placed woman 
in a condition of dependence, and then to have freed her 
from her subjection* Immediately, disagreements sprang 
up between the two sexes because their rights were recip- 
rocal. But a new species of harmony unites men and 
women at present : h atred is the tie that hinds wp pnen and 
u s, love is the tie that binds women and men. 

Well, I must try to assume the demeanor befitting my 
future office : severity shall dwell on my brow, and sombre 
glances dart from my eyes. No smile shall flicker on my 
lips. My outward expression shall be calm, though the 
mind within be troubled. I will exhibit the wrinkles of old 
age long before its vexatious disabilities appear. 

I should have liked to follow my master on his western 
journey, but my will is his property. It is his will that I 
watch over his wives ; I shall do so with fidelity. I know 
how to conduct myself towards a sex which, if allowed to be 
vain, becomes arrogant, and which it is less easy to humble 
than to destroy. I fidl prostrate at your feet. 

Smyrna, the 12th of the moon of Zilcade, 1711. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



H 



44 

LETTER XXIII. 

USBEK TO HIS FRIEND IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

Wb arrived at Leghorn aftir a voyage of forty days. It is a 
new city, and is a remarkable evidence of the genius of the 
dukes of Tuscany, who have changed a swampy village into 
the most flourishing town in Italy. 

The women here enjoy great freedom : they can look at 
men through a sort of window called a jalousie ; they may 
walk abroad every day accompanied by some old women ; 
they wear only a single veiL^ Thstr brnthrn in-lawy uncles^ 
and nephews can visit them w ^»^^^t t^^ ^'^'ghtCSt fthjwti^" 
on die pan oi ineir nusoands^ 

A Lhnsfaan dcy altords a spectacle of great interest to a 
Mahometan, when seen for the first time. I do not speak 
of the objects which at once strike the eye, such as the 
difference between their edifices, dress, principal customs, 
and ours. T>^f*r^ jg, even in the 
singularity which I feel but cannot express^ 

We start tor Marseilles lu-uiurtow7 our stay there will not 
be long. It is the intention of Rica and myself to go imme- 
diately to Paris, the capital of the European empire. Thiv« 
ellers always make for the great cities, because they are a 
sort of common country where all strangers can meet. 
Adieu. Rest assured I shall always love you. 

Leghorn, the lath of the moon of Saphar, 171 2. 
^ The Persian women wear four. 



Digitized by 



Google 



45 



(f) LETTER XXIV, •'.■C'V ) 

RICA TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

Wb have been a month in Paris, and have never had a 
moment's rest It takes a good deal of time and trouble to 
get lodgings, to find out the persons you are recommended 
to call upon, and to procure the necessary objects which are 
at once indispensable. 

Paris is as large as Ispahan. The houses are so hig h that 
you would swear only astrologers would care to live in them. 
You will have no difficulty in coming to the conclusion that 
a city built in the air, with five or six houses on top of one 
another, is extremely populous, and that, when everybody is 
in the streets, there is a good deal of confusion. 

You would hardly believe that I have not seen a singl e 
person walking , during the month I have been here. No 
people in the world make a more constant use o f carriages 
than the French. They run, they fly ; the slow vehicles of 
Asia, the measured pace of our camels, would throw them 
into a lethargy. As for myself, such rushing and hurrying 
are by no means to my taste ; and, as I often go afoot with- 
out changing my gait, I get sometimes as mad as a Chris- 
tian, for even if I did not object to be splashed with mud all 
over, I could certainly never forgive the way in which I am 
jostled and elbowed regularly and periodically. One man 
just behind me gives me a shove as he passes that turns me 
half round, and another, coming from an opposite direction, 
sets me spinning until I am back in my original position ; 
the result is, I am more exhausted after a hundred steps than 
I ought to be after walking ten leagues. 

Do not imagine for a moment that I am in a position at 
present to describe fully the manners and customs of Eu- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



45 

rope, I have but a slight idea of them myself, and have had 
scarcely time to do anything but wonder. 

The King of France^ is the most powerful prince in 
Europe. He has no gold mines, like his neighbor the 
KingofSpain; but he is far richer than he, because he can 
draw his we alth ^^"^ t^^ rr^rsity ^f uia >.tKj^Hi and that is 
more inexhaustible than all the mines in the world. He has 
undertaken or sustained great wars without other resources 
than the titles of honor he had for sale, and this marvellous 
example of human pride has enabled him to pay his troops, 
fortify his cities, and equip his fleets. 

Moreove r, this king is a yeat magician ; even the minds of 
his subjects are subject to his dominion; he makes them 
/ / r * '7 /; / ' I' 'A think what he wishes. If he has only a million crowns in his 
[ ' treasury, he has but to persuade them that one crown is 

worth two, and they believe him. If he has to cany on 
a costly war, and is without money for the purpose, adl he 
need do is to insinuate diat a bit of paper is money, and 
they are all convinced that such is the case on the spot 
He has even succeeded in making them believe that his 
mere touch cures all manner of diseases, so great is the 
strength and power he exercises over their minds. 

Nor ought you to be astonished at the account I give of 
this prince; there is another magi cian whose control over the 
mind of this sovereign is as absolute as that of the latter is 
: ' ' > ' ' * { ^^^^ ^^ ^^'^ subjects. This magician is called th e Pope : 
at one time, he persuades the prince that three are really 
one ; at another, that the bread he eats is not bread, or that 
the wine he drinks is not wine, and a thousand other such 
things. 

And in order to keep him up to the mark, and not let 
him lose the habit of believing, he gives him, from time 
to time, certain articles of faith as an exercise. Two years 
ago, he sent him a huge document which he styled ''Constitu- 
tion," and insisted that king and people should believe all 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



.1 </ 



47 

therein contained under the heaviest penalties. He suo- 

ceeded at once with the prince, who gave the example of 

sabmission to his subjects ; but some of the latter revolted, 

and said they would not believe anything contained in that ¥ 

document. Women have been the prime movers in a re- C^^aA^i^I^^ ?<■''*/ / 

bellion which has divided the court, the kingdoiv and the p^^ .. ^ 0,f ^ ^ c/^v ^ 

family. T he ** Constitution " forbids the reading of a book W ]^^ 

w hich all' C hristians say tos b rought do wn from heaven ; ^Y 

i t is, in iacty their Koran. Tlie women indignant at this 

outrage 'mi~thelrsex7 are arousing the utmost hostility to this 

" Constitution ; " they have won over the men, who are not 

particularly anxious about their privilege in the matter, to their ^ ; / 

side. It must be confessed that this Mufti does not reason > > '/ *! ' ' ' ' '^ ^ / 

badly; and, by the great Ali t it cannot be but that he has / / ^// ,.« '^^h/- 

learned something of the principles of our holy law: for • ; « . y /*«« .. 

smce womei ^ yyf r^ m>flti* d yifenor to us^ and smce our ^^/ 

prophets tell us they cannot enter paradise, why should it be 

necessary for them to read a book the sole purpose of which 

is to teach the way thither? 

I have heard things about thto king which seem incredible, 
and I have no doubt you will hesitate to believe them. 

It is said that all the time he was making war on his 
neighbors, who had formed a league against him, he was 
surrounded by a legion of invisible enemies scattered over 
the whole realm ; it is added that ne has been searching 
for these same enemies during more than thirty years, and, 
despite the unwearied efforts of certain dervishes who have 
his confidence, has not been able to find a single one of 
them. They live with him, are in his court, his capital, 
among his soldiers and judges, and itis^ however, stated 
that he wiU have the vexation of dying without discovering 
them. It looks as if these people existed in general, but 
not in particular ; as if they formed a body which had no 
members. Doubtless, Heaven wished to punish this prince 
for his want of moderation towards his vanquished «Bemie% 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



48 

and so has encompassed him with invisible foe g, whose 
genius and destiny are supenor to his own. 

I will continue to write to you and keep you informed 
on subjects very remote from the Persian character and 
genius ; but the men of the country in which you live and 
the men amongst whom I abide are very different sorts of 
men. 

PAUib the 4th of the moon of ReUab 2, 171a. 



LETTER XXV. 

USBEK TO IBBEN 
At Sirv^RNA. 

I HAVE received a letter from your nephew Rehdi : he tells 
me he is leaving Smyrna with the object of visidng Italy, 
and that the sole aim of his journey is to improve his mind, 
and so render himself more worthy of you. I congratulate 
you on having a nephew who will be some day the consola- 
tion of your old age. 

Rica has written you a long letter; he informs me that he 
has given a very detailed accoimt of this country in it. The 
liveliness of his intellect enables him to seize on points with 
great quickness ; as I am a slower thinker, I regret to say 
that I am not as yet in a position to tell you anything. 

You are often the subject of our affectionate conversation ; 
we can never tire of referring to the generous reception you 
gave us at Smyrna, and the many evidences of friendship for 
which we are indebted to you. May you ever, noble-hearted 
Ibben, find friends as grateful and as faithful as we are ! 

What delight it would afford me to meet you soon once 
more, and spend with you one of those happy days that pass 
so pleasantly between two friends ! 

Paris, the 4th of the moon of Rebiab, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



49 



LETTER XXVI. 

USBEK TO ROXANA 
At the SsmiGuo in Ispahan. 

How happy you are, Roxana, to be living in the sweet land 
of Persia, and not in those corrupted countries where 
modesty and virtue are unknown! J Iappy Roxanal you 
dwelUniny seraglio as in some abode of innocence impj^« 
iiaUeJo.dlfi_iissattlt»^ mankmd. It delights you to think 
that your fortunate disability insures you against the risk of 
fidling. Never has a man sullied your innocence with a 
lascivious look; not even your fother-in-law has seen your 
lovely mouth on those festal occasions when a certain 
amount of freedom is permitted, for you have never failed to 
cover it with a sacred veil. Happy Roxana ! in the country, 
you have always had eunuchs to walk before you, ready to 
kill the audacious wretch who did not fly at your approach. 
What dif&culty did not I myself to whom Heaven sent you 
for my felicity, experience in mastering that treasure which 
you defended with such firmness I What an affliction it was t 
for me not to see you during the first days of our marriage I 
And what impatience was mine when I did see you ! You 
did not gratify it, however ; you irritated it, on the contrary, 
by die stubborn refusals of an alarmed .chastity ; you con* 
founded me with all those other men from whom you conceid 
youzself on eveiy occasion. Do you remember the day 
when I lost you among your slaves, who betrayed me and 
frustrated my efforts to discover you? Do you remember 
that other day when, seeing that your tears were powerless, 
you appealed to the authority of your mother to check the 
fury of my love? Do you remember how, when all these 
lesources failed you, you found others in your courageous 
soul? You seized a dagger and threatened to immolate the 

4 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



50 

husband tbat loved you, if he persisted in requiring from you 
that which you cherished even more than you did him. Two 
months pa»ed in this combat between love and virtue. You 
pushed your chaste scruples too far; you refused to surren- 
der even after being vanquished, and defended to the last 
an expiring virginity ; you regarded me as an enemy who 
outraged you, not as a spouse who adored you ; for more 
than three months you never dared to lift your eyes to me 
without blushing ; your air of conftision seemed to reproach 
me for the advantage I had taken. I did not even enjoy a 
tranquil possession^ you robbed me of all the charms and 
graces you could, and I was intoxicated by the greatest (avon 
though I could not obtain the least 

If you had been reared in this country, you would not 
have been thrown into such agitation ; the women he 
lost all restraint ; they appear N *f()"" men with their faces un- 
covered, as if they courted defe at ; they seek tO' attract their 
eyes'; ineylec tneu: looks dwell upon them in the mosques, 
on the promenades, and even in their very homes ; the ser- 
vice of eunuchs is unknown. Instead of the noble simplicity 
and charming bashfulness which reign amongst you, a brutal 
shamelessness prevails, to which it is impossible for me to 
grow accustomed. 

Yes, Roxana, if you were here you would feel outraged at 
the ignominious condition into which your sex has sunk j 
you would fly those abominable places, and would sigh for 
the sweet retreat whe min ^rnn finH {^gippin^ag^ ^hf "* Y^U ^"^ 

w here youjca n love me without ever fearing to los e that lo ve 

which it isv oui' i^m^ m ^^ ^^^ "^^ 

When you heighten the brilliancy of your complexion with 
the most beautiful colors ; when you perfume your body with 
the most precious essences ; when you appear in your love« 
Kest garments; when you try to distinguish yourself from 
four companions by the grace with which you dance and 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



51 

the sweetness with which you sing ; in a word^ when you at- 
tempt to rival them in charms, amiability, and sprightliness, I 
cannot imagine that in aU this you have any other aim than 
the desire of pleasing me; and when I see your modest 
blush, when your eyes meet nune, when you steal gently into 
my heart with soft and flattering words, I cannot, Roxana, 
doubt of your love* 

But what am I to think of the women of Europe ? The 
art with which they make up their complexions, the or- 
naments with which they bedeck themselves, the attention 
they pay to their person, the perpetual desire of pleasing 
which engrosses them, are so many stains o n their vir^yg aaH 
out rages on their husbands. 

It is not) Koxana, ttiat I believe they push their contempt 
for propriety as far as such conduct would lead one to be- 
lieve, a nd that their debauchery attains that horrible excess^ 
at t fee mehtibn of whic h T shudder, the a\> solute violation o f 

! conjugal ti e. There are few women so abandoned as to 
cany crime toTEkt extent : they all bear in their souls a cer- 
tain impress of virtue which has been engraved thereon at 
their birth, and which education weakens, but does not de- 
stroy. They may be lax enough as to the external duties 
which modesty exacts. When it comes to taking the final 
step, nature revolts ; so that, when we imprison you so strictiy, 
when we have you guarded by so many slaves, when we curb 
your desires with such severity, if they happen to stray be- 
yond bounds, it is not because we dread the final act of 

unfaithfulness, it is t^ ^a««^ ^a Vry^nr that pnrit^r rnnnnt K^ 

too fitAinlff^s, qnri th"*' ^^'^ Mig^l^St flemish mav corrupt it. 

T pity yon^ "R^^ya"^ Yo ur long-tri^d chastitv merited ^ 
huahai^d who would hfve neyefp left you, a nd who could 
himself have repressed those desires which only your own 
virtue can now restrain. 

Paris, the 7th of the moon of Rhegeb, 171a. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



52 



LETTER XXVII. 

VSBEK TO NESSIR 
At Ispahan. 

Wb are now in Bbxis, that haughtjr rival of thedtjrofthe ton.* 

When I was leaving Smyrna, I requested my friend Ibben 
to forward yon a box containing some presents; you wiK 
receive this letter by the same agency. Although he and I 
are separated by some five or six hundred leagues, we ex- 
change news with as much Polity as if he were at Ispahan 
and I at Koum. I send my letters to Marseilles, whence 
ships are constantly sailing for Smyrna; from that city he 
forwards those intended to reach Persia by the Armenian 
caravans which start every day for Ispahan. 

Rica enjoys perfect health; his strong constitution, his 
youth, and natural gayety render him superior to all trials. 

But I cannot say as much of myself: both mind and | 
body are in a low condition ; I give way to reflections that > 
become every day gloomier ; my health grows worse, and my i 
thoughts naturally turn to my native land, and refuse to abide I 
in a country in which everydiing seems stranger the longer I \ 
dwell in it 

But I conjure you, dear Nessir, let not my wives become 
acquainted with my situation. If they love me, I would 
spare their tears ; and if they love me not, I would not add [ 
to their perversity. 

If my eunuchs believed me in danger, if they could hope 
that a base connivance would be followed by impunity, they 
would soon cease to be deaf to the aUuring voice of that sex 
which can move rocks and affect even inanimate things. 

Farewell, Nessir ; it* is a pleasure for me to know that I 
can give you this mark of my confidence. 

Paxis, the 5th of the moon of Chahban, 171a. 
^ Ispahan. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



53 

LETTER XXVin. 
RICA TO -^-s 

I 8AW a strange thing yesterday, although it is oomiiio« 
enough at Paris. 

All the people assemble in the evening after dinner, and 
play at a sort of performance which I have heard called 
comedy* The main action takes place on a platform styled 
a theatre. On both sides of it are seen little recesses named 
boxes, in which men and women play in dumb show scenes 
that are not unlike those to which we are accustomed in 
Persia. 

In one place a languishing dame sighs forth her pangs ; in 
another, a lady, with sparkling eyes and impassioned air, re- 
gards her lover with an ardor which he returns with interest. 
Every passion is reflected on their features, and expressed 
with an eloquence that is not the less fiery for being mute. 
The actresses, as a rule, are but half-clad, though their 
modesty generally induces them to wear a muff, in order to 
hide their arms. A crowd of people stand in the lower part 
of the theatre, who laugh at those above them, and those 
above them laugh in turn at them. 

But the persons who take the most trouble of all are cer- 
tain young men, who are selected for the purpose because 
the vigor natural to their time of life enables them to bear 
fatigue. They are obliged to be everywhere; they pass 
through ways known to tiiem alone, mounting with astound- 
ing agility from story to story ; they are now upstairs, now 
downstairs, now in this box, now in that ; they dive, so to 
speak, are lost, reappear. Often they leave one theatre, and 
are seen immediately in another. There are old men even 
who engage in the same antics as the others, and, consider- 
ing that most of them cany crutches, their miraculous activ- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



54 

• 

fty is well calculated to excite surptise. At last, some of the 
parties retire to halls where private comedies are played; 
they begin with profound salutations, which are followed by 
embraces. I am told the slightest acquaintance gives a 
man the right to squeeze another man to death : it would 
seem the place inspires tenderness. Indeed it is said that 
the princesses who are also present are for from cruel ; and, 
if we except two or three hours of the day when they are 
rather morose, ii may be affirmed that the rest of the time 
they are tractable enough, and that their moroseness is a 
kind of intoxication that quits them easily. 

All the incidents I have just written to you about are 
reproduced, in pretty much the same form, at another place 
called the Opera : the only difference is, that what is spoken 
at the one, is sung at the other. One of my friends, a few 
days ago, introduced me into the box where one of the 
principal actresses was disrobing. We became so well 
acquainted that on the next morning I received this lettet 
from her. 

Monsieur, — I am the most unhappy girl in the world ; I 
have always been the most virtuous actress belonging to the 
Opera. But seven or eight months ago, when I was in the 
same room you saw me in yesterday, dressing for my part as a 
priestess of Diana, a young abb^ came thither, and, without 
respect for my white robe, my veil, and fillet, robbed me of my 
virtue. In vain do I represent in the most glowing colors the 
importance of the sacrifice I have made for him; he laughs in 
my face, and maintains that he has found nothing sacred or 
sacrificial about me. However, I have now reached such a 
degree of pregnancy that I no longer dare to appear in the 
theatre ; for my delicacy on the point of honor is something 
inconceivable, and I have always held that a girl of good birth 
can lose her virtue more easily than her modesty. As 1 am a 
person of such consummate delicacy, you will have no difficulty 
in imagining that this young abbd would never have succeeded, 
had he not promised to marry me. Owing to my very ju8tifi« 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



55 

able reliance on this promise, I neglected the ordinary litde 
formalities, and began where I should have ended. But, since 
his infidelity has dishonored me, I no longer wish to live at the 
Opera, where, between you and me, they hardly give me 
enough to enable me to live ; for now that I am growing older 
and gradually losing my charms, my salary, though it is always 
the same, seems to me to grow less and less every day. I have 
been informed by a member of your suite that, in your country, 
a good dancer is esteemed beyond measure, and that, were I at 
Ispahan, my fortune would be made at once. If you would be 
kind enough to grant me your protection, and take me with you 
to your country, you would have the credit of doing a favor to 
a woman whose virtue and conduct render her not unworthy of 
your benevolence. 

I am w 

Paris, the 2d of the moon of Chalval, 1712. 



LETTER XXIX. 

RICA TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

The Pope is the head of the Christians. He is an old 
idol to which incense is offered from habit At one time he 
was formidable even to princes, for he deposed them with 
as much ease as our magnificent sultans depose the kings of 
Irimetta and Georgia. But he is feared no longer. He 
proclaims himself to be the successor of one of the first 
Christians, called Saint Peter ; and certainly his inheritance is 
a rich one, for he has immense treasures, and a large extent 
of territory is under his dominion. 

The bishops are jurists of a certain character ; they are 
subordinates of the Pope, and exercise two very different fiinc- 
tions under his authority. When they are gadiered together, 
they can, like him, decree articles of £uth ; while in their 
individual capacity, they have hardly any other function than 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



S<5 

that of dispensing with the law. For you must understand that 
the Christian religion is burdened with an immense number 
of customs that are very hard to observe ; and, as it has been 
judged that it is less easy to observe these customs than to have 
bisnops who can dispense from their observance, these func- 
tionaries have been appointed in the interests of the public. 
Thus, if a person is unwilling to keep the rahmazany or desires 
to have the customary formalities in marriage omitted, or to 
break his vows, or to marry within the forbidden degrees of 
kindred, or, sometimes, to be released from his oath, applica- 
tion is made to the bishop or to the Pope, who gives a dis- 
pensation at once. 

The bishops do not decree articles of faith of their own 
motion. There are numberless doctors, dervishes for the 
most part, who create new religious difficulties among them* 
selves ; they are allowed to dispute for a considerable period, 
and the war lasts until it is terminated by a decision. 

Consequently, I am able to assure you t hat there never has 
been a kingd om in whi ch there have been so many civil war s 
as in that ot Uhnst. 

Those who startle the world with some new proposition 
are at first called heretics. Every heresy has its own particular 
name, which becomes the rallying-cry of its adherents. But 
no one need be a heretic unless he is perfectly willing to be 
so : all he has to do is to split a hair with his adversaries ; to 
propound some subtle distinction for the benefit of his 
accusers ; and whether his distinction be intelligible or not, 
it renders our logician as white as snow, and he may now 
insist on being called orthodox. 

All I have mentioned holds good for France and Germany, 
for I have been told that in Spain and Italy there are certain 
dervishes who do not understand a joke, and who bum a man, 
just as if he were so much straw. Whoever falls into the 
hands of these people may account himself happy if he hat 
always prayed to God with little wooden beads in his hand« 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



57 

or has worn two pieces of doth tied with two ribbons^ or hu 
gone to a place they call Galicia ! A poor devil who cannot 
advance any of these proofs of his innocence finds himself in 
terrible trouble indeed 1 Though he swear like any pagan 
that he is orthodox^ they will very likely refuse to be moved 
by his protestations, and will roast him as a heretic. His dis- 
tinctions may be in the subtlest vein — they wiU have none 
of them ; he will be ashes before they have heard him to the 
end. 

Other judges presume that the accused is innocent ; these 
al ways presume that he is guilty . In any doubt their rule is 
to' lean to the side of severity, and this apparently because 
t hey believe men are naturally bad ; but, on the other hand, 
they have so high an opinion of men that they consider them 
incapable of lying ; for they receive the testimony of deadly 
enemies, of women of evil life, and of men who exercise an 
infamous trade. When they sentence their victims, they pay 
a neat little compliment to those unfortunates decked in 
brimstone-colored shirts, and tell them that they are much 
afflicted at seeing them so poorly clad, that they are merci- 
ful and abhor blood, and the necessity they have been under 
of condemning them fills them with despair. Then they 
assuage their distressful emotions by confiscating to their own 
profit the possessions of these unhappy wretches. 

Happy the land which the children of the Prophet inhabit I 
There such sad spectacles are unknown.* The Holy religion 
brought down to it by the angels appeals only to truth for 
its defence ; it can maintain itself without recourse to such 
violent means. 

Paris, the 4th of the mooo of Chalval, 1712. 

> The P«nUi» are the most tolerant of all (he MahonetaaiL 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



S8 



LETTER XXX. 

RICA TO THE SABIE 
At Smyrna. 

The curiosity of the natives of Paris reaches excessive pro* 
portions. When I arrived here, I was stared at as if I had 
dropped down from the sky ; old men, young men, women, 
children, all were wild to get a sight of me. If I went out for a 
walk, every one ran to the window ; if I entered the Tuileries, 
a circle immediately gathered around me ; even the women 
formed an arc in my neighborhood variegated like a rainbow 
of a thousand colors. Did I go to the theatre, every opera< 
glass was levelled at me ; in fine, jie ater was human being the 
object of s o much^otice as I . I used to smile sometimes 
ozTheanng people ^o hardly ever left their chamber, say to 
each other: "How very Persian he does look!" To 
increase my surprise, I found my portraits everywhere ; in all 
the shops, on every mantelpiece, so much did they dread the 
idea of not having me always before their eyes. 

So much honor at last became a burdeiHL l ^^^ pQ^ believe 
that I was"^uch a rare and exceptional specimen ofjiumah 
kind; and, although I have a sufficiently good. opinion of 
myself, I could never have imagined that my presencejJiQuld 
disturb- the^ peace ^-4 -great city where I was unknown. 
After reflecting on the matter I decided to abandon my 
Persian garb and dress in the European style ; I should thus 
be able to discover whether there was anything still left in 
my physiognomy calculated to excite the admiration of the 
world. The experiment gave me some idea of my real value. 
Stripped of ray foreign adornments, I saw that I was meas* 
ured by another standard. I had good reason to complain 
of my tailor, who had thus deprived me of the attention and 
esteem of the public in a moment ; for my insignificance be- 
came j^^Murent at once. I remained sometimes a whole hour 



Digitized by VjOOQIC 



59 

in a company, and no one ever thought of looking at me ; 
nor had I a smgle opportanity of opening my mouth. If 
some individual, however, chanced to remark: ''He is a 
Persian," there was immediately a buzzing murmur around 
me: "Ah I indeed! Monsieur is a Persian? How very 
extraordinary 1 How in the world can he be a Persian P** 
Pau8» the 6th of the moon of Chalval, 17 12. 

LETTER XXXI. 

RHEDI TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

I AM now in Venice, my dear Usbek. Though you saw 
every city in the world, Venice would still be a source of 
wonderment to you ; it will always create astonishment to 
see a city, with its towers and mosques, rising from the 
depths of the waters, and to find an innumerable crowd of 
people in a spot where you should expect only to find fish. 

But this pagan city lacks the most precious treasure there 
is in the world, namely, fresh water ; it is impossible to per- 
form a single lawful ablution. It is held in abomination by 
our holy prophet, and he never gazes down on it from 
heaven but with anger. 

But for this circumstance, my dear Usbek, I should be 
delighted to live in a city where my mind acquires fresh 
vigor every day. I am gaining a knowledge of the secrets 
of commerce, the interests of princes, and the different 
forms of government in their states ; I do not disre gard 
EuropfiaP-Jsai perstitions even ; I am studying medicin e, 
natural philosophy, and astronomypand am also giving some 
atte nSbn toTie arts. At length, I am succee ding in dis- 
pell ing the clouds that obscured my eyesight in tlie lana of 
my birtEl ""^ ' 

Venice, the i6th of the moon of Chalval, 17 12. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



60 

LETTER XXXIL 
RICA TO 

I visiTKD an institution the other day where three hun- 
dred persons are lodged rather poorly. It did not take me 
long, for neither the church nor the buildings are worthy 
ot much notice. Those I saw there appeared to be in high 
good-humor; many were playing at cards, or at other 
games with which I am not acquainted. As I was leaving, 
one of these left at the same time, and, having heard me 
ask the way to the Marais, which is the remotest quarter of 
Paris, he said : '^ I am going there ; follow me, and I will 
show you the way.** I could not have had a better guide; 
he extricated me from several embarrassing predicaments, 
and protected me adroitiy from wagons and carriages. 
When we had almost reached our destination, my curiosity 
prompted me to say: '^My good friend, may I take the 
liberty of inquiring who you are?" — **I am blind, mon- 
sieur," he answered. *' What 1 you are blind I '* I ex- 
claimed. ** Then, how is it you did not ask the worthy man 
who was playing cards with you to conduct us? *' — "He is 
blind also," he replied. " There have been, for the last four 
hundred years, three hundred blind men in the house where 
you met me. But I have to leave you : there is your street ; 
I will now lose nyself in the crowd, and then enter yon 
church, where, I assure you, I shall be more in the way af 
people than they will be in mine." 

Paris, the 17th of the moon of Chalval, ijia. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



6i 



LETTER XXXIIL 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 

Wms is 10 dear in Paris, on account of the heavy duties 
on it, that it woul^^. seem as if there was a desire to fulfil the 
precepts of the divine Koran, which interdicts its use. 

When I think of the fatal effects of that beverage, I can* 
not avoid regarding it as the most fatal gift that nature has 
bestowed upon man* Nothing has blasted the reputation 
and lives of our monarchs to such a degree as intemper 
ance : it has been the most noxious source of their cruel^ 
and injustice. 

To the shame of these men be it said that, although the 
hw forbids our princes to drink wine, yet they drink it, and 
to an excess that degrades them below humanity even* 
Christian princes are, on the other hand, permitted to use 
it, and it has not been observed that any fault on their part 
can be traced to the custom. The human mind is in per* 
petual contradiction with itself: in a licentious debauch, 
men revolt furiously against all precepts, and the law made 
to render us more upright often serves only to render us the 
more guilty. 

But when I disapprove the use of this liquor, which 
destroys reason, I do not, therefore, condemn those bever 
ages that enliven the mind. To seek remedies against sad- 
ness with as much care as against the most dangerous 
maladies is one of the marks of Oriental wisdom. When 
a European meets irith misfortune, his sole resource is 
the perusal of a work written by a philosopher named 
Seneca ; but the Asiatics are more sagacious than they, and 
prove the better physicians, for they drink a beverage that 
contributes to the gayety of man and dulls the memory of his 
sorrows. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



62 

No consolations are more grievous than those drawn from 
UgccMity of evil, t he inutility of remedies, the fatality o f 
d estinyTgie order telabUshe dJ^}LBLQvidence/and the essen. 
ti al misery of human lif e. To attempt to alleviate distress 
by afi&rming that man was bom to be wretched is to make 1 
sport of affliction; much better is it to elevate the min d/ 
iihnv^ siirl^ Cff^siH erations, and treat him as a bfi'"g "^^ 
f eels, instead of as a being who reasons. 

Th e SOul^^ ^ ^onpr ft<s II is unii;fid ^*^ *^^ ^^^^yj jf sub* 
ject to that body's tyrannyi If the blood moves slowly 
through our veins, if our spirits are not sufficiently relieved 
from their impurities, or are inadequate in their amount, we 
M into dejection and melancholy ; but if we imbibe those in* 
fusions which tend to change the disposition of the body, the 
soul becomes capable of receiving exhilarating impressions, 
and experiences a secret satis&ction at seeing its machine 
resume, so to speak, its life and motion. 

* Paris, the 25th of the moon of Zilcade, i7i> 



LETTER XXXIV. 

USBEK TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

The women of Persia are more beautiful than the women of 
France, but the latter are prettier. It is hard not to feel 
love in the presence of the former, and delight in that of 
the latter : the first are more tender and modest, the second 
more vivacious and spirited. 

The regular life which the women of Persia lead is the 
potent cause of their beauty ; they neither gamble nor sit 
up late ; they drink no wine, and almost never expose them- 
selves to the atmosphere. It must be acknowledged that life 
in the seraglio is more conducive to health than to pleasure; 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



63 

h is a calm, untroubled life ; everything in it is connected 
with subordination and duty ; even its pleasures are serious 
and its joys austere^ and are all in themselves significant of 
authority and dependence. 

Even the men in Persia have not the same gayety as 
Frenchmen; you never find amongst them that freedom 
of spirit and that air of contentment which is here the pre- 
rogative of all states and of all conditions. 

It is still worse in Turkey ; there femilies may be dis- 
covered that, firom father to son, have never laughed since 
the foundation of the monarchy. 

The gravity of Asiatics springs from the absence of inter- 
course ; they never see one another except when forced by 
the exigencies of ceremony. Friendship, that sweet tie of the 
heart which sustains us in the trials of life, is to them almost 
unknown; they stay within their houses, where the same 
companions always await them, so that each family is, as it 
were, isolated from all the others. 

One day, when I was discussing the subject with a man of 
this country, he said to me : " Nothing disgusts me more 
with your customs than the fact that you have to live with 
^ves Whose hearts and minds are on a level with their ig- 
noble condition. These base creatures weaken the virtuous 
sentiments you inherit fix>m nature, and as they are around 
you from childhood, they must even destroy them. 

" For just try to look at the matter with unprejudiced eyes ; 
what sort of a training can be expected bom a wretch who 
regards the guardianship of another man's wives as his sole 
title to honor, and for whom the vilest of employments is a 
source of pride ; whose verv fidelity. h] «y solitary virtiiftr m 
utterlv degrading, because its motives are envy^ jealo uf^y, ^"^ 
despair i w ho, spume d bv either s^x. humss to be avenged 
o n hoth^ a^ij consents to be tyrannized over by tjif stmngf fj 
in order that he may afflict the weaker ; w ho derives, fro« 
his imperff^i^", i|p;liness. and deformity, all the authority oi 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



<S4 

his podtioii, and is esteemed only because he is unworthy 
of being so ; who, in fine, riveted forever to the door behind 
which he stands, harsher than the bolts and bars tliat secure 
it, boasts of the fifty years he has spent in this infunoos 
post, in which, as the tool of his master's jealousy, he has 
given tet rein to all his baseness." 

PAais» the 14th of the moon at ZOhnfC, 171^ 



LETTER XXXV. 

USBEK TO GEMSCHID, HIS COUSIN, 
Dervish op the Illustrious Monastery op Tauris. 

What is your opinion of the Christians, sublime dervish ? 
Do you believe that at the day of judgment they wiU, like 
the unbelieving Turks, serve as asses for the Jews, and be 
ridden by the latter at full speed down into hell? I know 
well they cannot enter the abode of the prophets, and that 
the great Ali was not sent on a mission to them. But 
because they have been so unfortunate as never to find a 
mosque in their country, do you think they are, therefore, to 
be condemned to eternal tortures, and that God will punish 
them for not practbing a religion of which they never beard f 
Permit me to tell you that I have often questioned these 
Christians, and have asked them what idea they had formed 
of the illustrious Ali, the most perfect of all men ; I have dis- 
covered that they were unaware of the existence of any such 
person. 

Consequendy, they do not resemble those infidels whom 
our holy prophets put to the sword because they refiised to 
believe in the miracles of heaven; their position would rather 
appear to be that of the unfortunates who lived in the dark* 
ness of idolatry before the divine light illuminated the coun* 
tenance of our great prophet 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



«5 

Besides, if their religion be closely examined^ it will be 
found to contain imperfectly developed germs of our dogmas. 
I have often admired the secret operations of Providence, 
which would seem to have adopted this plan of preparing 
them for a general conversion. A work by one of their doc- 
tors, entitled '* Polygamy Triumphant," has been brought to 
my notice, wherein the writer proves that polygamy is ap- 
pointed for all Christians. Their baptism bears a likeness 
to our legal ablutions ; and their error consists in the efficacy 
they attribute to the first ablution, for they believe that it 
renders subsequent ones unnecessary. Like us, their priests 
and monks pray seven times a day. They also look forward 
to a paradise, where, by means of the resurrection of the 
body, they will enjoy numberless delights. Like us^ they 
observe regular hsts and mortifications, by which they ex- 
pect to dispose the divine mercy in their favor. They wor- 
ship the good angels, and fear the bad. They have a sacred 
confidence in the miracles wrought by God through the 
medium of his servants. Like us, they acknowledge the 
insufficiency of their merits and the need of an intercessor 

with God. I sg<> Mahnn^Atar^igfin ^t^ryvhprt^j althnngK I 
Annn^ finH Ufahnm^f g^yy|iAri>. In spite of all obstacIeS, 

CuthwiU triumph, and always pierce the darkness that sur- 
rounds it ^mr> ^^'^^ rftr?"* Taes all things, will an nihilate 
ev en error. Men will be ast onished to find themselves all 
manthallgH i]^)Aif the same sianQarQj everythmg, even tne 
hw, will be fiilfilled ; the divine copies thereof will be cairied 
away fixmi earth and borne to the heavenly archives. 

Pasu^ the aoth of the moon of Zilliage^ 171^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



66 



LETTER XXXVL 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Vknicx. 

CoFRS is veiy much in use in Paris ; there are a great 
many public resorts where it may be drunk. In some of 
these houses gossip is the order of the day, in others chess. 
There is one place where the cofTee is prepared in such 
Dsishion that it renders those who imbibe it witty ; at least, 
every one who leaves believes that he is four times wittier 
than when he entered. 

I confess, though, I am rather disgusted with those talented 
personages; for instead of making themselves useful to 
their country, they waste their abilities on the most childish 
trifles. For example, when I arrived in Paris, I found them 
quite excited over the most trivial question imaginable: 
it was that of the reputati on of a Greek poet^ as to jhe^ place 
r>f wti/H^A Kiffh flfiH t^A i^'nie pf whos e^death the world h as 
rf>maini>d in ignoranc^e for two thousand years. Both parties 
acknowledge that he was an excellent poet; Jt he dispute 
^tlim^ ^^^^y ^n the degree of his excellence, and eachjiad 
his own standard of measurement ; but some of these dis- 
pensers of £une had a higher one, some a lower ; and now 
you have the whole ground of the quarrel. It surely was 
spirited enough; *jhft "^^^^ ''n?"lHng T^mar^*' ^^^ ipt#>r- 
rhanp reH with great cordiality ; some of the retorts were so 
acrimonious that the manner of the debate was to me as 
great a source of wonder as the matter. " If any one," 
said I to myself, " were harebrained enough to attack die 
reputation of some honest citizen in presence of the defenders 
of this Greek poet, he would meet with an unpleasant sur- 
prise; for I have no doubt that a zeal sO sensitive with 
regard to the fame of the dead would blaze up at once m 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



67 

defence of the living I But however that may he" I added, 
^Heaven defend me from attracting in my direction the 
enmity of the censors of a poet who, though he has lain tw o 
thousand years in the tomb, is not safe from their implacable 
bpfr*>H \ Their fury is now expended on the air; what 
j gguld it be if animat ed by the presence of a living foe ? " 

"ine persons to wnom i have referred dispute in the vul- 
gar tongue, and must be distinguished from another kind 
of controversialists who use a barbarou s language that of 
itself seems to increase the rage and obstinacy of the ^m- 
batants. ^i nere are quarters where ttlL'SiC people may"l5e 
seen contending like a confused mass of soldiers in black 
regimentals engaged in some hand-to-hand encounter. Sub- 
tle distinctions are their food ; obscure reasonings and false 
inferences their very life. Their trade, although, at first 
sight, one might imagine its followers would die of hunger, 
really brings them in some return. We have had the spec- 
tacle of an entire nation, expelled from their 'own countr}s 
crossing the seas in order to settle in France, and carrying 
with them no other means of providing for the necessities 
of existence except a formidable talent for disputation* 
Adieu. 

Paus, the last day of the moon of Zilhage, 1713. 



\/ 



LETTER XXXVIL 

USBEK TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 



T&E Elny of France is old. In our history we have no 
example of a monarch who has reigned so long. It is said 
he possesses in a very high degree the talent of compelling' 
obedience; his ability is equally displayed in the govern- 
ment of his £unily, his court, and his state. He has evi- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



68 

dendj a high opinion of Oriental policy, for he has becQ 
heard to say that of all the governments in the world that 
of the Turla and that of our august sultan pleased him the 
best 

I have studied his character, and have discovered con- 
tradictions in it which I find impossible to harmonize ; for 
example, he has a minister who is only eighteen, and a 
"^^^'''*ft« vhft iff eighty; *^^ ^"^"^° ^'"' '•'^^' C P^^ , ^"» /-o*i^/^» 
#>nHiiri> ^hosft who teU him that its duties must be rigorously 
< ^bservedi ^though he flies from the uproar of cities and 
leads a most retired life, everything he does from morning 
tonjghUs jrith the viow of h a ving th e world s p^ a k of hi m ; 
he loves trophies and victories, yet is as much alarmed at 
the appearance of a good general at the head of his armies 
as he might be expected to be if he saw him at the head 
of an army of his enemies; 

He is, I imagine, the only example on record of a man 
who 18 at once burdened with more riches than a prince 
co uld ever hope for, and the victim of such poverty"^ 
w ould reduce a private individual to despair^ ^ 

He loves to bestow favors on his subjects ; but the ob- 
sequious diligence, o r rat^ le T busy indolence, o f his courtie ra 
is rewarded w ith as much munificence as thej aborio ua 
rampj^igns^ oTTriS uapU iins. — He is often moreTncUned to 
advance theman who undresses him or who hands him his 
napkin at table, than he is to exalt the general who captures 
cities and wins battles. He does not believe that the great- 
ness of a sovereign should be limited in the distribution of 
«^ graces, and never co nsiders whether the recipient of his 
! .bountyis a man of ment, because he thinks his selection 
. of hunJl eiiough oi itseit to render him desei^iij^cord- 
-i ingly, he haTbeenncIluwii lu i:oilf6f"a"«nall pension on an 
officer who has run two leagues from the enemy, and a 
hicrative government on one who had run four. 

He is magnificent in all things, but particularly in hii 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



69 

bufldings. Tti gre are more statues in the gardens of his 
palace than there are atizen s i n a gre aU Mj^j^^iiU budj f* — • 
guard is as numerous as that 6( the sovereign before whom 
ail other monarchs lie prostrate; his armies are as large, 
bis resources as great^ and his finances as inexhaustible. 

Paus, the 7th of the moon of Maharram, 17 13. 



LETTER XXXVIII. 
RICA TO IBBEN 

At SlCYRNA. 

It is a weighty subject of discussion among men whether 
to leave women their freedom or to deprive them of it 
is the more advantageous. It seems to me that much may 
be said on both sides. While Europeans aflSrm tha t to 
ren der those we love miserable is anything but the mflica. 
ticrn of a generous spirit, we Asiatics reply that to renounc e 

sy mptom of degradation in men . If they tell us that such 
a superfluity^ wives sfeut up in one house is embarrassing, 
we retort that ten wives who obey are less embarrassing 
than one who doesn't.- If in turn we urge the objection 
that Europeans can only be happy with wives that are 
faithful to them, they answer that the vaunted fidelity of 
our wives cannot prevent the disgust ever on the watch 
for satiated passion ; that they are too absolutely ours ; that 

^ possession so und isturbed, if it leaves nothiny to he 
feared, Ip a^n Tlf^^^'"!! ^^ ^ ^<*gir^4 ; an d that a little co- 

"d iuetrv. like salt, arouses desire and preven ts comipriop. It 
would take, perhaps, a wiser man than me to solve the 
difficulty; for if the Asiatics adopt the proper means to 
quiet their jealousy, the Europeans may be equally judicious 
in not having any. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



70 

^ After ally" say they^ ^'thoagh we may be nnlbrtunate as 
husbands, we can always find compensation as lovers. A man 
might justly complain of the infidelity of his wife, if there were 
only three persons in the world ; but^ when a fourth can be 
found, the balance of the account is restored." 

Another topic of discussion is whether the law of nature 
subjects women to men: ^'No/' said a very gallant phi- 
losopher to me the othti day, ^ Nature never dictated such a 
law ; the authority we exercise over them owes its existence 
to tyranny; t hey appw n^ ^q p«M> j^^^ hegflus<» ^l^^jr Hij^[^j^i. 
■JJ Qn is milder than ours, and thcy^ consequently, have mor e 
humanity and re ason. These advantages, which ouj^ht to 
have given them tRg^uperiority, if we had been reasonable, 
fta ve deprived them of it. becaus e we are nol^ . 

" Now, if it is true that our power over women is purely 
tyrannical, it is not less true that theirs over us is natural, 
having its source in beauty, which nothing can resist. Our 
power is not the same in every country ; but that of beauty 
is universal. Why should we be specially privileged? 
Because we are the stronger? Such a reason would be abso* 
lutely unjust We use every possible means to depress their 
courage ; if they were educated as we are, their intellectual 
capacity would be found fully equal to ours; test them 
by the gifts they have been allowed to cultivate, and then 
tell me which sex is the stronger.'^ 

It must be confessed, although such a thing is abhorrent 
to our customs, that, among the most refined nations, 
women have always had authority over their husbands. 
Such authority was established by law among the Egyptians 
in honor of Isis, and among the Babylonians in honor of 
Semiramis. It was said of the Romans that they com- 
mand H g^l "«tfi^i Itf' "*^yf*^ their TTf' i speak not of 
the Sauromates, who were actually the slaves of their wives, 
because they were too barbarous to be quoted as aa 
example. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



71 

You see^ my dear Ibben^ how I accommodate myself 
to the argumentative methods of this country, where the 
most extraordinary opinions are zealously supported, and 
everything reduced to a paradox. The prophet has settled 
the question, and regulated the prerogatives of both sexes. 
" Wives," says he, " should honor their husbands, husbands 
should honor their wives; b ut the former are a degr ee 

Paris, the 26th of the moon of Gemmadi 2, 17 15. 



LETTER XXXIX. 

HAGIi IBBI TO THE JEW BEN JOSHUA, 
Mahometan Proselyte, at Smyrna. 

It seems to me, Ben Joshua, that the birth of extraordinary 
men is always preceded by wonderful prognostics, as if 
nature suffered a kind of convulsion, and even divine power 
could not bring forth without travail. 

There is nothing so marvellous as the birth of Mahomet 
God, who by the decrees of his providence, had determined 
from all eternity to send this great prophet to mankind, 
that Satan might by his agency be chained, created a light 
two thousand years before Adam .* and this light, passing 
from elect to elect, from one ancestor of Mahomet to 
another, reached him at last, an authentic sign of his descent 
from the patriarchs. 

It was also because of this very prophet that God decreed 
that no child should be conceived, that woman should cease 
to be unclean, and that the membrum virile should be 
subject to circumcision. 

He came into the world circumcised, and joy shone 
<m his features from his birth. The earth trembled three 

1 A man who has peif onned the pilgrimage to Mecca. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



72 

AocB, as if she herself had been m labor; all idols feD 
prostrate ; the thrones of kings were overturned ; Lucifer 
was hurled down into the bottom of the sea, and was not 
able to emerge from its depths until he had been swimming 
forty days. Then he fled to Mount Cabes, whence he 
called to the angels with a terrible voice. 

That night God placed a limit between man and woman 
which neither should ever pass. The arts of the magicians 
and necromancers lost their power. A voice was heard 
proclaiming these words from the heavens : ** I have sent to 
the world my foithfiil friend." 

According to the testimony of Isben Aben, an Arabian his- 
torian, all the generations of the birds, the clouds, and the 
winds, and all the squadrons of the angels, assembled for 
the purpose of bringing up this child, and disputed about 
the privilege. The birds said in their warblings that they 
should have the honor of rearing him, as they could so eas- 
ily collect a variety of fruit from so many different places. 
"No," murmured the winds, "this is our prerogative, since 
we can waft to him the most agreeable odors from every di- 
rection," — " No, no," exclaimed the clouds ; "it is for us to 
foster him, because we can at any moment refresh him with 
our waters." Thereupon, the angels cried out indignantly: 
" In that case, what is there left for us to do? " But a voice 
issued forth from heaven and terminated all dissension : " He 
will not be taken away from mortal hands, because blessed 
shall be the paps that suckle him, and the hands that touch 
him, and the house in which he shall rest, and the bed 
whereon he shall lie." 

After so many conclusive testimonies, my dear Joshua, 
that heart must be of iron which refuses his holy law. What 
more could Heaven have done to authorize his divine mission, 
unless it overturned nature and destroyed the very men it 
aimed to convince? 

Taru, the soth of the moon of Rhegeb, 1715. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



LETTER XL. 

USBEK TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

As soon as a great man dies, people assemble in a mosque 
and listen to a funeral oration in his praise. It would be 
very difScult, however, to gather from the discourse pro* 
nounced on the occasion any correct idea as to the real 
character of the deceased. If I had my way, I would banish 
all funeral pomp : the birth of men should be a subject of 
lamentation, not their death. What avail all these cere- 
monious observances and lugubrious shows that are displayed 
before the eyes of a dying man at the moment of his depar- 
ture ? Do they not, like the tears of his &mily and the grief 
of his fidends, serve but to exaggerate the loss he is about to 
suffer? 

We are so blind that we do not know when we ought to 
mourn or when to rejoice ; our mirth, like our sorrow, almost 
always bears the stamp of deception. 

When I behold the Great Mogul place himself every year 
in the balance to be weighed like an oz, when I see his 
people rejoice at the increasing obesity of their prince, that \, a ^ ] > 
is to say at the augmentation of a deformity that renders him ^ ^ ' 
less fit to govern them, I weep, Ibben, for the extravagance 
of mankind 

Paris, the 20th of the moon of Rhegeb, 1713. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



74 



LETTER XLL 
THE FIRST BLACK EUNUCH TO USBEK. 

IsMAKL, one of your black eunuchs, magnificent lord, has just 
died, and it is absolutely necessary to replace him. As 
eunuchs are very l^ird to be got at present, it occurred to 
me that I might utilize for the purpose a black slave whom 
you have in the country; but, so £u:, I have been unable 
to persuade him to allow himself to be consecrated to this 
o£5ce. As I believe that ultimately the change would redound 
to his advantage, I tried, the other day, to employ a little 
gentle violence ; and, m unison with the superintendent of 
your gardens, I ordered that, whether he wished or no, he 
should be placed in a situation which would enable him to 
render you those services that are most gratifying to your heart, 
and live, like me, in those iread places, to which he dare 
not now even raise his eyes. But he at once began to howl 
as if we were flaying *iim alive, and struggled so fiercely 
that he escaped firom our hands, and so avoided the fatal 
knife. I have just learned that he intends writing to you to 
beg for mercy, and that he will declare I have been actuated 
in the matter by an insatiable desire of vengeance, because 
of certain stinging taunts he says he has uttered on my 
condition. But I swear by the hundred thousand prophets 
that in this I have only acted for the good of your service, 
the only thing dear to me, the object on which all my thoughts 
are concentrated. I prostrate myself at your feet 

The Seraglio at Fatme, the 7th of the moon of Biaharram, 1713. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



75 

LETTER XUL 
PHARAN TO USBEK, HIS SOVEREIGN LORD. 

Ir you were here^ magnificent lord, I would appear before 
your eyes all covered with white paper, and yet there would 
not be enough on me for a description of all the insults 
your first black eunuch, the most malignant of human beings, 
has heaped upon me since your departure. 

Making certain sarcasms, which he assumes that I made 
on his wretched condition the pretext, he is trying to wreak 
an inefiable vengeance upon my head. He has excited 
against me the cruel superintendent of your gardens, who, 
ever since you left, has overwhelmed me with impossible 
tasks, in which, though I have a thousand times been on the 
verge of losing my Kfe, my zeal for your service has never 
for a moment slackened. How often have I said within 
myself: " I have the gentlest of masters, and yet I am the 
most unhappy slave in the whole world I " 

I will confess, O magnificent lord, that I did not believe 
I was fated to endure still heavier calamities ; but this virulent 
eunuch has wished to cap the climax of his malevolence. 
Some days ago, on his own private authority, he purposed 
appointing me to the guardianship of your sacred wives, a 
doom that would be for me a thousand times worse than 
death. Those who, at their birth, have had the misfortune 
to receive such treatment from their cruel parents, may 
perhaps console themselves with the thought that they have 
never known any other condition ; but were I deprived of 
that which ranks me among men, I should die of grief, if I 
did not die of the barbarous cruelty of the ordeal. 

I kiss your feet, sublime lord, with the deepest humility ; 
let me, too, share in the efficiency of that virtue which the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



16 

world reveres ; let it not be said your commands have added 
another unfortunate to the number of the unhappy. 

The Gardens o£ Fatme, the 7th of the moon of Bfaharnmiy vjv^ 



LETTER XUIL 
USBEK TO PHARAK. 

Let joy again abide in your heart ; such must be the 
when you recognize these sacred characters ; bid the chiel 
eunuch and the superintendent of my gardens kiss them. I 
forbid them to lay a hand on you before my return ; teO 
them to purchase the eunuch that is required. Perform 
your duty as if you had me always before your eyes ; for 
know that the punishment I inflict on those who abuse my 
bounty is in proportion to its greatness. 

PauSi the 15th of the moon of Rhegeb^ 171^ 



LETTER XLIV. 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 

There are three privileged orders in France : the church, 
the sword, and the gown. Each has a sovereign contempt 
for the two others : a man who might deserve to be despised 
for happening to be a fool, is held in scorn for happening to 
be a lawyer. 

Even the meanest artisans dispute over the superiority of 
their particular trade : a man's idea of his eminence above 
those of a different craft is in exact proportion to his con- 
ception of the exalted nature of his own. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



17 

AH men more or less resemble that woman of the province 
of Erivan who, having received a favor from one of our 
roonarchsi wished a thousand times in the benedictions she 
lavished on him that God would make him governor of 
Erivan. 

I have read in some narrative or other that when a French 
vessel had anchored off the coast of Guinea, some of the 
crew went ashore to purchase sheep. They were brought 
before the king, who was administering justice to his subjects 
under a tree. The throne whereon he sat was a block of 
wood, but not the Great Mogul had a prouder demeanor : 
three or four guards, armed with wooden pikes, were around 
him ; an umbrella served as a canopy to shelter him from the 
rays of the sun ; all his ornaments, as well as those of his 
queen, consisted of their shining black skins and a few rings. 
This prince, whose self-conceit was greater than even his 
wretchedness, asked these strangers if he was much talked 
about in France. He believed that his fame must have 
spread from pole to pole; and, unlike that conqueror of 
whom it has been said that he reduced the whole earth to 
silence, he never doubted but that the entire universe was 
making him the subject of its conversation. 

When the Khan of Tartary has dined, a herald proclaims 
that all the princes of the world may now go to dinner, if 
they choose ; and this barbarian, who lives entirely on milk, 
who has no house, and whose sole means of existence is 
brigandage, regards all the kings of the earth as his slaves^ 
and insults them regularly twice every day. 

Paris, the 28th of the moon of Rhegeb, 171^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



7« 



LETTER XLV. 
RICA TO USB£K 

YssTERDAY momiiig, I heard a knock at my door whfle I 
was in bed. The door suddenly opened, or rather was driven 
in, and a man appeared whose acquaintance I had made 
somewhere or other, and who seemed to me to be ajittk 
out of his mind. 

His garb was anything but pretentious ; his wig, set awry, 
had not been even combed ; he had not taken time to sew 
the rents in his black doublet, and he had evidently re- 
nounced, on the present occasion, the precautions wherewith 
he was wont to disguise the dilapidations of his costume. 

** Get up," said he ; "I shall need you the entire day ; I 
have several purchases to make, and I shall be very glad to 
do so in your company : first, we must go to the Rue Saint' 
Honor^ and see a notary who is commissioned to sell an 
estate worth five hundred thousand livres ; I am anxious that 
he should give me the preference. On my way here, I 
stopped for a moment at the Faubourg Saint-Germain, in 
which I have rented a h6tel at two thousand crowns, and I 
hope to have the contract signed to-day." 

I was hardly dressed before he had me downstairs. ^' Let 
us begin," he continued, " by purchasing a carriage, and pro- 
viding whatever is needed for its equipment*' And in foct, 
we not only bought the carriage, but a hundred thousand 
francs' worth of goods in less than an hour. All this was 
done promptly, because my gentleman never haggled, never 
counted, and paid no money. Reflecting upon this, I exam- 
ined the man and discovered in him a singular intermixture 
of wealth and poverty, so that I really did not know what to 
believe. At last I broke silence, and, taking him aside, I said: 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



79 

** Monneur, who is to pay for all this?" —" I am,** he re- 
plied " Come to my room ; I will show you immense treas- 
ures, riches envied by the greatest monarchs; but they will 
not be envied by you, for I intend to share them with you.*' 
I^loIIowed him. We climbed up five stories, and theu; by 
means of a ladder^ managed to creep into a sixth : it con- 
tained a closety open to all the winds of heaven; all its 
furniture consisted of two or three dozen earthenware basins 
filled with different liquors. " I got up very early/' said he, 
** and my first act was, as it has been for the last twenty-five 
years, to visit my work. I saw that the great day had come, 
the day that was to make me the richest man in the whole 
world. Do you notice that ruddy liquid? It has now all the 
qualities required by philosophers for the transmutation ot 
metals. It has enabled me to obtain the grains you see 
there ; they are of pure gold, although a little deficient in 
weight. The secret which Nicholas flamel discovered and 
Raimond Sully, with a thousand others, searched for in vain, 
is now mine, and I find myself the fortunate possessor of the 
great mystery. God grant that the use I make of the treas- 
ures He has entrusted me with may redound to his glory 1 " 

Transported with anger, I took my departure, or rathet 
hurried downstairs, and left this wealthy person in his gaxret 
Farewell, my dear Usbek, I wiU call upon you to-morrow, and, 
if you wish, we shall return together to Paris. 

Paeis, the last day oI the moon of Rhegeb, 1713. 



Digitized by VjOOQIC 





LETTEj 

USBEK T< 

At Venice. 

I MEET with people here who are constantly disputing 
about religion, and, at the same time, apparently contending 
as to who shall observe it least 

While these persons cannot be described as better Chri» 
tians than others, they have no title to be called better citizens 
either. This latter defect has impressed me strongly; for, 
whatever a man's religion may be, the observance of the laws, 
love of mankind, and respect and afi'ection for one's parents 
must be essential elements in it 

In fact, ought not the chief object of every religious man 
to be to please the Divine Power that has established the 
religion he professes? But the surest meth o d of nu nfl Cfding . 

in this respect is undnnhtprjly tn rnmplyonfK frh^ layg ni 

society and fulfil our duties towards humanity. For if we 
are persuaded of the truth of the religion in which we live, 
we must be equally persuaded that God loves men, since He 
has established a religion for the purpose of rendering them 
happy. Now if He loves men, we are sure of pleasing Him, 
if we love them also ; and this love of ours will consist in the 
practice of all the duties of charity and humanity towards 
them, and in our avoidance of every breach of the law under 
which they live. 

We are &r likelier to please God in this way than by the 
observance of any particular ceremony; for ceremonies in 
themselves have no inherent goodness; they are only rel- 
athrely good, and depend for their value on the supposition 
that God has ordained them. This is a subject that must 
give rise to endless discussion and to much self-deception as 
wen ; for the ceremonies of one religion must be selected 
fix>m amongst those of two thousand. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



8l 

There was once a man who prayed every day to God in 
this fiashion : ** Lord, I do not understand the endless dis- 
putes that are carried on with regard to Thy nature. I would 
serve Thee according to Thy will ; but every man I consult 
would have me serve Thee according to his. When I wish 
to say my prayers, I neither know in what language I should 
address Thee nor what posture I should assume. One tells 
me I must pray standing ; another declares I must be seated, 
and a third requires me to fall on my knees. Nay, there axe 
some who assert that I must wash every morning in cold 
water, while others affirm that Thou wilt regard me with 
horror, if I do not cut away a small portion of my flesh. I 
chanced to be eating a hare the other day in a caravansary : 
three men who were near by, caused me the utmost alarm ; 
they all maintained that I had grievously offended : one,^ 
because the animal was unclean ; another,* because it had 
been strangled; a third,* because it was not a fish. A 
Brahmin, who was passing, and whom I requested to decide 
the matter, said : ' They are all wrong ; for you did not, 
apparently, kill this animal yourself.* — 'Yes, I killed it,' I 
answered. — 'Ahl you have committed an abominable 
deed, and one which God will never pardon,' said he to me, 
in a severe tone. * How do you know but that the soul of 
your father has passed into that animal?' 

" All these things, O Lord, perplex me to a degree that is 
hardly conceivable. I cannot move my head without some 
one proclaiming in threatening tones that I have sinned 
against Thee ; and yet, I would wish to please Thee and de- 
vote the life Thou hast given me to that end. I do not 
know but I may be mistaken ; still, I believe the best means 
to attain this object is to live as a good citizen in the society 
in which Thou hast decreed I should be bom, and as a good 
fiither in the family Thou hast given me." 

Paris, the 8th of the moon of Chahban, 17 13. 

1 A Jew. ' A Turk. * An Armenian. 

6 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



82 



LETTER XLVIL 

ZACHI TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

I HAVE aa important communication to make to yon: I 
have become reconciled to Zephis, and the seraglio, ubA 
now divided by our quarrel^ is again united Peace again 
reigns amongst us, and nothing is wanting to our content- 
ment but your presence. Return, my dear Usbek, return, 
and let love be once more triumphant in this abode. 

I gave a magnificent banquet in honor of Zephis, to which 
your mother, your 'wives, and your principal concubines 
were invited ; your aunts and several of your female cousins 
were present also ; they came on horseback, enveloped in 
the thick clouds of their veils and garments. 

We set out for the country on the following day, where we 
hoped to have more fireedom. We mounted our camels, 
four of us being in each palanquin. As we had made no 
previous preparation for the party, we had not time to have 
the courouc proclaimed ; but our ever vigilant first eunuch 
took another precaution : to the cloth that concealed us, he 
added a thick curtain, and so it was absolutely impossible 
for any one to see us. 

When we reached that river which it is necessary to cross, 
we entered a box, according to the usual custom, which 
was carried over in the boat ; for we were told that the river 
was crowded with people. An inquisitive fellow, who came 
too near our retreat, was cut down and forever deprived of 
the light of day ; the same fate awaited another found bath* 
ing naked on the bank ; these two unfortunates were sacri- 
ficed by your faithful eunuchs to your honor and to ours. 

But listen to the rest of our adventures. When we were 
in the middle of the river, there arose such a fierce wind, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



83 

and cloads so terrific covered the sky» that our sailors began 
to despair. Frightened by this peril, we almost all tinted 
away. I remember hearing the voices of the eunuchs raised 
in dispute ; some declared we should be warned of our dan- 
ger ; but their chief asserted positively that^ rather than his 
master should be thus dishonored, he preferred death, and 
that he would plunge a dagger into the heart of the next 
who should dare to utter such an audacious proposal. One 
of my slaves, who was quite beside herself, ran to me un- 
dressed with offers of assistance ; but a black eunuch seized 
her roughly and flung her back where she came firom. Then 
I became unconscious, and returned to life only when all 
the alarm was over. 

Whatastate of perplexity such journeys createforuswomen I 
Men are exposed only to those perils that threaten their lives, 
but we are every moment in danger of losing our lives or our 
yirtue. Adieu, dear Usbek. I shall always adore you. 

The Seraglio at Fatme, the 2d of the moon of RhamazaOy 1713. 

LETTER XLVIIL 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Vknicb. 

Those who are devoted to the task of self-culture are never 
idle ; although not engaged on any business of importance, 1 
yet am I constandy occupied. I spend.jny time in observ- 
ing ; what I have noticed, seen, or heard during the day, I 
write down at night ; e verything is to me a so urce of inte rn 
est a nd astonishmen t : I am like a cHild, whose organs, still 
susceptible, easily receive the impress of the most trifling 
objects. You would, perhaps, scarcely believe it, but we are 
well received in all circles and among all classes ; I think 
this is largely due to the fact that the quick wit and natural 
gayety of Rica make society as fond of him as he is of sod- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



84 

ttf* Our foreign appearance no longer offends anybodjr; 
in fact, we rather enjoy the surprise exhibited on the dis* 
ooveiy that we are not destitute of refinement, — for the 
French have an idea that our climate does not produce real 
men. It must, however, be confessed that they are well 
worth the trouble of being undeceived 

I spent a few days in a country mansion near Paris, in 
the society of a man of some distinction who is very fond of 
having company at his place. He has a charming wife, 
whose modesty is enhanced by a vivacity quite foreign to the 
retired life of our Persian ladies. 

Being a foreigner, I had nothing better to do than study, 
according to my usual custom, the crowd of people who 
were constandy arriving, and who successively afforded new 
types of character for my notice. I was much pleased with 
die unassuming deportment of the first person I remarked. 
We were mutually attracted, so that we found ourselves 
always together. 

One day when we happened to be conversing apart in a 
large company, and paying no attention to what was going 
on around us, I said to him : " At the risk pf being thought 
more inquisitive than polite, I must request your permission 
to ask a few questions ; for my ignorance of everything is to 
me a terrible annoyance, and to live with people I cannot 
understand is a source of vexation. My mind has been 
much exercised during the last two days ; pot a single one 
of the men before us but has placed me on the rack more 
than two hundred times, and yet it would take me more than 
a thousand years to comprehend them ; they are to me more 
invisible than the wives of our great monarch.'' — **You 
need only speak," he answered, "and I will give you all the 
information you desire. I shall have the less hesitation in 
doing so that I believe you a man of discretion, who will not 
abuse my confidence." — " Who is that man," said I, ^ who 
has described to us at such length the splendid banquets he 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



85 

has given to the great ; who is so famfliar with your dukesi 
and converses on easy terms with your ministers, — though 
the latter^ I am told, are not at all easy of access? He 
must be a personage of high rank ; and yet he is so mean-* 
looking that he certainly does no credit to the rank to which 
he belongs ; besides, I have found him very uncultivated. 
Although I am a foreigner, I am inclined to believe that 
there is a certain refinement common to all nations ; but 
I have been unable to discover any of it in this case. Can 
it be that men of rank are more ill-bred than others?" — 
** That man," he replied with a smile, *'is a farmer-general. 
He is as much superior to the present company in wealth 
as he is beneath it in birth. He might have the best soci- 
ety in Paris at his dinners, if he consented to be absent from 
them himselfl He is a very offensive person, as you see, 
but then he has an excellent cook ; nor is he ungrateful to 
this functionary, for you heard him praise him just now." 

** And that big man in black," I continued, ^ whom yon- 
der lady has placed near her, how is it his costume is so 
lugubrious, while his demeanor is so airy and his complexion 
so florid? He has a gracious smile for all who address him. 
His garb is more modest, but more carefully arranged than 
that of your wives." — " He is," was the reply, " a preacher, 
and, what is still worse, a confessor. Such as you see him, 
he knows more about the aflairs of men's wives than their 
husbands; he is acquainted with the weaknesses of women; 
they also know his." — " How is it," I inquired, « that he is 
always speaking of something he calls * grace '?" — " No, 
not always," he returned ; •' to a pretty woman he is fonder of 
speaking of the fall therefrom ; he is a hoBj^xgpa^n public, 
but in private mild as a lamb." — *' He seems to be treated 
with much distinction and a great deal of reverence," I 
remarked. — " Treated with distinction ! Why, he is the one 
man necessary ! he gives a zest to a lonely life, is full of 
Ittle counsels, little attentions, and has a regular time for 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



86 

Tinting; he cures a headache better than any one in the 
world ; he is an excellent man." 

'' If I am not becoming too troublesome, would you inform 
me who is the man in front of us ? He is very badly dressed, 
makes grimaces sometimes, and speaks a language different 
from that of the others. He has not wit enough to talk, but 
talks to show that he has." — " That grotesque specimen of 
humanity," he answered, '' is a poet. Such fellows as that say 
that they are born what they are, which is true, — quite as true 
as that they are bom to be almost always the laughing-stock 
of the human race ; so they are not spared ; in fact, they 
are the objects of universal contempt Hunger has brought 
the person you speak of into this house ; he is well received 
by its master and mistress, for their good nature makes them 
courteous to everybody. He wrote an epithalamium on 
their marriage ; it is the best thing he has done during his life^ 
for the marriage turned out as happy as he had predicted. 

" With your Oriental prejudices," he added, " you would 
not, perhaps, believe that Uiere are happy marriages among 
us, and wives who require no guardian but their virtue. The 
people of this house enjoy undisturbed peace ; they are loved 
and esteemed by everybody. I have only one fault to find 
with them, and that is the result of their natural goodness, 
which leads them to admit all sorts of people into their 
house, so that society here is sometimes rather mixed. 
And yet I do not blame them, after all ; we must be content 
to live with people such as they are. With many persons 
good-breeding is only a varnish that hides their vices ; it 
may be said .to resemble poisons, — the more subtle they are, 
the more dangerous they are." 

" And that old man," I whispered, " wlio looks so sullen? 
I took him at first for a foreigner ; for, besides that he is 
dressed so queerly, he censures everything done in France, 
and speaks with disapproval of your government" — *' He is 
an old warrior," he answered, "who tires out every one that 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



87 

listens to him with the interminable story of his exploits. 
He will not allow that France has ever won a battle in which 
he was not present, ox hear of a siege in which he did not 
mount the breach.yme believes himself so necessary an ele- 
ment in our history that he imagines it came to a close when 
he ceased to take part in it. He regards the wounds he has 
received as marking the dissolution of the monarchy, and, 
unlike those philosophers who say the present is alone enjoy- 
able and the past is nothing, he enjoys nothing but the past, 
and exists only in the campaigns in which he was engaged. 
His aspirations are all towards the past, just of those of real 
heroes must be all towards the future." — "But why," I 
inquired, " has he left the service ? " — " He has not left the 
service," my friend answered, " but the service has left him ; 
he has been appointed to a small post, where he will recount 
his exploits for the rest of his days ; but he will never rise 
higher: the road to distinction is closed against him." — 
" And why? " I said. — " We have a maxim in France that 
officers should never be advanced whose patience has been 
worn out as subalterns. We regard such persons as men 
whose intellect has been cramped by detail, and whose very 
familiarity with little things renders them incapable of greayV 
ones. We believe that an officer who has not the qualities 
of a general at thirty will never have them ; that he who 
cannot at a glance embrace all the different possibilities of a 
field of battle and all its different situations over a circuit of 
several leagues, and has not the presence of mind to turn to 
account all the advantages of a victory and minimize all the 
disadvantages of a defeat, will never acquu-e the efficiency 
needed. Such being the case, we employ men of heroic 
genius and courage in positions where their grand and sub- 
lime characteristics have full play ; while for men of inferior 
capacity we have inferior posts. To the latter class belong 
those who have grown old in obscure wars ; at the best of 
times, they are never successful except in what they havt 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



88 

been doing all their lives ; and it would not be wise to give 
them fresh employment at the very time when their powers 
are becoming enfeebled.'' 

A moment after, my curiosity was excited anew, and I , 
said : ** I promise not to ask you another question if you 1 
answer this one* Who is that tall young man who wears his ' 
own hair, and is more remarkable for assurance than wit? I 
How is it that he speaks louder than any one else, and evi- 
dently believes himself so popular a member of socicSty ? "-^ 
^ He is a lady-killer/' he replied* While he was speakings 
some people entered, others rose and left, and, an acquaint* 
ance of my friend having joined him, I had to remain in my 
ignorance. But, by some chance or other, the young man 
was by my side a moment afterward. He entered into con- 
versation at once : *' The weather is fine ; would you mind 
taking a turn in the garden ? " I made him a civil answer, 
and we went out '* I have come into the country," said he, 
" to please the mistress of the house, with whom I am not 
on bad terms by any means. Another lady of my acquaint* 
ance will raise the mischief on account of this visit ; but 
what is one to do ? I am intimate with the prettiest women 
in Paris, but I do not confine myself to one, so they have a 
nice time looking after me ; for, between you and me, I am 
a devil of a fellow." — ''Apparently, monsieur," I observed, 
''you hold some office or employment that prevents you 
from being more assiduous in your attentions." — "No, I 
have no employment except that of driving husbands and 
fathers crazy. I like alarming a woman who thinks she has 
got me, and bringing her within an inch of losing me. I 
belong to a set of young blades who divide up Paris amongst 
them, and have all the city wondering what we 11 do next" 
— "As far as I understand, then," I replied, "you make 
more noise than the most valiant warrior, and are more 
regarded than a grave magistrate. If you were in Persia, 
you would not enjoy all these advantages ; you would be 



Digitized by LjOO^IC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



. 1 
9 r-. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



/'• Digitized by Google 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



89 

thought better adapted to guard our women than to please 
them/* My face reddened with anger ; and I believe, if I 
had continued speaking, I must have affronted the fellow. 

What do you say of a country where such people are 
tolerated, and the followers of such a pursuit are allowed to 
live; where infidelity; treason, rape, perfidy, and injustice 
lead to distinction; where a man is esteemed because he 
tears a daughter from the arms of her father, a wife from her 
husband, and introduces misery into the purest and happiest 
homes? Blessed are the children of Ali, who protect their 
daughters from disgrace and seduction 1 The light of day is 
not more unsullied than the fire that bums in the hearts of 
our wives ; our daughters tremble when they think of the 
day that is to deprive them of that virtue which makes them 
like unto the angels and the spiritual powers. Beloved land 
of my birth, on which the sun sheds his earliest beams, thou 
art not stained with the honible crimes which compel that 
luminary to hide his rays as he approaches the gloomy 
West I 

Paus, the 5th of tbe moon of Rhamamn, 1713. 



LETTER XLIX. 

RICA TO USBEK 
At — — . 

Thb other day came a dervish into my room, dressed in 
extraordinary frishion : his beard descended to his waist ; he 
was bare-footed ; his dress was of gray, coarse and peaked in 
certain places. His entire figure appeared to me so queer 
that I had an idea of sending for a painter to get him to 
make a sketch of it* He began by pa3ring me an elaborate 
compliment, and informing me that he was a man of merits 
and a Capuchin as welL ** I have been told, monsieur/' he 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



90 

added, ^ that you axe about to return to the court of Persia, 
in which you hold a distinguished rank. I have come to 
ask your protection, and to beg you to obtain from your 
king a little establishment near Casbin for two or three of 
our monks." — ''You are thinking then, ^Either, of going to 
Persia?" I answered "I, monsieur!" he exclaimed, "I 
shall take very good care I don't I am Provincial here, 
and I would not barter my position for all the Capuchins 
in the world." — ** And what the devil do you mean by mak- 
ing such a request then? " — " Because," he replied, "if we 
had such a monastery, our Italian fathers would send two or 
three monks thither." — "Apparently you are acquainted 
with these monks ? " — " No, monsieur, I do not know them." 
— " You don't know them 1 Then what the mischief does it 
matter to you whether they go to Persia or not? A nice 
project this, of sending a pair of Capuchins to breathe the 
air of Casbin ! so useful to Europe and Asia, eh? Quite a 
scheme to excite the interest of monarchs ! This is what 
you call planting your fine colonies, is it? Get out! You 
and your sort are not made for transportation, and you would 
do well to continue to creep along in the places where you 
have been engendered." 

Paris, the 15th of the moon of Rhamann, 17 13. 



LETTER L. 

RICA TO . 

1 HAVE known people to whom virtue was so natural that 
they were not aware of its presence : they fulfilled their 
duties spontaneously, and were induced to do so as it were 
from instinct Very far from ever speaking of their incom- 
parable qualities, it would seem as if the conception of them 
had never entered their minds. These are the sort of peo- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



91 

pie I love, and not those virtuous men who always seem to 
be in a state of astonishment at their own virtue, and regard 
a good action as a marvel, the recital of which ought to 
create wonder. 

If modesty is a virtue, necessary even in those on whom 
Heaven has bestowed rare talents, what are we to say of 
those insects that dare to display a pride which would dis- 
honor the greatest men? 

I see persons on every side who speak incessantly of 
themselves : their conversation is a mirror that always reflects 
their own impertinent features; they will tell you of the 
most insignificant trifles that happen to them, apparently 
under the impression that the interest they take in them wiU 
increase their own importance in your eyes ; they have done 
everything, seen everything, said everything, and thought 
everything ; they are a model for human kind, a subject of 
inexhaustible comparison, a source of precedents that never 
runs dry. Oh I how tasteless are eulogies that reflect the 
source from which they come I 

A few dayd ago, a man of this class overwhelmed us for 
two long hours with details about himself, his merit and his 
abilities ; but as there is no such thing as perpetual motion 
in the world, he had to stop speaking. We had a chance 
then to engage in the conversation, and you may be sure we 
seized it 

A man who appeared to be In rather an ill-temper, began 
by complaining of the boredom of conversations in generaL 
'' What ! are fools the only persons who dwell on their own 
characters and make everything centre about themselves?'* 
— " You are right," answered our chatterer, bluntly : " no one 
acts as I do ; I never praise myself; I am wealthy, well' 
bom, generous with my money, and my friends say that my 
intellect is of a rather superior quality ; but yet you never hear 
me speaking of all this : I value my modesty more highly 
than any good qualities I may happen to possess." 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



92 

No wonder this audacious braggart amazed me, and, while 
he was talking aloud, I was whispering to myself: ^ Happy 
the man who has vanity enough to keep him from praising 
himself^ who fears the ridicule of those who listen to him, 
and never nettles the pride of others by displaying his 



Parish the loth of the moon of Rhamaxan, 171 j. 



LETTER LI. 

NARGUM, PERSIAN ENVOY IN MUSCOVY, 
To UsBBK AT Paris. 

I HAVE been informed in letters from Ispahan that you had 
kft Persia and were actually in Paris. How is it that I learn 
such news from others and not from yourself? 

The orders of the King of Kings have kept me for five 
years in this country, where I have terminated several im- 
portant negotiations. 

You know that the czar is the only Christian prince whose 
mterests are connected with ours, because he is, like us, an 
enemy of the Turks. 

His empire is more extensive than ours, for it is reckoned 
that the distance between Moscow and the last of his posses- 
sions in the Chinese frontiers is two thousand leagues. 

He is the absolute master of the property and lives of his 
subjects, who are all slaves, with the exception of four fami- 
lies. The lieutenant of the prophets, the King of Kings, 
whose footstool is the heavens, does not exercise a more 
formidable sway. 

Any one acquainted with the horrible climate of Moscovy 
would never imagine that to be exiled from it was a very 
severe penalty; still, whenever a great man is disgraced, he 
is banished to Siberia. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



93 

Just as the law of our prophet forbids us to drink wine, ao 
the law of their prince forbids the Muscovites. 

Their way of receiving their guests is not at all Persian* 
As soon as a stranger enters a house, the husband presents 
his wife to him ; the stranger is expected to kiss her as a 
mark of courtesy to the husband. 

Although fathers usually stipulate in the marriage-contract 
that the husband shall not whip their daughters^ yet you 
have no idea how fond the Muscovite women are of being 
beaten. They think they have lost the affection of their 
husband if he does not now and then give them a sound 
whipping; any other conduct would argue unpardonable 
indifference on his part The following is a letter a woman 
wrote lately to her mother : — 

** My dear Mother : — I am the most unfortunate woman in 
the world. I do everything I can to win the love of my hus- 
band, but without success. On yesterday, although I had a 
thousand things to attend to in the house, I went outside and 
stayed away all day. I was sure he would give me a good 
tlirashing on my return, but he never said a word. My sister 
is treated in quite a different manner: the life is nearly cudgelled 
out of her every day; if she looks at a man, her husband 
knocks her down on the spot; that tells you how fond they are 
of each other, and in what harmony they live. 

**So, naturally, she is as proud as a peacock; but she shall 
not look down upon me much longer ; I am determined to make 
my husband love me, no matter what the consequences. I *11 
make him that mad that he'll have to show me some token of 
affection, whether he likes it or not. No one shall say that I 
am never beaten, and live in my own house without any one 
ever minding me. I will scream out in such a way, if he gives 
me the least little tap, that everybody will be sure things are as 
they ought to be, and if the neighbors come to my aid I will 
strangle them. I want you, my dear mother, to tell my husband 
how scandalously he is behaving to me. My father, who is a 
gentleman, never behaved so ; in fact, I remember thinking, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



94 

when I was a girl, that he loved you just a Utde too mvcli. I 
embrace you, my dear mother/* 

The Muscovite are not allowed to leave their country, 
even to traveL Being thus separated from other nations 
by die laws of their own, they are the more firmly attached 
to all their ancient customs, because they do not see how 
they can have any others. 

But their present ruler has wished to change all this ; he 
has had a lively quarrel with them on the subject of their 
beards; the monks and clergy, with whom he has also a 
dispute, have stood up for their ignorance valiantly. 

He makes every effort to spread the arts among his sub- 
jects, and is trying to extend the &me of his people through- 
out Europe and Asia, — a people until now almost unknown 
to the world, and only conscious of its own existence. 

Restless and excited, he wanders through his vast domin- 
ions, leaving everywhere the impress of his natural severity. 

Then he abandons them, as if they were too small to 
contain him, and goes rambling through Europe in search 
of other provinces and kingdoms. 

I embrace you, my dear Usbek, and beg you to send me 
news of yourself. 

Moscow, the 2d of the moon of Chalval, 171^ 



\ 

\ 


LETFER IJL 


\ 
\ 


RICA TO US^EK 


\, 


At . 



I WAS much amused in a company I was in the other day. 
There were women of all ages present : one of eighty, one 
of sixty, and one of forty, who had a niece somewhere 
about twenty or twenty-two. Instinct brought me to the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



95 

tide of the latter, who whispered in my ear : ** What do 
you say to my aunt, who wishes to have lovers and play 
the beauty at her age?" — "She is wrong," I answered; 
*' such an idea is natural only in you." A moment after, 
I found myself near the aunt, who said to me : " What do 
you say to that woman who is at least sixty, and spends 
hours at her toilet? " — " It is time lost," I answered ; " such 
a waste of the precious hours would only be excusable in 
a lady who possesses your charms." I approached the un- 
fortunate dame of sixty, and was pitying her from my soul, 
when she whispered to me: "Did you ever see anything 
so ridiculous? Just imagine a woman of eighty wearing 
flame-colored ribbons 1 She is trying to pass for a young 
person, and she is passably successful, for that is indicative 
of second childhood" 

" Good Heavens ! " I said to myself, " must we always have 
such keen perceptions of the follies of others and never of 
our own? Perhaps/' I thought afterwards, "there is a kind 
of happiness in deriving consolation from the weaknesses of 
our neighbor." However, I felt inclined for amusement, 
and I said, still to myself: " We have climbed high enough ; 
let us now get down, first beginning, however, with the 
old lady on top." I turned and addressed her : " Madame, 
you bear such a strong resemblance to the lady I have just 
been speaking to, that I fancy you must be sisters, and about 
the same age." — " Indeed, monsieur, you are very near the 
truth. When one of us dies, the other will have good cause 
for alarm, for I don't suppose there are two days' difference 
between our ages." Leaving this decrepit creature, I went 
to our woman of sixty : " Madame," I said, " you will have 
the goodness to decide a bet I have made ; I have wagered 
that that lady (pointing to the dame of forty) and you were 
of the same age." — " Well, I give you my word, I don't 
believe there are six days between us." Good, so far ; let 
OS get on. I descended the ladder another step, and re* 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



tamed to the woman of forty. '' Aieyoa really serious, my 
dear madamei" I asked, ** in calling that young lady at the 
next table your niece? You look as young as she does. 
There is a certain £suied expression on her fiure which is 
absent from yours, and then the brilliancy of your complex- 
ion — " "Listen," she replied, ''I am her aunt, but her 
mother was twenty-five years older than I. My deceased 
sister and I had not the same ^Either, and I have heard her 
say that her daughter was bom the same year I was.'' 

^'Just what I told my friend; you see my surprise was 
natural, madame, when he asserted the contrary." 

My dear Usbek, women who feel the time approaching 
when they must bid farewell to their charms, have a natural 
longing to push back their years. And is it any wonder 
they try to deceive others, since they use such eflforts to 
deceive themselves, and rid their minds of the most painfid 
of all ideas? 

PAEiib the jd of the moon of Chalval, 171^ 



LETTER LIIL 

ZELIS TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

Never has a passion been more violent and impetuous than 
that of the eunuch Cosrou for my slave Zelida. He asks 
her in marriage with such ardor that I cannot refuse him. 
And why should I object when her mother does not, and 
even Zelida herself appears to be satisfied with this delu- 
rive connection, and with the empty shadow of reality that 
is oflfered her? 

What can she do with this poor wretch who will have 
nothmg belonging to a husband except jealousy; whose 
coldness will abandon him only to leave an impotent de* 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



97 

tfpair in its place ; who, by recalling the memory of what he 
has been, will always bring to her mind the sense of what 
he is no longer ; who, ever ready to possess, but never pos- 
sessing, wiU delude himself and delude her unceasingly, and 
wiU every moment be making her have practical experience 
of all the wretchedness of her condition? 

What I to be always the prey of semblances and decep- 
tions ; to live only in imagination ; to find oneself always 
on the brink of pleasure, but never in it ; to languish in the 
arms of an unfortunate, and respond to his regrets instead 
of to his sighs? 

What contempt we should feel for a man of that species, 
made solely to guard and not to possess. I seek love, and 
I do not see it 

I speak to you freely, because you prefer my artless^ 
frank ways and my fondness for pleasure to the affected 
modesty of my companions. 

I have heard you say a thousand times that eunuchs do 
have a certain voluptuous enjoyment with women that is 
unknown to us ; that Nature makes up to them for their 
k>ss; that she has resources which supply the defect in 
their condition ; that it is quite possible to lose manhood, 
and yet have desire ; and that, when a human being is in 
this state, he acquires as it were a third sense, and exchanges 
one kind of pleasure for another. 

If I could think so, I should feel less pity for ZeUda ; there 
b a certain amount of compensation in living with people 
who are not so unfortunate as you thought them. 

Give me your orders on this matter, and let me know 
whether you wish the marriage to take place in the seraglia 
Adieu. 

The Senffio at Itpihaii, the 5th of the moon of Chalval, 171^ 

7 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



98 



LETTER LIV. 

RICA TO USBEK 

At . 

I WAS this morning in my room^ which, as yon know, is 
separated from the others by only a thin partition, pierced in 
several places, so that you can hear all that goes on in the 
neighboring chamber. Thus, I heard a man, who was strid- 
ing up and down the floor, saying to another : " I don't 
know how it is, but everything seems to turn against me. 
For the last three days I have never said a single thing that 
could reflect any particular credit upon me, and I have found 
myself lost in a crowd of talkers, not one of whom paid the 
slightest attention to me or addressed a single word to me. 
I had prepared some brilliant sallies to enliven my discourse ; 
they never gave me an opportunity of firing them off, I had 
a charming little story to tell ; whenever I turned the con- 
versation into a channel that would render it appropriate, 
they got away from it, evidently on set purpose. Some 
first-rate witticisms have been growing stale in my head f<Mr 
the last four days, and no chance of making use of them. If 
this sort of thing continues, it will surely drive me crazy. I 
must have been bom under an unlucky star; there is no 
other way of accounting for it Yesterday, I had a chance 
to shine in the company of three or four old women, and 
certainly they gave me a clear field. It took me more than 
a quarter of an hour to lead up to what I wanted to say ; but 
even they failed to follow me, and, like the fatal sisters, cut 
the thread of my discourse. I tell you it is no easy thing to 
keep up a reputation for wit. By the way, my friend, how 
did you manage to attain it ? " 

"I have an idea on the subject," replied the other. 
'^ What if we were to work in concert, and form a partnership 



/ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



99 

for the production of good things? We shall each agree 
every day upon what we are to speak about, and we shall be 
so mutually helpful that, should any one attempt to interrupt 
us in the midst of our conversation, we shall shut him off, 
and, if he persists, we shall use violence. We shall arrange 
the several places at which one of us must express approval, 
or laugh quietly or break into a roar. With such a system, we 
are sure to give the tone to every conversation, and gain quite a 
reputation for the sprightliness of our wit and the success of 
our repartees ; we can also settle on a system of head-shakes 
that will be of great advantage. You will shine one day, and 
on the next you will simply second my efforts. We shall 
enter a house together, and I shall ciy out, at the same time 
pointing to you : ' I must tell you of a capital retort made 
by this gendeman to a man we met in the street.' Then, 
turning to you, I shall remark: *He never expected such a 
pointed answer, he must have been neatly surprised.' I shall 
repeat one of my poems, and you will say : 'I was present 
when he made it ; it was at a supper, and he turned it off in 
a jifiy.' Sometimes we shall rally each other, and people 
will exclaim : ' Don't they hit each other cleverly I What a 
thrust ! and how well parried ! is n't it fine ! Faith, they 
don't spare each other! I wonder how he'll meet that 
stroke ! But he has met it ! and with what skill ! Why, it 's 
a regular batde ! ' No need to tell them that we practised 
the whole thing the night before. We must buy certain jest- 
books intended for those who have no wit, but would like 
people to think they have : everjrthing depends on having 
the proper models to go by. Before six months, we ought 
to be in a condition to maintain a conversation for a full 
hour entirely made up of bans-mots. But we must mind one 
thing especially : that is, not to let them drop out of sight 
after they are uttered. It is not enough to produce a good 
thing ; it should be spread and scattered in every direction. 
Except we do this, all is lost. Nothing is so heart-breaking 




lOO 

as to see some first-class joke die in the ears of the fool who 
has heard it Of course, for this calamity there is some com- 
pensation in the fact that the foolish things we say ourselves 
are also quickly forgotten ; it is the only consolation we have 
for our misfortune in the other case. And now, my dear 
fiiendt you see the course that is before us. Adopt my plan, 
and I promise you a place in the Academy before six months. 
Nor will your labor be very much protracted ; you can then 
abandon your art, and yet always be esteemed a man of wit, 
whatever you do. You know that when a man in France 
enters any society, he is at once supported by what is called 
fht esprii des corps : such will be your fate, and all I am afraid 
of is that you may be ruined by all the applause you will 
receive." 
PauSi the 6th of the moon of Zilcade, 1714. 

LETTER LV. 

RICA TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

Among Europeans, the first quarter of an hour after marriage 
smoothes all difficulties. The last favon^ are always contem- 
porary with the nuptial benediction ; the women here are not 
like the women of Persia, who dispute the ground for several 
months; t hey surrender on the spot ; and, if they lose no th- 
i ng, it is because they have nothing to bs e. But, O shame- 
^i thing ! the moment of their defeat is always known, and 
without consulting the stars, it is always possible to predict 
the exact hour of their children's birth. 

The French never speak of their wives ; the reas9n is, they 
are afiaid to speak about them before persons who are better 
acquainted with them than they are themselves. 

There are amongst them certain very unfortunate individ* 
«ib whom nobody thinks of consoling: these are the jealous 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



lOI 



husbands, — persons whom every one hates; they are the 
jealous husbands, — persons whom all men scorn ; they are, 
once more, the jealous husbands. 

number of jealous husbands is so small as in France. Their 
tranquillit y ut 1101 Uutd un Hit mufiileute lli e y Imve in their 
wives ; it is, on the contrary, based on the ill opinion they 
have of them. All the wise precautions of the Asiatics, — the 
veils wherewith they are covered, the prisons in which they 
are confined; the eunuchs who watch over them, — appear to 
them means better calculated to exercise than to weary the 
astuteness of the sex. Here husbands accept their appointed 
destiny with a good grace, and regard the infidelities of 
their wives as mishaps decreed by the higher powers. A 
husband who wished to posses s his wife to the exclusion^ 

gvftryjyvly ^1«m> wnnlfl ^ rnnai dered'a dlgW '^^>^»- 7* f^^ pnfiin 

^flrpir'^°i ^ "1fli""^ "i ^^Q desired to deprive others of th e 
ijgl^f /vf »iiA c«n f^3^ \i^ "l^p;^^ ''"j<^Y it «^^"^ 

Here, if a husband loves his wife, it is a proof that 
he has not sufficient merit to win the love of another 
woman; who abuses the power given him by the law to 
supply those pleasures he cannot otherwise obtain; who 
avails himself of all his advantages to the prejudice of 
society at large ; who appropriates to his own use what has 
been only given him as a pledge, and who does everything 
in his power to upset a tacit convention essential to the 
happiness of both sexes. The re putation of having a hand- 
s ome wife, which is «^ rjiyi^ti niv conceaieQ m Asia, is born e 
h ^ without any anxiety; there is always the satisfaction 
o f bein g abl e to maice an attactc m s6rfg other quarter . 

A^ Prpgg consoles flHir°^'* T^^ ^^^ ^^''« ^^ ^"^ lArH-Ace Ky 

the^cqpturp of an^ther^ When the Turks took Bagdad from 
us, did not we in turn take Candaher from the Mogul? 

As a rule, the man who bears patiently the infidelities 
of his wife is not regarded with disapproval ; on the con- 



Digitized by 



Google 



102 

trary^ he b praised for his prudence ; only in certain pecih 
liar cases is he felt to have incurred any reproach. 

It is not that there are no virtuous women; there are, 
and they are persons of much distinction also ; my friendly 
guide always pointed them out to me ; but they were all so 
ugly that one would have to be a saint not to hate virtue. 

After all I have told you about the morals of this country, 
you can easily imagine the French do not pride themselves 
on their constancy : thev believe that it is as ridiculo us 
to swear eternal devoting \W n wnmiHi nri h i i t ii iiii iH i l l it 
i;;^aith anH haypjp^cc ^rf> gpi^jj fr, iac» o^y^y^ When they 
promise a woman that they will always love her, they do 
so with the proviso that she must be always lovable ; and, 
if she breaks her word, they do not think they are bound to 
keep theirs. 

Paris, the 7th of the moon of Zilcade, 1714. 



LETTER LVI. 
USBEK TO IBBEN 

At SlfYRNA. 

Gambling is very common in Europe ; in fact, it is a pro* 
fession which places those who cultivate it on a level with 
men of birth, property, and honor. They are accepted as 
gentlemen without any inquiry, although every one knows 
that, in most cases, such an assumption is altogether a 
mistaken one ; but there are some people whose opinions 
it is useless trying to correct 

But the women are the most inveterate gamblers of all. 
It is true that m their youth the attractions of a more 
enthralling passion to a great extent monopolize their atten- 
tion ; but the older they grow, the more youthful and ardent 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



103 

does their devotion to play become, and when all other 
passions have left them, this one fills the void. 

They wish to ruin their husbands, and, in order to 
achieve success^^ they adopt means suitable to all ages, from 
callow youth to decrepit age. Dress and luxurious display 
begin the disorder which gallantry increases and gambling 
completes. 

I have often seen nine or ten women, or rather nine or 
ten centuries, ranged around a table ; I have seen them in 
their hopes and in their fears, in their joys, and, above all, 
in their rages. You would have said that never again could 
they have a peaceful moment, and that life and despair 
would both leave them together; you would have doubted 
whether those they paid were their creditors or their 
legatees. 

It would seem as if our holy prophet made it his special 
object to deprive us of whatever is calculated to disturb the 
' reason : he has interdicted^the use of wine, which overturns 
it; he has forbidden games of chance ; and, as it was impos- 
sible to remove the most imperious passion of all, he has 
brought it under control. Amongst us love produces 
neither disturbance nor madness ; it is a languishing passion 
which never troubles the calmness of the soul ; the plurality 
of wives saves us from the domination of woman, and mod- 
erates the violence of our desires. 

Paris, the loth of the moon of Zilhage, 1714. 



LETTER LVIL 

, USBEK TO RHEDI 

At Venice. 

The libertines in this place support an infinite number of 
courtesans, and the devotees an immense crowd of dervishes. 



Digitized by VjOOQIC 



104 

These dervishes take three vows : of obediencei poverty, and 
chastity. The first is said to be the one most feithAiUf ob- 
served ; as to the second, I am pretty positive that it is not 
observed by any means ; and, as to the third, you can judge 
Icxr yourself. 

But, however rich these dervishes may be, they never 
renounce the titular attribute of poverty ; our glorious sultan 
would as soon think of renouncing his sublime and magnifi- 
cent titles. They are right ; for this attribute of poverty pre* 
vents them firom ever being poor. 

The physicians and some of diese dervishes, who are called 
confessors, are here always too much esteemed or too much 
despised ; still, it is said that heirs rather prefer the physicians 
to the confessors. 

I went the other day to one of the convents of these der- 
vishes. One of them, a man venerable for his white hair, 
received me very courteously, and, after conducting me 
through the house, led me into the garden, where we entered ' 
into conversation. '' Father," I asked him, " what post do 
jrou fill in this community?" — "Monsieiu:," he replied, 
looking well pleased at my question, "lam a casuist." — 
"Casuist?" I repeated; **as long as I have been in France, 
I have never heard of such an office as that." — " What ! 
you do not know what a casuist is? Well, listen, and-I will 
give you an explanation that will fully satisfy you. ( There 
are two kinds of sins, mortal and venial ; mortal sins exclude 
us fix>m Paradise absolutely ; venial sins are, indeed, offensive 
to God, but not to such a degree as to deprive us of eternal 
happiness. Now, all our art consists in distinguishing be- 
tween these two sorts of sins ; for, if you leave out some free- 
thinkers, all Christians wish to gain Paradise, but there is 
no one who does not wish to gain it as cheaply as possible. 
When we know what sins are mortal, we try not to commit 
them, and the matter is settled. Many men do not aspire 
after great perfection, and as they are not ambitious thej 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



105 

are not anxious to occupy the best seats; consequently^ 
they would enter Paradise on as easy terms as possible ; all 
they care for is to get there^ and they do not want to do either 
more or less than is necessary for that purpose. There are 
people who would take Heaven by storm rather than not 
obtain it, and who say to God : ' Lord, I have fulfilled all the 
conditions ; you cannot help keeping your promises ; as I 
have not done more than you have asked, I excuse you from 
granting me more than you have promised.' 

" We are, therefore, indispensable, monsieur. I will also 
enlighten you on another important matter : the deed does 
not constitute the crime, but rather the knowledge of him 
- who commits it. The man who does what is wrong, as long 
as he believes it is not wrong, has a safe conscience ; and, 
as an infinite number of acts are doubtful, a casuist can give 
them a certain degree of goodness, by distinguishing their 
qualities ; and if he can persuade people that they have no 
malice, they cease to be sinful, as far as the persons commit- 
ting them are concerned. 

" I have now explained to you the mystery of the craft in 
which I liave grown old, in all its refinements ; it is possible 
to give a twist to everything, even to those things that appear 
to be least susceptible of it" 

" All this, father," I answered, " is very fine ; but how do 
you manage to settle these matters with Heaven? If the 
Great Sophy had at his court a man like you, who would 
treat him as you treat God, and say which of his orders 
might be observed and which not, and who would teach his 
subjects in what cases they might obey them and in what 
cases they might violate them, he would have him impaled 
on the spot" Thereupon, I saluted my dervish, and turned 
on my heel, without waiting for an answer. 

Paris, the 23d of the moon of Maharram, 1714. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



io6 



LETTER LVIIL 

RICA TO RH^DI 
At Venice. 

There are many trades, my dear Rhedl, in Paris. Now an 
obliging individual approaches you and oflfers, for a mere 
trifle, to let you into the secret of making gold. Another 
promises that he will enable you to sleep with the spirits 
of the air, provided that you only keep thirty years without 
seemg a woman. 

And, then, you will meet with' soothsayers who will tell you 
everything that occurred during your life, provided they have 
Just a quarter of an hour's conversation with your servants. 

There are skilful women who turn virginity into a flower 
that withers and is revived every day, and is gathered for 
the hundredth time more painfully than at first. 

There are others who repair, by the excellence of their art, 
all the ravages of time, can restore to a &ce a beauty that is 
passing away, and can make a woman descend from the 
summit of old age to the freshness of youth. 

All these people live, or try to live, in a dty which is the 
mother of invention. 

The incomes of the citizens cannot be farmed : they consist 
of stratagem and trickery ; each has his own, and does as 
well with it as he can. 

It would be as easy to number the sands of the sea or the 
slaves of our monarch as to reckon up the lawyers who live 
upon the revenues of some mosque or other. 

A countless multitude of professors of languages, arts, and 
sciences teach what they do not know ; and their talent is not 
to be despised : for it requires much less wit to tell what a 
person knows than to teach what he is ignorant of. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I07 

It is impossible to die here^ except suddenly ; death has no 
dther way of exercising his authority, because in every 
comer there are people who have infallible remedies for all 
imaginable diseases. 

AU the shops are provided with invisible nets in which the 
customers are caught ; sometimes, however, a person manages 
to escape from them cheaply. A young saleswoman will 
coax a man a whole hour in order to get him to buy a pack- 
age of toothpicks. 

You will hardly find any one who does not leave this city a 
wiser man than when he entered it. By dint of lavishing his 
money on others, he at last learns to keep a tight hold of it. 
It is the only advantage foreigners have in this bewitching 
dty. 

Pa&is^ the lotb of the moon of Saphar, 17 14. 



LETTER LIX. 

RICA TO USBEK 
At . 

I WAS the other day in a house where the people assembled 
were of a very mixed class. I found that two old women, 
who had been vainly spending all the morning in trying to 
make themselves look young, had managed to monopolize 
the whole conversation. '' It must be confessed," said one 
of them, " that the men of to-day are very different from those 
we knew in our youth : they were refined, courteous, and 
obliging, but at present their rudeness is insupportable." 
*' Everything is changed," said an old fellow who appeared 
to be crippled with the gout ; ** times are not what they were. 
Why, forty years ago, everybody was in good health ; gayety 
and cheerfulness were the order of the day ; people thought 
of nothing but dancing and singing; now an intolerable 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



108 

sadness reigns everywhere." A moment after^ the conversa* 
tion turned on politics. *^ Zounds ! " cried an old lord; *' the 
state is no longer governed ; find me a minister like Monsieur 
Colbert 1 1 knew him well, I can teU you. He was one of my 
friends, and always saw that my pension was paid before that 
of anybody else : what a grand financier he was 1 He set 
every one at his ease, while to-day I am ruined." — " Mon- 
sieur/' continued an ecclesiastic, " you are speaking of the 
most marvellous period in the reign of our invincible monarch. 
Was anything ever grander than what he did for the ex- 
termination of heresy? " — '' And then consider what he did 
to abolish duels," said a man With a self-satisfied air, who 
had not yet spoken. ''A judicious remark," whispered 
some one in my ear ; " that man is delighted with the edict, 
and obeys it so well that six months ago he let himself be 
soundly cudgeUed rather than violate it" 

It seems to me, Usbek, that our judgment of things is 
always controUed by the secret influence they have had on 
our own actions. I am not surprised that the negroes paint 
the devil with a face of dazzling whiteness, and their gods as 
black as coal ; that the Venus of certain tribes has breasts 
that hang down to her thighs ; and, in fine, that all nations . 
have represented their gods in the human form, and have 
supposed them to be imbued with their own passions. It 
has been very well said that if triangles were to make a god 
for themselves, they would give him three sides. 

My dear Usbek, when I behold men who crawl about on 
an atom, — for that is what the earth is, being merely a point 
in the universe, — when, I repeat, I behold men setting them- 
selves up as models for Providence, I find it impossible to 
imagine how such extravagance can be combined with such 
littleness. 

Paris, the 14th of the moon of Saphar, 1714. 



Digitized by 



Googl^ 



109 



LETTER LX. 

USBEK TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

You ask me if there are any Jews in France. Know that 
where there is money, there are Jews. You ask me what 
they do. Just what they do in Persia ; nothing resembles 
an Asiatic Jew more than a European one. 

They display among Christians, as well as among our* 
selves, a stubborn and invincible devotion to their religion 
that amounts to madness. 

The Jewish religion is an old tnmk that has produced two 
branches which have covered the whole earth, — I mean 
Mahometanism and Christianity; or rather she is the 
mother of two daughters who have tortured her with multi- 
tudinous wounds ; for the religions that are the most closely 
related are always the bitterest enemies. But notwithstand- 
ing the cruel treatment she has received from her children, 
she has good reason to pride herself on having brought 
them forth ; and while her venerable age embraces all time, 
she has made use of them to embrace the whole world. 

The Jews regard themselves as the fountain-head of all 
sanctity and the source of all religion ; on the other hand, 
they regard us as heretics who have altered the law, or 
rather as rebellious Jews. 

If the change had been made gradually, they think they 
might have been easily seduced ; but, as it was made sud- 
denly and violently, and as they can point to the day and 
hour of the birth of either daughter, they are scandalized at 
the thought that we had a beginning, and they hold firm to 
a religion that is older than the world. 

They have never been less troubled in Europe than they 
are at present Christians are &st losing that spirit of in« 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



no 

tolerance which fonnerly animated them : they are beginning 
to find out that the expulsion of the Jews from Spain was a 
mistake, and that the persecution of Christians in France whose 
beliefs differed a little from those of their sovereign was 
another. They have discovered that fanatic zeal for the 
advancement of a religion is far different from the attach* 
ment which every one ought to feel* towards it, and that, in 
order to love and practise its precepts, it is not necessary to 
hate and afflict those who refuse to do so. 

It is much to be desired that our Mussulmans entertained 
the same sensible views on this subject which the Christians 
hold; that peace was established once for all between All 
and Abubeker ; and that the relative merits of these holy 
prophets were left to the decision of God : I would have 
them honored by acts of veneration and respect, and not 
by vain preferences. We should try to be deserving of their 
favor, whether the place assigned them by God be on His 
right hand or beneath the footstool of His throne. 

Paris, the i8th of the moon of Saphar, 17 14. 



LETTER LXI. 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 

I ENTERED the Other day into a famous church called Notre 
Dame. While admiring this magnificent edifice, I had an 
opportunity of conversing with an ecclesiastic, whom curiosity 
had brought thither as well as myself. The conversation 
turned on the peaceful life led by those belonging to his 
order. "Yes," said he, " most people envy the happiness of 
our condition, and they are right. Still, it has its annoyances : 
although we are separated from the world to a certain ex' 
tent, there are a thousand reasons that compel us to enter it; 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Ill 

and the part we have to play in it is a very difficult one 
indeed. 

" Worldly people are rather surprising : they cannot endure 
either our censure or our approval ; if we try to reform them, 
they regard us as ridiculous ; if we praise them they consider 
our conduct inconsistent with our profession. There is 
nothing so humiliating as' the fear that you may have scanda- 
lized even the ungodly. We are, then, compelled to adopt 
an equivocal line of action, and to exert an influence over 
libertines, not by the direct power inherent in our office, but 
by the uncertainty in which we leave them as to how we 
may receive their observations. To deal effectively with 
these neutral conditions demands a considerable amount of 
astuteness : men of the world, who risk everything, who give 
way at once to their impulses, and pursue or abandon them, 
according to the measure of success attainable, are much 
more fortunate. 

" This is not all : we find it impossible to preserve in the 
world that happy, tranquil condition of life which is deemed 
so enviable. As soon as we make our appearance, we 
have to enter on a discussion ; we are forced, for instance, to 
prove the utility of prayer to one man, who does not believe 
in God, the necessity of fasting to another, who has during 
all his life denied the immortality of the soul : it is a toilsome 
task, and we have not the laughers on our side. Furthermore, 
an incessant craving for the conversion of those who differ 
from us torments us ; it is, in fact, the stamp of our profes- 
sion. And yet it is as ridiculous a proceeding as it would be 
for Europeans to attempt to bleach the skin of an Ethiopian. 
We disturb the state and vex ourselves in our efforts to 
constrain people to accept points of doctrine which are not 
really fundamental, and resemble the Chinese conqueror 
who drove his subjects to rebellion by insisting that they 
should cut their hair and nails in a particular fashion. 

*' Our very zeal in pressing those for whom we are respon« 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



112 

siUe to fulfil the duties of their religion is often dangerooSy 
and cannot be exercised with too much prudence. An 
emperor named Theodosius massacred all the inhabitants of a 
city, not sparing even the women and children. As he was 
afterwards about to enter a church, a bishop, called Ambrose, 
ordered the doors to be closed against him as a sacrilegious 
murderer. It was a heroic action. But when this emperor, 
having done such penance as the enormity of the crime 
demanded, was again admitted into the church and was 
about to take his seat among the priests, the same bishop 
ordered him to retire apart from them : this was the act of a 
fanatic and a madman. So true it is that excessive zeal 
ought to be avoided. What difference did it make to re- 
ligion or the state whether this prince sat among the priests / 
or not?" ^ 

Pari^ the ist ci the moon of Rebiab i, 1714. 



LETTER LXIL 

ZEUS TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

As your daughter has reached her seventh year, I have 
judged it proper to withdraw her into the inner apartments 
of the seraglio, and not wait until she was ten before confid« 
ing her to the black eunuchs. Younp persons cannot be 

d q>rJY^^ of the freedom of childhood tnn P^aAy^ gnH gri'vAn 

a holy education within the sacred walls where chastity 
dwells. 

I find it impossible to agree with those mothers who refuse 
to confine their daughters until the period when they are 
about to bestow them upon a husband ; who condemn rather 
than consecrate them to the seraglio, and use violence to 
make them embrace a state which they ought to have tauj^t 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



113 
Atm to love. Should we g ^^^yt ^^'^TT^hing frirm ll ii fl i r i i 

Vainly we are told of the subordination decreed for us by 
nature, if we are not made to feel as well as practise it, so 
that it may support us at that critical time when the passions 
begin to awaken and urge us to independence. 

If we were only attached to you by duty, we might some- 
times forget it ; iif inclination alone bound us, a stronger in- 
clination might weaken the tie. But when the laws make us 

the property of one " lan^ w<> ^rf Hi^nH<*H from all thp rtfY^^^ 

as much apart from them as if we were separated by a hun- 
dred thousand leagues. 

Nature, ever bounteous to men, has not rested content 
with giving them desires; it has ordained that we should 
have desires also, and should be the animated instruments D f 

t heir felici ty « it has fii^H na wifrh paccmn that fh^y ^^y ]^<g^A 

tr maquil lives> When they lose their insensibility, we are at 
hand to restore it to them, although we may never hope to 
enjoy the happy state in which we are instrumental in placing 
them. 

Still, imagine not, Usbek, that your situation is happier 
than mine ; I have experienced a thousand pleasures you 
know nothing of; my imagination has wrought incessantly to 
make me acquainted with their value ; I have lived, and you 
have only languished. 

Tn the pri<^p wh#»r<>in y 9U hold me, I am freer than vou> 
When you guard me with increasing watchfubess, I enjoy . 
your uneasiness; a nd vour suspicions, your jealousy, y d 
v exation are so many marks of your dependence. i 

Go on, dear Usbek : have me watched night and day;!; 
trust not to ordinary precautions ; increase my happiness by '/ 
the measures you take to insure yours ; and learn, for all your \ 
efforts, that I dread nothing but your indifference. 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the ad of the moon of Rebiab i, 1714. 

8 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



114 



LETTER LXIIL 

RICA TO USBEK 
At 

It looks as if yoa were going to spend your life in die coon* 
tiy. At first, I lost sight of you only for a couple of days, 
but now a whole fortnight has gone without meeting you. I 
admit you are in a charming house, among the sort of people 
you like, and can meditate on things in general at your ease ; 
and, of course, that is enough to make you foiget everything 
else in the universe. 

As to myself, my life is pretty much the same as when you 
saw me : I go into society and try to understand it ; my 
mind is gradually losing all its Asiatic peculiarities, and I find 
oo difficulty in adapting myself to European customs. I am 
no bnger amazed when I find five or six women with five or 
six men in the same house, and, in fistct, am beginning rather 
to like it 

I can truthfully affirm that I never had a real knowledge of 
women until I came here ; I have learned more about them 
in a month than I could have during thirty years in a seraglio. 

Amongst us, character is uniform, because it is forced ; 
people are not seen as they are, but as they are compelled 
to be. As both mind and heart are enslaved, the voice of 
fear alone makes itself heard ; and fear has but one language, 
while nature, which expresses its feelings under so many 
different forms, is dumb. 

Dissimulation, an art with us customary and necessary, 
is here unknown ; everything is said, and seen, and heard. 
It is as easy to read hearts as to read faces ; in manners, vir- 
tue, and even in vice, you can always detect a certain degree 
of artlessness. 

To please women, you must prove your possession of a 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



IIS 

kind of ability different from that by which they are pleased 
still more : it consists in a sort of badinage that amuses 
them, because it seems every moment to promise that which 
can be performed only at long intervals. 

This badinage, naturally adapted to the dressing-room, 
seems to be gradually becoming the universal characteristic 
of the nation ; it is practised in camp and council, ahd even 
in the skirmishes of diplomacy ; professions appear ridicu- 
lous in proportion to the seriousness of the demeanor of 
those who follow them ; a doctor would be a less ludicrous 
personage, if his garments were less doleful, and if, while 
killing his patients, he kept them laughing 

Paris, the loth of the moon of Rebiab i, 17 14. 



LETTER LXIV. 

THE CHIEF OF THE BLACK EUNUCHS TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

I CANNOT, magnificent lord, express to you the perplexity by 
which I am at present overwhelmed. The seraglio is in 
frightful disorder and confusion; war reigns among your 
wives j your eunuchs are divided ; on all sides resound lam- 
entations, complaints, and reproaches; my remonstrances 
are despised ; in this period of license everything seems to 
be permitted, and I am powerless in the seraglio. 

There is not one of your wives who does not consider her- 
self elevated above the others by birth, or beauty, or wealth, 
or intellect, or by her love for you ; not one who does not 
advance one of these motives as an argument in favor of her 
ckum to superior distinction. I am losing every moment 
that long forbearance which I have always exhibited, and 
whidi, nevertheless, has only succeeded in displeasing 
them all ; my prudence, even my good-nature — so rare a 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Ii6 

qoalitj in those occupying the position I hold — have btem 
unavailing. 

Shall I disdose tq .you, magnificent lord, the cause of ah 
these disorders? It hks its source in your heart and in the^ 
tender afiectionryou have for them. If you did not restrain 
my hand; if, instead of permitting me only to remonstrate, 
you allowed me to chastise ; i^ instead of surrendering to 
their lamentations and tears, you sent them to weep before 
me, who am never affected, — I would soon fisishion them to 
' the yoke they should bear; I would soon exhaust their im- 
perious and independent humors. 

Carried away at the age of fifteen from the depths of 
Afirica, my native. country, I was first sold to a master who 
had more than twenty wives or concubines. Having deemed 
that my grave and taciturn demeanor rendered me fit for the 
seraglio, he ordered me to make ready for the ofiice I was to 
fill, and caused an operation to be performed on me which 
was at first painful, but had happy results, because it procured 
me the favor and confidence of my masters. I entered the 
seraglio ; to me it was a new world. The first eunuch, the 
most rigid man I ever met with, governed with absolute swaf. 
Divisions and quarrels were unheard of; a profound silence 
reigned everywhere ; all these women went to bed and rose 
at the same hour throughout the entire year ; they entered 
the bath in their turn, and left it at the slightest sign we 
made; during the rest, of the time, they were confined to 
their chambers. He had a rule which compelled them to 
observe the greatest cleanliness; and his solicitude in this 
respect was extreme : the least attempt at disobedience was 
mercilessly punished. ^ I am/* he used to say, ** a slave ; 
but I am the slave of your master and mine, and I but use 
the power which he has given me over you ; it is he who 
chastises you, not I, who am but his instrument" These 
women never entered the chamber of my master except they 
were summoned. They welcomed the favor with joy, and 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



"7 

did not mamittr when deprived of it In fine, I^ who held 
the lowest position among the blacks, in that peaceful 
seraglio was more respected there than I am in yours, where 
I command alL 

As soon as this illustrious eunuch became acquainted with 
my genius, I found fevor in his sight ; he spoke of me to 
his master as of one capable of carrying out his views and 
ultimately succeeding him in the post he filled. He did not 
mind my extreme youth, as he believed that my diligence 
would counterbalance my inexperience. But to shorten my 
narrative, I made such progress in his good opinion that he 
no longer hesitated to intrust me with the keys of those 
terrible places which he had so long guarded. It was under 
this great master that I learned the difficult art of command- 
ing, and moulded myself in accordance with the maxims of 
an inflexible government Under him I studied the heart of 
woman. He taught me to take advantage qf h^r w^^alr n#>aoKt, 
and not to be frightened by her haughtiness. Often h^ took 
a delight in watching me putting them through their drill, and 
driving them even into the very last intrenchment of obedi- 
ence ; then he made them return gradually, and directed me 
to appear for the time compliant with their wishes. But you 
should see him when he found them in a state of desperation, 
4t one time beseeching, at another, reproaching him. Their 
tears did not move him. ''You see,'* he would say, com- 
placently, *' how women should be governed ; their number 
does not embarrass me ; I could manage all the wives of our 
great king with as much ease as I do those. How could a 
man hope to capture their hearts, if his £adthful eunuchs had 
not begun by breaking their spirit ? " 

His penetration was equal to his firmness ; he read their 
thoughts and their dissimulations ; firom him their studied 
gestures and their afiected airs of innocence hid nothing. He 
knew all their most concealed actions and all their most 
secret words; this he did by persuading some to teU on 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



ii8 

others, and he was always most liberal Id remuneiating tfat 
confidence reposed in him, however unimportant its nature. 
As they never came near their husband, except when called, 
the eunuch summoned such as he was pleased with, and 
turned the eyes of his master on those he regarded £sivorably. 
This distinction was always the reward of some secret revealed. 
He had persuaded his master that it was essential to disci- 
pline he should have the selection, as it would render his 
authority firmer. Such, magnificent lord, was the mode in 
which a seraglio was governed whichi I firmly believe, was 
the best managed in Persia. 

Give me fi'ee rein ; aUow me to insist on obedience ; in a 
week order shall take the place of confiision ; this your glory 
requires, and your safety exacts. 

Your Seraglio in Ispahan, the 9th of the moon of Rebiab i, 1714. 



LETTER LXV. 

USBEK TO HIS WIVES 
At the Seraglio at Ispahan. 

I AM informed that there is great disorder in the seraglio, and 
that it is filled with quarrels and intestine divisions. Did I 
not, at my departure, recommend you to live in peace and 
unity? You promised to do so; was it for the purpose of 
deceiving me? 

It is you who are likely to be deceived, if I follow the 
counsels of the chief eunuch, and employ my authority in 
compelling you to adopt a mode of life which, it seems, my 
exhortations could not persuade you to follow. 

I do not wish to resort to violent methods until all else has 
failed. Do, therefore, for your own sakes what you will not 
do for mine. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



119 

The first eunuch has good reason for his complaints ; be 
says you do not respect him. How can you reconcile such 
conduct with the modesty becoming your condition? Is it 
not to him that your virtue has been entrusted during my 
absence ? He i^ the depositary of that sacred treasure* But 
the contempt with which you treat him is a proof that those 
whose du^ it is to see that you live according to the laws of 
honor are a source of annoyance to you* 

Change your conduct, I beseech you. Act in such a way 
that, when proposals which compromise your fireedom and 
tranquillity are again laid before me^ I may be able to reject 
them. 

For I should wish to make you forget that I am your 
master, so that you might only remember that I am your 
spouse. 

Paris, the 5th of the moon of Chahban, 1714. 



LETTER LXVI. 

RICA TO . 

Although people are very much devoted to science in 
these quarters, I am rather inclined to doubt as to the 
extent of their learning. The man who is sceptical about 
everything as a philosopher does not venture to deny any- 
thing as a theologian; such a contradictory personage is 
quite satisfied with himself, if you grant him the privilege 
of making certain distinctions. The passion of most French- 
men is to be thought wits ; and the passion of those who 
wish to be thought wits is to write books. 

It is impossible to imagine a more unfortunate mania: 
nature has wisely provided that the follies of men should 
be ephemeral ; but, unhappily, these very follies are immor* 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I20 

taHsed in books. A fool ought to have been satisfied 
with boring all those who have lived with him; yet he 
insists on torturing future races; he is determined that 
his folly shall triumph over the oblivion in which he ought 
to have been able to find as i^uch enjoyment as he does 
in his last slumber; he wishes posterity to know that he 
has lived, and remember forever that he was a fool. 

There is no class of authors I despise more than I 
do compilers, who come fix>m every side to search for 
the fragments of other men's works, which they wedge 
into their own, just as you would introduce paUches ol 
turf into the border of a flower-plot. They are not superior 
to printers who arrange characters in such a way as to 
produce a book, but whose manual labor has been all that 
has entered into its composition. I would have original 
books respected. It is a kind of profanation to tear from 
them the parts of which they are composed, as if from a 
sanctuary, and thereby expose them to a contempt they 
do not deserve. 

When a man has nothing novel to say, why is he not 
silent? Who cares for having the same thing said over 
again? I will, however, give you a besh illustration. You 
are a clever man; and, to prove it, you come into my 
library and place the books that were on the upper shelves 
on the lower ones, and vice versa: you have produced a 
masterpiece ! 

I write to you, , because a book I have just laid 

down has fairly enraged me. It is so bulky that you would 
think it contained all the sciences ; but it has simply split 
my head without introducing anything through the crack. 
Adieu. 

Pxais, the Sth o£ the moon of Chahban, 1714. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



121 



LETTER LXVII. 

IBBEN TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

TKrsb vessels have arrived here without bringing any news 
of you. Are you sick? or does it give you pleasure to make 
me anxious? 

If you do not care for me in a country where you have no 
connections, how wiD it be when you are in Persia and 
in the bosom of your family? But perhaps I am mistaken; 
your disposition is so amiable that it attracts friends wher- 
ever you go ; the heart is the citizen of all countries^ and 
with such a nature as yours, you cannot help forming ties 
wherever you are. I like old friends myself; but stiU I 
have no objection to make new ones. 

In whatever country I have lived, I have acted as if 
I intended spending my whole life there. I have felt the 
same attachment for the virtuous, the same pity, or rather the 
same affection, for the unfortunate, and the same esteem for 
all whom prosperity had not blinded. Such is my character, 
Usbek ; wherever I find true men I find true friends. 

There is a Guebre here who, next to you, holds, I believey 
the first place in my heart He is the very soul of honesty. 
Private reasons have forced him to retire into this city, 
where he lives quietly with a wife whom he loves, on the 
earnings of an honorable traffic. The whole course of his 
life has been marked by generous deeds, and, although 
he prefers obscurity, there is more heroism in his heart than 
in that of the greatest monarchs. 

I have spoken about you to him a thousand times, and 
have shown him your letters. I have remarked that this 
gives him pleasure, and I see that you have already a friend 
whom you do not know. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



122 

Here you will find an account of his chief adventures : 
although he was very much disinclined to write them, he 
could not refuse anything to my friendship, and I confide 
them to yours. 

THE HISTORY OF APHERIDON AND ASTARTE. 

I was bom among the Guebres, whose religion is, perhaps, 
the oldest in the world. Unfortunately for me, love came 
to me before reason did. When I was hardly six, I could 
not live apart from my sister. My eyes were always riveted 
on her, and, if she left me for a moment, she found me 
bathed in tears on her return. Every day that added to my 
age added also to my love. My father, astonished at the in- . 
tensity of my emotion, was wilhng to let us marry according 
to the ancient usage introduced among the Guebres by 
Cambyses ; but the fear of the Mahometans, under whose 
yoke we live, prevents our people from thinking of those 
sacred unions enjoined as well as permitted by our religion, 
being, as they are, the artless images of the unions already 
formed by Nature. 

My father, seeing it would be dangerous to yield to my 
inclinations, which were also his, determined to extinguish a 
flame which he believed had only just sprung into existence, 
but which was in reality at its height Under the pretext 
that he was obliged to travel he took me with him, leaving 
my sister in the care of a female relative, for my mother had 
been dead two years. I will not describe my despair at this 
separation. I embraced my sister, who was bathed in tears ; 
but I shed none myself, for grief had rendered me insensible. 
We arrived in Teflis ; and my father, after entrusting my 
education to one of his relatives, left me and returned home. 

Some time afterwards, I learned that he had, through the 
influence of one of his friends, obtained a position for my 
sister in the harem of the king as an attendant on one of the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



. 123 

soltanas. If I had been told of her death, I should not have 
been more dismayed ; for, apart from the fact that I could 
not meet her, her entrance into the harem implied her 
conversion to Mahometanism, and, according to the preju- 
dices of her religion, she must now look upon me with 
horror. However, as I could no longer endure existence at 
Teflis, and was tired of myself and tired of life, I returned 
to Ispahan. My first words to my father were bitter. I 
upbraided him for placing his daughter in a post she could 
only fill by changing her religion. "You have drawn down 
on your family," I said, " the wrath of God and of the Sun 
which enlightens you ; you have done worse than if you had 
polluted the Elements, since you have polluted the soul of 
your daughter, which is not less pure than they. As for me, 
I shall die of sorrow and of love ; may my death be the only 
penalty you have to suffer at the hands of God ! " There- 
upon, I left him, and for two years spent my time in gazing 
on the walls of the harem, and trying to find out in what 
part of it my sister lived, risking death a thousand times 
every day in case I encountered any of the eunuchs who 
prowl around these terrible places. 

At length my father died, and the sultana my sister served, 
becoming jealous of her beauty, married her to a eunuch 
who was passionately attached to her. My sister therefore 
left the seraglio, and with her eunuch took a house in Ispa- 
han. I was three years without exchanging a word with her ; 
for the barbarous eunuch was the most jealous of men, and 
always put me off with various excuses. When at last I was 
admitted to his harem, I had to speak to my sister through 
a lattice, and she was so mufHed up in veils and coverings 
that it would take the eyes of a lynx to recognize her ; I only 
knew her by the sound of her voice. What was my emotion 
to see her so near and yet so far ! I repressed it, however, 
for keen eyes were watching me. As to her, as far as I could 
observe, she shed a few tears. Her husband made some 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



124 

sort of lame apology ; but I spumed him as the vflest oi 
slaves. He was troubled at hearing me address my sister in 
a tongue that was unknown to him ; it was the ancient Per* 
sian, our sacred language. "What I '^ I said, ''is it true^ 
sister, that you have abandoned the religion of your fathers? 
I know that, on your entrance into the harem, you must 
have professed Mahometanism ; but tell me, was it with 
your heart as well as with your lips that you deserted a reli- 
gion which permits me to love you? And for whom have 
you left this religion which ought to be so dear to you? — 
for a wretch who still bears the marks of the chains he has 
worn ; for a creature who, if he were a man, would be the 
vilest of his kind." — " Brother," she answered, " this man is, 
after all, my husband. I must honor him, unworthy as you 
deem him ; and I also should be the vilest of women, if — " 
** Ah! sister," I interrupted, "he is not and can never be your 
husband ; if you are as faithful as your ancestors, you must 
regard him as a monster." — " Alas ! " she returned, " how fyiT 
away does that religion of yours seem to be from me ! I had 
hardly learned its precepts when I was compelled to forget 
them. You see that even the language in which you speak 
to me is no longer datmiliar, and I have the greatest difficulty 
in expressing my thoughts in it ; but for all that, the mem- 
ories of our childhood are still a delight to me ; the pleasures 
I have since enjoyed have had no reality ; never has a day 
passed that I did not think of you ; and you have had more 
to do with my marriage than you suppose ; for I contracted 
it in the hope of seeing you again. But what distress will 
not this day, which has already been a source of trouble, 
bring upon me 1 You have evidently lost your self-control, 
and my husband is beside himself with rage and jealousy : I 
can never see you again, and am doubtless now speaking to 
you for the last time in my life. If such is the case, brother, 
my life will not be long." After these words she became 
to agitated that she could not continue the converse- 



I 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



125 

tioDy and retiredi leaving mc the most miserable of human 
kind. 

lliree or four days after, I asked to see my sister ; the 
barbarous eunuch tried to prevent me ; but, apart from the 
fact that these kinds of husbands have not the same authority 
over their wives that others have, he was so distractedly in 
love with my sister that he could refuse her nothing. I saw 
her again in the same place and muffled up as before. She 
was accompanied by two slaves, and so we had recourse 
to the old Persian language again. " Sister/' I said, *' how 
comes it that I cannot see you except in such hideous sur- 
roundings? — those waUs that shut you out from the world, 
those bolts and bars, and, above all, those vile wretches who 
guard you, render me furious. How could you ever have 
thought of giving up the sweet freedom in which your an- 
cestors rejoiced ? The only guardian of your chaste mother's 
virtue was that virtue itself. She and her husband lived 
together in trustful affection, and the simplicity of their 
manners made them a thousand times richer than could all 
the false splendor you seem to enjoy in this sumptuous 
mansion. When you lost your religion, you lost your liberty, 
your happiness, and that precious equality which constitutes 
the honor of your sex. But, what is worse still, you are 
not the wife, but the slave of a slave who has been degraded 
below humanity." — "Ah! brother," she exclaimed, "re- 
spect my husband ; respect the religion I have embraced ; 
according to that religion I can neither listen nor speak to 
you without crime." — "What! sister," I cried, in a trans- 
port of indignation, " do you really believe that that religion 
is true?" — "Ah!" she returned, "how much more to 
my advantage it would be, if it were not true ! I have made 
too many sacrifices for its sake not to believe it, and if my 
doubts — " She paused at these words. " Yes, sister, your 
doubts are well founded, whatever be their nature. What 
can you hope from a religion that makes you wretched in 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



.126 

this world and excludes you from paradise in the next? 
Remember that our religion is the oldest in the world ; that 
it has always flourished in Persia ; that its origin, like that of 
the Persian empire, is lost in the night of ages ; that it was 
only chance which gave birth to Mahometanism, and that 
the sect owes its success to persecution and conquest, not 
to persuasion. If our ancient princes had not been weak, 
the worship of the magi would still reign triumphant. Trans- 
port yourself to those remote ages; eveiything connected 
with them speaks to you of magism, nothing of the Mahom- 
etan sect, which was not even in its inCEmcy, for thousands 
of years afterwards/*— " But," she replied, " if my religion is 
more modem than yours, it is also more pure ; we adore 
one only God, while you worship the Sun, the Stars, the 
Fire, and even the Elements." — *' I see, sister, you have 
learned among the Mussulmans to calumniate our holy re* 
ligion. We adore neither the Stars nor the Elements, nor 
have our forefathers ever adored them either; never have 
they raised temples to them or offered sacrifices. They 
have simply rendered an inferior kind of worship to them 
as being the manifestations and works of Divine Power. 
But, sister, in the name of God who is our light, accept this 
sacred book which I have brought to you ; it is the book of 
our lawgiver Zoroaster. Read it without prejudice, and 
receive into your heart the rays of light which must illumine 
you when you do read it. Call to mind those ancestors of 
yours who for so long a time honored the Sun in the holy 
city of Balk ; and above all think of me, whose repose and 
fortune, nay, whose very life, depend on your conversion." 

I returned two days after ; I did not speak to her ; I 
awaited in silence the sentence of life or death. " You arc 
k>ved, my brother," she said, " and by a Guebre. I strug- 
gled long ; but, O ye Gods, what obstacles will not love re- 
move ! How relieved I feel ! I no longer fear to love you 
to excess, I can place no limit to my love now; its very 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



127 

excess is lawful Ah ! how thoroughly such a thought suits 
the state of zny heart 1 But you, who have broken the chains 
which my own mind had forged, when do you intend to 
break those which shackle my hands? From this moment 
I am yours ; show by the promptitude of your acceptance 
how dear is the present I bestow upon you. Brother, I 
think I shall die in your arms the first time I shall embrace 
you." I can never express the joy I felt on hearing these 
sweet words. I believed myself and actually saw myself 
in one moment the happiest of men. I saw all the desires 
I had been forming during twenty-five years of my life nearly 
fulfilled, and all the sorrows that had rendered that life so 
wretched vanish away. But when I had grown accustomed 
to these sweet thoughts, I perceived I was not so near my 
happiness as I had fancied, although I had surmounted the 
greatest obstacle of all. It would be necessary to elude the 
vigilance of my sister's guardians. I did not dare to confide 
my secret to any one ; it was necessary that we two should 
do everything. If I failed, I incurred the risk of being im- 
paled; but, in my eyes, no penalty could be as cruel as 
failure. We agreed that she should send to me for a clock, 
bequeathed to her by her father, and that I should place a 
file in it for sawing the lattice of the window, which opened 
on the street, as well as a knotted rope whereby to descend. 
Then I was to abandon my visits, but to station myself 
every night under her window until she could execute her 
design. I passed fifteen nights without seeing any one, 
because she had not found a favorable opportunity. At 
length, on the sixteenth night, I heard the rasping of the 
file ; now and then the work was interrupted, and on such 
occasions I was seized with unspeakable dread. At last, 
after an hour's labor, I saw her fasten the rope. She let 
herself down and glided into my arms. All feeling of dan- 
ger vanished, and I remained for a long time without stirring 
firom the spot Then, I conducted her out of the city to a 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



128 

place where I had a hone ready. I placed her behind mei 
and galloped as £3ist as I could from a neighborhood which 
might become so £Eital to us. We arrived before daylight at 
the dwelling of a Guebre in a lonely spot to which he had 
retired, living frugally by the labor of his hands. We did 
not judge it prudent to remain there, and, by his advice, we 
entered a dense forest, where we lived in the hollow of an 
old oak, waiting for the rumor of our flight to die away. 
We stayed in this singular habitation, never meeting any 
one and constantly repeating to each other the tale of our 
undying love. We were always on the watch for an oppor- 
tunity to visit some Guebre priest, in order that he might 
perform the marriage ceremony prescribed by our sacred 
books. '* Sister," I said to her, " how holy is this union I 
Nature has already united us, but soon our holy law will 
unite us by a closer tie." At last a priest came to quiet 
our amorous impatience. He performed all the ceremonies 
of marriage in the house of the peasant, and wished us a 
thousand times all the vigor of Gustaspes and all the sanctity 
of Hoharaspes. Soon after this, we left Persia, where we 
were not safe, and retired to Georgia. There we remained 
for a year, becoming more charmed with each other every 
day. But, as my money was giving out and I dreaded mis- 
ery for my sister, not for myself, I left her to seek help from 
my relations. Never was farewell more tender than ours. 
My journey, however, was not only useless but fatal ; for, 
having found on the one hand, that all my property was con- 
fiscated, and, on the other, that it was out of the power of 
my relatives to afford me much relief, I could obtain only just 
enough money to enable me to return. But what was my 
despair I My sister was lost to me. A few days before my 
arrival, the Tartars had attacked the town in which she 
dwelt ; and, as they saw she was beautiful, they seized her 
and sold her to some Jews who were going to Turkey, leav- 
ing me only a little daughter she had given birth to a few 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



\ 






Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



129 

months before. I followed the Jews, and came up with 
them three leagues further on : my prayers and tears were in 
vain ; they asked me for thirty tomans as the ransom of my 
sister, and refused to make the slightest reduction. After 
appealing to all I met^ after imploring the aid of the Turkish 
and Jewish priests without success, I went to an Armenian 
merchant, and sold myself and my daughter to him for 
thirty-five tomans. Then I sought the Jews and gave them 
thirty tomans, reserving five for my sister, whom I had not 
yet seen. ** You are fi-ee, sister," I said to her, " and I can 
embrace you ; here are five tomans I bring you ; I am sorry 
they did not pay a higher price for me." — " What 1 " she 
exclaimed, " you have sold yourself I " — "Yes," I answered. 
— ^^ Ah ! unhappy man, what have you done? Was I not 
sufficiently unfortunate to prevent you from adding to my 
misery? Your freedom was to me a consolation ; your 
slavery will be my death. How cruel is your love, my 
brother 1 — And my daughter? I do not see her." — 
**She is sold also," I replied. We both fell weeping, too 
weak to utter another word. At length, I went to see my 
master, and my sister was with him almost as soon as I. 
She threw herself at his feet " Others might ask you for 
liberty," she cried, " I ask you for slavery : take me ; you 
can sell me for a higher price than my husband." Then 
took place a struggle that forced tears from the eyes of my 
master. " Unhappy man ! " she said, " did you imagine I 
should accept my freedom at the price of yours? Master, 
you behold two unfortunates who will die if you separate 
them. I give mjrself up to you; pay me; perhaps this 
money and my services may some day obtain from you that 
which I do not now venture to ask. It is your interest not 
to separate us; consider that his life depends on mine." 
The Armenian was a merciful man, and was affected by our 
misfortunes. "Let both of you serve me with zeal and 
fidelity, and I promise you your liberty in a year; I see that 

9 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I30 

neither of you deserve the fate which has been your portion. 
I( when you are free, fortune smiles upon you, and your 
success is equal to your merit, I am certain you will com- 
pensate me for the loss I shall suffer." We both embraced 
his knees, and followed him on his journey. We comforted 
each other in the servile tasks assigned us, and I was always 
delighted when I had a chance to perform the work allotted 
to my sister. 

The year came to an end at last ; my master was true to 
his word, and liberated both of us. We returned to Teflis ; 
there I discovered an old friend of my father, a physician in 
successful practice in the town ; he lent me money enough to 
engage in commerce. Some business brought me afterwards 
to Smyrna, where I established myself. I have been living 
here now six years, and have enjoyed the companionship 
of the roost amiable and delightful people in the world. 
Union reigns in my £unily, and I would not change my 
condition for that of the greatest king that ever hved. I 
was fortunate enough to find the Armenian merchant to 
whom I owe everything, and have been able to render him 
certain weighty services. 

Smyrna, the 27th of the moon of Gemmadi 2, 1714. 



LETTER LXVIIL 

RICA TO USBEK 
At . 

I DINED the other day at the house of a magistrate, who had 
invited me several times. After much desultory conversa- 
tion, I said : " Monsieur, your profession appears to me to 
be a very laborious one." — " Oh, not at all to the extettt you 
imagine," he answered; "in fact, considering the way we 
practise it, it is more of an amusement than anything elsf;.** -^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



131 

*'How can that be? Is not your head always full of other 
people's business? Are you not always occupied with mat- 
ters that have no personal interest for you?" — ^^"You are 
right; these affiurs do not interest us, for the very good 
reason that we do not take any interest in them ; and that is 
why our profession is by no means so wearisome as you 
imagined." When I saw that he looked at the matter firom 
such a free-and-easy point of view, I continued : " Monsieur, 
I have not seen your study." — " I believe you, for I have 
none. When I took this office, I needed money to pay the 
expense of my installation. I sold my library, and the 
bookseller who bought it left me only my account-book out 
of all the vast number of volumes it contained. I do not 
regret them ; we judges are not puffed up with vain knowl- 
edge. What is the good of all these law books ? Almost all 
cases depend for their solution on some question of fact, and 
are outside the general rule." — " But, monsieur, may not 
this be because you have placed them outside the general 
rule? Why should every nation in the world have laws, if 
these laws are not to be applied ; and how can they be 
applied by those who are ignorant of them ? *' — " If you were 
acquainted with our law-courts, you would not speak as you 
do," retorted the magistrate. ** We have living books, 
namely, the advocates, who work in our behalf, and under- 
take the task of instructing us." — " And do they not some- 
times also undertake the task of deceiving you?" I rejoined. 
" You would be acting wisely, if you were on your guard 
against their stratagems; they are well equipped for an 
armed attack on your justice ; it were well that you were 
equally so for your defence, and that you did not rush into 
the conflict, h*ghtly clad, to encounter men who are armed 
to the teeth." 

Paris, the 13th of the moon of Chahban, 1714. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



132 



LETTER LXIX. 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Vbnzcb. 

You would never have imagined that I could have become 
a greater metaphysician than I was already ; yet such is the 
case ; and you will be convinced of the &ct when you have 
waded through the torrent of philosophy I am about to le^ 
loose upon you. 

The wisest philosophers who have reflected upon the na* 
ture of God have said that He is a supremely perfect being ; 
but they have abused this idea excessively ; they have made 
a catalogue of all the perfections man is capable of possess- 
ing or imagining, and have transferred them to the Deity, 
never considering that those attributes are often contradictory, 
and cannot exist in the same subject without destroying one 
another. The western poets say that a painter, who wished 
to draw a picture of the goddess of beauty, assembled the 
fairest Greek women, and, taking from each her character- 
istic charm, combined all the &scinating graces before him 
into a representation of the most enchanting of all the god- 
desses. If a man had, on that account, concluded that she 
was blond and brown, black-eyed and blue-eyed, haughty 
and gentle, he would pass for a fool. 

God must often lack a perfection that would imply a great 
imperfection ; but He is never limited except by Himself; 
He is His own law ; thus, although God is omnipotent, He 
cannot violate His own promises nor deceive men ; often too 
His impotence is not subjective, but the property of relative 
things ; and this is why He cannot alter essentials. 

There is, therefore, no reason for surprise in the fact that 
some of our doctors have ventured on a denial of the infinite 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



U3 

foreknowledge of God, on the ground that it is incompatible 
with His justice. 

The idea may seem audacious, yet metaphysics lends it a 
marvellously strong appearance of truth. According to its 
prindples, it is not possible for God to foresee those things 
that depend on the determination of free causes, because 
that which has not happened is not, and cannot, conse- 
quently, be the object of cognition ; for nothing, as it has no 
properties, cannot be perceived ; God cannot read a will 
which is not, and see in a soul that which has no existence 
in it ; for, until the mind has determined, the determining 
act is not in it. 

The soul is the agent of its own determination ; but there 
are occasions when it is so indeterminate, that it knows not 
on which side to determine. Often its determinism is only 
the result of a wish to make use of its liberty ; and it does 
so in such a way that God can have no foreknowledge of 
the subjective or objective action of its determinism. 

How could God foresee the things which depend on the 
determination of free causes? He could foresee them only 
in two ways : by conjecture, which is contradictory of His 
infinite foreknowledge ; or as necessary effects that infallibly 
follow from a producing cause equally infallible, which is 
still more contradictory, for it supposes that the soul is free, 
while in reality it is not freer than a billiard-ball, which is 
free to move when struck by another ball. 

Still, you must not imagine that I am trying to limit the 
knowledge of God. As He controls the acts of His creatures 
according to His pleasure, He knows all that He wishes to 
know. But, although He can see everything, He does not 
always make use of His power ; He ordinarily leaves to 
the creature the power to act or not to act, in order that 
man may freely choose between right and wrong ; and this 
is the reason why God renounces the right to act on the 
human soul and determine it But, when He wishes to hav« 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



134 

foreknowledge of anything, He always has it; because He 
has only to will that it happen as He sees it and determine 
His creatures in conformity with His wilL It is thus that 
He selects what is to happen out of the number of purely 
possible things, fixing by His decrees the future determina- 
tions of men's minds, and depriving them of the power He 
has given them of acting or not acting. 

I will venture on a comparison as to a subject which is 
fiur above all comparisons. A monarch is ignorant what his 
ambassador will do in a certain important afiair ; if, however, 
he wishes to know what his course is sure to be, he has 
only to order him to act in such or such a manner, and he 
may be quite certain the afiair will turn out as he planned it. 

The Koran and the Jewish books testify everywhere against 
the dogma of absolute foreknowledge ; these works depict 
God as being ignorant of the future determination of men's 
minds ; and it would seem as if this were the first truth 
which Moses has taught mankind. 

God places Adam in the terrestrial paradise, on condition 
that he shall not eat of a certain fruit ; an absurd command^ 
if the being who gave it was acquainted with the future 
determinations of men's minds. Could such a being attach 
conditions to His favors, without rendering these favors a 
mockery? It is as if a man who knew perfectly well that 
Bagdad had been captured, were to say to another man : ** I 
will give you a thousand crowns, if Bagdad is not captured.'' 
Would not such an offer be looked upon as a poor jest? 

But why all this philosophy, my dear Rhedi? God is so 
high above us that we cannot see even the clouds that en- 
shroud Him. We know Him only through the command- 
ments He has given us. He is a spirit, immense and infi- 
nite. May His greatness inspire us with a sense of ouri 
own littleness. To humble ourselves continually is to adore I 
him continually. 

Paeis, the last day of the moon of Chahban, 17 14. 



Digitized by\jOOQlC 



135 



LETTER LXX. 

ZELIS TO USBEK 
At Paeis. 

S0LIMAN9 whom you love, is in despair on account of an 
affront he has just received. A harebrained young fellow, 
named Suphis, asked his daughter in marriage some three 
months ago. The report and description given of the girl 
by the women who had known her since childhood seemed 
to be perfectly satisfactory to him ; the dowry was arranged^ 
and everything appeared to be passing off pleasantly. Yes- 
terday, Uie girl left her home on horseback, attended by 
her eunuch and veiled, according to custom, from head to 
foot But as soon as she reached the house of her intended 
husband, he shut the door in her face, and swore he would 
not receive her except her dowry was increased. The rela- 
tives of both parties met to bring about a settlement of some 
sort ; and Soliman, after a good deal of reluctance, was per- 
suaded to make a small present to his son-in-law. At length, 
the marriage ceremonies were completed, and the young 
girl was conducted to the bed of her husband with sufficient 
violence ; but, an hour afterwards, this young madman rose 
up in a rage, cut her face in several places, swore that she 
was not a virgin, and sent her back to her father, who is in 
a state of frenzy on account of the insult. Many persons 
insist that the girl is innocent Fathers are very unfortunate 
In being exposed to such af&onts. If such a thing were to 
happen to my daughter, I believe I should die of grief. 

The Seraglio of Fatme, the 9th of the moon of Gemmadi t, 1714. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



136 

LETTER LXXL 
USBEK TO ZEUS. 

I tm SoHman, espedafly as he has no remedy for die oat- 
rage he has suffered : his son-in-kw has simply availed him- 
self of the fincedom allowed him by the law. It is, in my 
opinion, a veiy harsh law, which places the honor of a fieunily 
at the mercy of the caprices of a madman. It is all very 
wen for people to say that the tmth in this matter can be 
known from certain symptoms ; this is an old error to which 
sensible people no longer give any credit, and our physicians 
adduce invincible reasons for the uncertainty of these proofe. 
Even the Christians regard them as chimerical, although 
they are deariy established by their sacred books, and al- 
though their ancient lawgiver makes the innocence or guilt of 
an girls depend on these signs. 

I am weU pleased to learn that you are paying the greatest 
attention to the education v of your daughter. May God 
grant diat her husband find her as beautiful and as pure as 
Fatima ; may she have ten eunuchs to guard her ; may she 
be the ornament and honor of the seraglio for which ^e is 
destined ; may she have overhead only gilded ceilings, and 
walk only on the richest carpets ; and, to crown those wishes 
may my eyes see her in aU her gloiy ! 

Pabis, the 5tii o€the moon o€ Chalva]» 1714. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



137 



LETTER LXXIL 

RICA TO USBEK 
At 

The otber day I happened to be present in a company 
where I came across a man who had certainly a high 
opinion of himsel£ In a quarter of an hour, he decided 
three questions in ethics, four problems in history, and five 
points in natural philosophy. Such a universal dogmatist 
I have never encountered before. His mind was not for 
one moment disturbed by the slightest doubt We left 
the sciences, and spoke of the news of the day : he decided 
upon the news of the day. I resolved to make an effort 
to catch him, and I said to myself: ''If I succeed, it 
win only be by starting a subject in which I fancy I am 
pretty well up ; 1 11 tackle him on my native land." So 
I spoke to him about Persia; but I had hardly said four 
words when he contradicted me twice, on the ground that 
Messieurs Tavemier and Chardin did not bear out the 
truth of my statements. *' Great heavens I " I thought^ 
'' what a man ! He wiD soon know the streets of Ispahan 
better than I doT' I was not long in concluding my 
wisest course was to be silent and let him talk on. He 
is still dogmatizing. 

Pakii^ the 8th of the moon of ZUcade^ 171^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 




138 

LETTER LXXIIL 
RICA TO . 

I RAVS heard a good deal of talk about a sort of tribanal* 
called the French Academy. There is none in the world 
less respected; for it is said that no sooner has it issued 
one of its dec rees than the people set about breakinj;, it 
a nd estab^ '^^iing '^■^ ^' ^"^"' Q*^ yhich the Academy 
hill to olw^rvt 

Some time ago, in order to strengthen its authority, 
it issued a code of decisions. This child of so many 
parents was almost old at its birth, and, although legitimate, 
a bastard, who came into the world some time before, had 
almost strangled it when it appeared. 

To chatter incessantly would seem to be the only function 
of those who compose it Eulogy is the exclusive subject 
of their eternal babble ; and, as soon as they are initiated 
into its mysteries, an uncontrollable desire of panegyrize 
ing everybody takes possession of them and never leaves 
them. 

This body has forty heads, jiH f^^f^rr^ irith fignmni m^rtn- 
phors, and antitheses ; as a consequence^ ^ver y utterance 
oL-iaeig- JBQutiis is an exclamation, and their ears are 
attuned only to cadence and harmonyi^ As for their eyes, 
we neea fiOC speak of them: it would seem as if the 
Academy was intended to speak and not to see. It is 
not firm on its legs, for time is its scourge, gives it a shaking 
every moment, and destroys all it has done. It was formerly 
said that its hands were grasping ; I do not care to say 
anything on that subject, and will let those decide the ques- 
tion who knows more about it than I. 

I have wished, , to give you a notion of certain 

oddities unknown in our Persia. Our minds have no par* 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



139 

t knilar bias towids what is singular and extravagant We 
always fashion our aimpIT UiUiiums and wulrss nrmntffra in 
accordance with the dictates of nature. 

Famis, the ayth of the moon of Zilhagc, 1715. 



LETTER LXXIV. 

RICA TO USBEK 

At . 

A Fxw days ago, a man of my acquaintance said to me : 
" I promised to introduce you to some of the really good 
houses of Paris ; I will conduct you now to that of a great 
lord who is one of the best representatives of social 
excellence we have in the kingdom.*' 

'*What do you mean by that, monsieur? Is he more 
polite and afiGsible than others?" — ''Oh, no, such is not 
the case/' he answered. — *«Ah! I see: he shows his 
superiority, on every occasion, over those who approach 
him. If that is so, I beg to be excused; I accept my 
inferiority, and leave him to his sense of superiority.'' 

I had to go, however, and I saw a little man with so 
lofty an air, who took a pinch of snufT so arrogantly and 
blew his nose with such severity and spat so phlegmatically 
and caressed his dogs with such a show of considering them 
far more elevated in the scale of animals than the men 
present, that I could not keep my astonishment within 
bounds. '* Great heavens 1 " said I to myself, ^' if I ever 
posed as such a representative of our upper class in Persia, 
I must have posed as a great fool 1 " Surely, Usbek, we 
would have shown ourselves both petty-minded and ill- 
naturedy if we offered a hundred little insults to those 
persons who used to visit us every day in order to prove 
their good will in our regard. They knew well we were 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I40 

above tfaem ; and if they had happened to be ignocant 
of the factf the favors we were constantly conferring on 
them would have brought the knowledge of it home to 
them. We felt we were too high-placed to render it 
necessary for us to do anything to gain respect ; so we 
did everything to gain affection : we were always at home 
to the humblest; they always found us accessible to pity, 
though living amid splendors that generally harden the 
feelings; they saw that our hearts alone belonged to a 
sphere above them; we dgscgnded to t heir wants. But 
when it became necessary to uphold the majesty of our 
prince in public ceremonies, or to arouse respect for 
our country in the bosom of foreigners, or, in fine, to 
animate our soldiers in times of danger, we rose a hundred 
times higher than we had before descended; we resumed 
our lofty demeanor, and were thought to be suflSciently dis- 
tinguished representatives of our rank, 

PxaiSi the loth o€ the moon o£ Saphar, 171^ 



LETTER LXXV. 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 

I MUST confess that I have not remarked among Christians 
that lively faith in their religion which is found among 
Mussulmans ; among them it is a long road between pro- 
fession and belief, between belief and conviction, between 
conviction and practice. Religion is not so much a sub- 
ject of sanctification as of debate in which everybody feels 
at liberty to join. Courtiers, warriors, even women, rise 
in revolt against the ecclesiastics and demand that proofi 
be presented to them of what they are all the time firmly 
resolved not to believe. Nor do these people act thus 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



N 



141 

because reason has determined their course and they have 
taken the pains to examine the truth or falseness of the 
religion they reject: no, they are rebels who have felt 
the yoke, and have shaken it off before knowing its real 
nature. Consequently, they are no firmer in their incredulity 
than they were in their faith ; they live in a tide whose ebb 
and flow bears them back now to the one and now to 
the other. A person belonging to this class said to me 
some time ago : '' I believe in the immortality of the soul 
for six months of the year ; my opinions depend absolutely 
on my bodily constitution. According to the condition of 
my animal spirits, the goodness or badness of my digestion, 
the fineness or roughness of the air I breathe, the lightness 
or solidity of the food I eat, I am a follower of Spinoza, 
a Socinian, a Catholic, a devout or an impious man* 
When the doctor is at my bedside, then comes the con- 
fessor's opportunity. But I see to it that religion does nol 7 
interfere with my comfort when I am in good health ; I have / 
no objection to receiving its consolations when I am sick^ 
When I have no longer anything to expect in this world, 
religion comes forward and wins me by her promises ; I am 
delighted to surrender to her, and die with hope on my 
side." 

A long time ago, Christian princes freed all the slaves 
in their dominions, because, said they, Christianity makes 
all men equal. It is true that this act of religion was very 
useful to them, because they lessened the power of the 
great lords by taking the common people away from their 
control. Afterwards, they made conquests in countries 
where they saw it would be to their advantage to have slaves ; 
they permitted them to be bought and sold, forgetting the 
religious principle that at one time affected them so deeply. 
But what can be really said on the subject? You have truth I 
at one time, error at another. Why do we not act like the 
Christians? It has been very childish of us to reject settle- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



142 

ments and etaj oonqoests in pleasant dimes, because we 
could not find water pure enough for our ablutions, according 
to the principles of our holy Koran ! ^ 

I thank God the all-powerful, who has sent us His great 
prophet Ali ; for this cause do I profess a religion which 
renders all human interests secondary to itself, and which is 
as pure as the sky from which it has descended* 

Paris, the ijfth of the moon of Saphar, 171^ 



LETTER LXXVL 

USBEK TO HIS FRIEND IBBEN 
At Smyrna* 

Tm laws are furious in Europe against those who commit 
suicide ; these people suffer, as it were, a second death, are 
dragged ignominiously through die streets, are proclaimed 
infamous, and, in addition to all this, their goods are 
confiscated. 

These laws seem to me, Ibben, to be very unjust When 
I am overwhelmed with sorrow, misery, and contempt, why 
should I be debarred from ending my troubles and cruelly 
deprived of a remedy that is in my hands? 

Why should I be compelled to labor for a society to which 
I no longer consent to belong, or held to a compact to which 
I never was a party ? Society is founded on mutual advan- 
tage ; but, when it becomes a burden, what prevents me from 
renouncmg it? Life was bestowed upon me as a favor; I 
may then give it back when it is a favor no longer ; the cause 
ceasing, the effect ought to cease also. 

Will the prince insist on me being his subject when I do 
not derive any advantages from my subjection? Can my 

1 The Mahometans did not care to conquer Venice for the reaioa 
assigned. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



143 

fenow-dtizens be so unjust as to demand that I share a lot 
that implies utility for them, but for me despair? Does God, 
unlike other benefieictors, wish to condemn me to receive 
favors that crush me to the earth ? 

I am obliged to obey the laws when I live under the laws ; 
but can laws under which I no longer live continue to bind 
me? 

''But," it win be said, ''you disturb the order of Provi- 
dence. God has united your soul with your body; by 
separating what God has joined, you oppose His designs and 
resist Him." 

What does this mean ? Do I disturb the order of Provi- 
dence when I change the modifications of matter, and render 
a ball square which the first laws of motion, that is to say, the 
laws of creation and conservation, had made round? No, 
undoubtedly ; I but use the right which has been given me ; 
and in this sense, I can disturb the whole order of nature, 
if I fancy doing so, without any one being able to say that 
I oppose Providence. 

Will there be less order and less arrangement in the uni- 
verse when my soul is separated firom my body ? Do you 
believe that new combinations will be less perfect and less 
dependent upon general laws ; that the world will lose any- 
thing thereby, and that the works of God will be less great, or 
rather, less immense ? 

Do you believe that my body, when it has become an ear 
of wheat, a worm, or a piece of turf, will be changed into a 
work of nature less worthy of her ; and that my soul, when 
it has been liberated from its earthly companion, will be less 
sublime ? 

All these ideas, my dear Ibben, have no other source than 
our pride ; we do not feel our littleness, and, however small 
we may be, we wish to reckon for something in the universe, 
to be distinguished and to be of great importance therein. 

We fancy that the annihilation of so perfect a being as man 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



144 

woald degiade all nature; and we cannot oonoeive that a 
man more or leas in the world, what do I lay? nay, all man- 
kind, a hundred million heads like ours^ are but a firagile, 
insignificant atom which God perceives only because of the 
immensity of his knowledge. 

PAau^tlMi5diof themooQ o£S«phar, 171^ 



LETTER LXXVIL 

IBBEN TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

It seems to me, my dear Usbek, that in the eyes of a true 
Mussulman, misfortunes are less chastisements than warnings* 
Very precious are those days in which we are induced to 
atone for our offences. It is our seasons of prosperity that 
ought to be abridged. What avails all our impatience except 
to show that we would wish to be happy independently of 
Him who gives happiness, because He is happiness itself? 

If a being is composed of two beings, and the necessity of 
preserving their union is a distinctive mark of submission to 
the orders of the Creator, naturally this necessity has been 
emphasized by a religious law ; and, as this necessity is the 
best guarantee to men of their responsibility, it has been 
emphasized by a civil law. 

Smyuca* the last day of the moon of Saphar, 171^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



145 

LETTER LXXVIIL 

RICA TO USBEK 

At , 

I SEND yon a copy of a letter sent here by a Frenchman who 
is travelling in Spain ; I have no doubt you will be glad to 
see it: — 

*^ I have been now six months going through Spain and 
Portugal, and have been living amongst a people who despise 
all nations except the French ; they do the latter the honor 
of hating them. 

*' Gravity is the shining characteristic of these two king- 
doms ; it has two methods of manifesting itself: by spectacles 
and by mustaches. 

" Spectacles prove, by the demonstrative method, that the 
wearer of them is a man splendidly equipped as a scientist, 
and so profoundly devoted to the reading of the most abstruse 
literature that his sight has thereby been weakened, and 
every nose adorned or burdened therewith must pass for the 
nose of a scholar. 

" As for the mustache, it is highly respectable in itself, 
without regard to the results it may produce ; but, in addition, 
it has been the occasion of great advantage to the service of 
the monarch and the honor of the nation, as was well shown in 
the case of a famous Portuguese general in the Indies.^ Find- 
ing himself in need of money, he cut off one of his mustaches 
and demanded that the inhabitants of Goa should lend him 
twenty thousand pistoles on this pledge; they were lent 
without hesitation, and he afterwards honorably redeemed 
his mustache. 

'^ It is easily conceivable that such grave and phlegmatic 

^ John de Castra 
to 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



146 

people as these are, are not likely to be without vanity; and 
this sunnise would be correct. 

** Their vanity is ordinarily based on two very important 
considerations. Such of the natives of the Peninsula as 
receive the appellative of ' Old Christians^' are wonderfuUy 
elated by this circumstance; for it is thereby proved that 
they are not descendants of those whom the Inquisition has, 
for some centuries, been persuading to embrace Uie Christian 
religion. On the other hand, those living in the Indies are 
not less flattered by the consideration that they have the 
sublime merit of being, as they say, 'white-fleshed' men. 
Never was sultana in the seraglio of the Great Sultan prouder 
of her beauty than is the oldest and ugliest lout amongst 
them of the olive-tinted paleness of his complexion, as he 
sits in some Mexican town, with folded arms, at his door. 
Of course, a man of such consequence, a creature so per- 
fect, would not work for aU the treasures of the world, and 
would not, by some vile, mechanical trade, compromise the 
honor and dignity of his skin. 

'' It would be well, also, to know that when a man has a 
certain additional merit in Spain, such, for instance, as that 
of being the proprietor of a long sword, or that of making a 
discordant guitar shriek — an art inherited from his father — 
he is sure to work nevermore ; his honor is interested in the 
repose of his hmbs. He who remains seated ten hours a day 
obtains double the consideration of him who remains only 
five ; because nobility is acquired by sitting on chairs. 

'* But, although these invincible enemies of toil make a 
parade of their philosophic tranquillity, their hearts give 
them the lie ; for they are always in love. No men in the 
world can equal them in the art of languishing in a dying 
state beneath the balconies of their mistresses ; and no Span- 
iard who has not a cold in his head can ever pass for a 
gallant. 

" They are, firstly, devotees, and secondly, jealous. They 



Digitized by LjOOQiC 



147 

take good care that their wives shall not be exposed to any 
danger coming from a soldier riddled with wounds, or a 
lawyer in the last stage of decrepitude ; but they will leave 
them alone with some fervent young novice, who lowers his 
eyes, or with a robust Franciscan, who is not afraid to raise 
them. They are better acquainted than other people with 
the weakness of women ; they will not have any one view 
their heels or surprise their toes; they know that imagination 
travels fast and does not wait for amusement on the road ; 
it wants to arrive at the end of the journey. 

" It is said that the rigor of love is cruel everywhere ; but 
it is more cruel in Spain than in any other country. If the 
women cure the pains of their adorers, it is by making them 
suffer pains of a different kind ; and an extinct passion is 
always a long and disagreeable memory for the latter. 

"They have little forms of politeness, which, in France, 
would seem entirely out of place ; for instance, a captain 
never beats one of his soldiers without asking the soldier's 
permission to do so, and the Inquisition makes the most 
profound apologies to the Jew it is about to roast. 

" The Spaniards who are not liable to be burned show such 
a love for the Inquisition, that it would really exhibit bad 
taste in any one who wished to deprive them of it. For my 
part, I should like to see another established, not against 
heretics, but against those heresiarohs who attribute to trivial 
little monastic practices the same efficaciousness they do 
to the Seven Sacraments, who adore what they ought only 
to venerate, and who are so devout that they are hardly 
Christians. 

" You will find wit and good sense among the Spaniards ; 
but do not search for these qualities in their books : look at 
one of their libraries, with the romances on one side, and 
the works of the schoolmen on the other ; you would say the 
whole collection was brought together by some secret enemy 
of human reason. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



148 

^The only one of their books which is resdly good te tfait 
which shows the absurdity of aU the others. 

** They have made immense discoveries in the New Worid ; 
and they are still ignorant of parts of their own peninsula. 

** They say the sun rises and sets in some part of their 
dominions at the same time ; but they might also say that, 
during his course, he looks down upon wasted fielcb and 
deserted territories." 

I should not be sorry, Usbek, to see a letter written to 
Madrid by a Spaniard travelling in France ; in my opinion, 
he could well avenge his country. What a vast field for a 
cool and thoughtful man ! I imagine he might begin his 
description of Paris in this way : — 

''They have a house here for madmen ; it would naturally 
be supposed that it must be the largest building in the city. 
But no ; the remedy is quite small in comparison with the 
disease. No doubt the French, who are not highly esteemed 
among their neighbors, shut up a few madmen in this house, 
in order to persuade the world that those who are outside are 
sane." 

At this point I take leave of my Spaniard. Farewell, my 
dear Usbek. 

Paris, the 17th of the moon of Saphar, 171^ 



LETTER LXXIX. 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice 

Most legislator s have been men of limited intellect, owing 
their elevated position to accident, and, in ahnost every case, 
guided by their prejudices and fancies. 

They have apparently entirely misunderstood even the 
greatness and t;)ie dignity of their work ; they have amused 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



149 

themselves with the creation of puerile institutions^ by which 
they have indeed given satisfaction to little minds, but 
excited the contempt of men of good sense. 

They have dealt exclusively with useless details and 
particular cases: and this is the characteristic of the 
narrow-minded who can only see things in their parts, 
and are incapable of embracing the whole in one general 
view. 

Some have affected to use a language different from the 
vernacular, — an absurdity in the case of a framer of laws : 
how can laws be obeyed, if they are not known? 

They have often, without any necessity, abolished those 
they found established, thus causing those disorders among 
the people that are inseparable from change. 

It is true that, because of a singularity existing in the 
nature of man rather than in his spirit, it is sometimes neces- 
sary to change certain laws. But such a case rarely occurs, 
and, when it does, it requires the nicest handling. Every 
possible solemnity should then be observed, and every pos- 
sible precaution should be adopted with the view of con- 
vincing the people that laws are very holy, since so many 
formalities are necessary for their abrogation. 

Often legislators have made their laws too subtle, and 
have followed out logical ideas rather than natural equity. 
Such laws were afterwards found too harsh, and it was 
thought that equity required they should be ignored ; but 
this remedy created a new disease. Whatever the nature ci 
laws may be, it is always necessary to obey them and to 
regard them as the public conscience, to which the con- 
science of the individual must always conform. 

It must be confessed, however, that some legislators have, 
in one particular instance, exhibited considerable wisdom ; 
it is in giving fathers great authority over their children. 
Nothing is more calculated to lessen the labors of magis- 
trates and to empty the courts of justice ; nothing, in fine, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



ISO 

is the cause of greater tranquillity in a state, for its manners 
and morals often make better citizens than its laws. 

Of all powers, this is the least subject to abuse ; of all 
magistracies, this is the most sacred; it alone does not 
depend on conventions, but has even preceded them. 

It has been remarked that in the countries in which the 
larger number of rewards and punishments is left to the dis« 
cretion of fathers, the families are the best ordered : fathers 
resemble the Creator of the universe, who, although He can 
lead men by His love, does not forbear from drawing them 
to Himself by the motives of hope and fear. 

I must not finish this letter without calling your attention 
to the singular turn of mind of the French. They are aaid 
to have retained an infinite number of things from the 
Roman laws, that are useless or worse than useless; but 
they have not retained the paternal power, which these laws 
have established as the primary legitimate authority. 

Paus, the i8th o£ the moon of Saphar, 1715. 



L^ER LXXX. 

THE GRAND EUNUCH TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

Yesterday, some Armenians brought a young Circassian 
slave to the seraglio, whom they wished to sell. I conducted 
her into the secret apartments of the seraglio, undressed 
her, and examined her with the eyes of a judge, and the 
more I examined her, the more charms I found in her. A 
virginal modesty seemed anxious to hide them from my 
view; I saw all that it cost her to obey: she blushed at 
seeing herself naked, even before me, although I have been 
released from the passions that alarm chastity, and am en- 
tirely freed from the dominion of the sex, being now merely 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



r Its manners 

.ws. 
'N I...- '*u8e; of all 

.. .^ i^ tl » does not 

. r •"..»•;• • , .'h the 

.♦ r. . • , . - ..»:.. dig. 

^. ".' ; : . I ' era 



t .rr. .,: 
• 't .*:• 



T //: 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



151 

the minister nf modesty in its most unrestrained actions, a 
being whose Ic'nks inspire nothing but purity and innocence. 
As soon as I i>ad judged her worthy of you, I lowered my 
eyes, threw a scaidet maude over her shoulders, placed a 
gold ring on her ^u$er, prostrated myself at her feet, and 
adored her as the qi:>een of your heart; I then paid the 
Armenians, and concea?^d her fh>m all eyes. Happy Us- 
bek ! you possess more beruties than all the palaces of the 
Orient endose. What a pleastire it will be for you to be- 
hold, on your return, the most ravishing objects in all Per- 
sia, and to see your seraglio bloom again with new delights 
when time and possession have wrought the destruction of 
the old ones I 

The Serai^o at Fatme, the first day of the moon of Rebiab i, 171 s 



\) 



LETTER LXXXI. 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 



Since I have been in Europe, my dear Rhedi, I have seen 
many f orms of government ; it is not the same here as in 
Asia, where the rules of policy are everywhere alike. 

I have often asked myself which of all these forms of gov- 
ernment was the most conformable to reason, and my con- 
clusion has been that the best government is that which 
attains its object with the least friction ; so that the one 
which governs men in accordance with their propensities 
and inclinations is the most perfect 

If the people are as submissive under a mild government 
as under a severe one, the first is preferable, since it is more 
in accordance with reason, while severity is a motive foreign 
to reason. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



152 

Be 9marcd, my dear Rhedi, that the ha of 'iie penahiet 
in a state being more or less cruel does not ^Mke the laws 
the better obeyed. In coontries where the ^nishments are 
moderate, they are as much dreaded as iP/tfaose where they 
are tyrannical and frightfuL 

Whether a government be mild jr cruel, punishments 
ought always to be graduated : a pooalty more or less great 
ought to be inflicted on a crime more or less great Oui 
imagination is influenced by 4he manners of the country in 
which we live : eight days' imprisonment, or a light fine, has 
as much effect on the spirit of a European, brought up in 
a country where the manners are gende, as the loss of an 
arm has upon an Asiatic. A certain degree of fear is pro- 
portioned to a certain degree of punishment, and each 
shares this fear in his own way: the infamy attached to 
some penalties would drive a Frenchman to despair, while 
these same penalties would not rob aTurk of a quarter of an 
hour's sleep. 

And yet I do not see that police regulations, justice, and 
equity are better observed in Turkey, Persia, or the em- 
pire of the Mogul than in the republics of Holland, Venioei 
and even in England ; neither do I see that fewer crimes 
are committed there, or that men, intimidated by the great- 
ness of the penalties, are more submissive to the laws. 

On the contrary, I remark a source of injustice and vexa- 
tion in the midst of these very states. 

I find that even the prince, who is himself the law, is less 
master there than anywhere else. 

I notice that at times when great severity is exerdaed, 
there are always tumults, of which no one seems to be 
the leader, and that, when authority based on violence is 
contemned, no one has any longer sufficient power to re- 
store it ; 

That the very despair of impunity strengthens disorder and 
increases its intensity ; 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



153 

That, in these states, a petty revolt never occtin^ and there 
is no interval between discontent and sedition ; 

That in these states great events are not necessarily pre- 
ceded by great causes ; on the contrary, the least accident 
produces a great revolution, often as unforeseen by those 
who cause it, as by those who suffer from it 

When Osman, Emperor of the Turks^ was deposed, none 
of those who committed the crime had ever dreamed of 
committing it ; they merely asked as suppliants that a wrong 
done them should be rectified* A voice which was unknown 
to everybody issued from the crowd by chance ; the name 
of Mustapha was pronounced, and suddenly Mustapha was 
emperor. 

Paris, the ad of the mooo of Rebiab i, 1715. 



LETTER LXXXIL 

KARGUM, PERSIAN ENVOY IN MUSCOVY, TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

Of all the nations of the world, my dear Usbek, none has 
surpassed that of the Tartars in the greatness and glory of 
their conquests. This people is the true ruler of the universe ; 
all the others seem to be designed for its service. It is alike 
the founder and the destroyer of empires ; in all times, it has 
given marks of its power over the earth ; in all ages, it has 
been the scourge of nations. 

The Tartars have conquered China twice, and still hold it 
in subjection. 

They dominate the vast countries that form the empire 
of the Mogul 

Masters of Persia, they sit upon the throne of Cyrus and 
Gustapes. They have subdued Muscovy. Under the name 
of TurkSy they have made immense conquests in Europe^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



154 

Asia, and Afiica, and thdr sway is sapceme over these Aiee 
quarters of the universe. 

And, to speak of times more remote, it was from their 
loins that issued all the races which overturned the Roman 
Empire. 

What are the conquests of Alexander in comparison to 
those of &nghis Khan? 

All that this victorious nation has lacked is a historian to 
celebrate the memory of its marvellous deeds. 

How many immortal achievements have been buried in 
oUivion ! How many empires have been founded by them, 
whose origin is to us unknown ! This warlike nation, solely 
occupied with its present glory, sure of conquering in every 
age, never thought of winning renown in the future by the 
memory of its deeds in the past 

Moscow, the 4th <if the moon of Rebiab i, 171^ 



LETTER LXXXIII. 

RICA TO IBBEN 
At* Smyrna. 

Although the French are very fond of talking, there is never- 
theless a kind of silent dervishes among them, called Car- 
thusians. It is said that they cut out their tongues when they 
enter the convent^'and it were much to be desired that all the 
other dervishes should cut off in the same fiaushion all that 
which their profession renders useless to them. 

By the way, talking of these dumb individuals puts me in 
mind of others more singular stiU, who have a very extraor- 
dinary gift T^CY ^'•*' *^^'^ ffh^ knnw hnwr tn tillr Trithnnt 
sa ying anything, and who carry on ; > rgpyprsatiQii foy two 
houRJKitho ut it being jyi'?"'^^^^ »^ ^^^^ ^"» ™^^^ '* ■" ' 
or to retain a single word of what they have said. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



155 

This sort of people are adored by the women ; though not 
80 much as some others who have received from nature the 
pleasing talent o f smiling at the right time> t hat is to say, 
everylnorteui, ttfld who approve with transport all that the 

h4ie? say. ■■ 

But they have attained the highest degree of wit when they 
are capable of seeing bright little turns and clever little 
touches in the tritest commonplaces. 

I am acquainted with others who make a capital hit by 
introducing inanimate things into their conversation, and by 
causing their embroidered coats, white perukes, snu£f-boxes, 
canes, and gloves to talk for them. 

Another good plan to gain attention is to create a terrible 
racket with your coach, while yet in the street, and then to 
hammer away at the knocker as loud as you can. This fore- 
taste makes the rest of the discourse come out easy, and 
when the proloyue is beautifu l, it rem jfrni nil tht nffmrmr 
t hat comes afterwa rd^ gnrinr^^^lp. 

I assure you that these little talents, to which no attention 
is paid among us, are here of the utmost utility to those who 
are fortunate enough to possess them, and t hat a man ol 
go od sense has no chance of competing withiTEcS 

Paris, the 6th of the moon of Rebiab 2, 1715. 



LETTER LXXXIV. 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 

If there is a God, my dear Rhedi, He must necessarily be 
just ; for if He were not, He would be the worst and most 
imperfect of all beings. 

Justice is a conventional relation, but which exists really 
between two things ; this relation is always the same, who- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



156 

ever contempktet it, whether God, or an angel, or SntlOff 
man himselfl 

It is true that men do not ahrays see these relations ; often 
indeed, when they do see them, they turn away from them ; 
for their own interest is always that which they see best. 
Justice may raise her voice, but^he will have some difficulty 
in being heard in the tumult of human passion. 

Men act unjustly, because it is their interest to do so, and 
they prefer their own satisfaction to that of others. In act- 
^f they always have in view the effect their action will have 
on themselves : no one is bad for nothing ; every one must 
have a determining motive, and that motive is self-interest 

But God cannot commit an injustice ; on the supposition 
that He perceives what is just, He must necessarily follow 
it : for, as He has no need of anything and is self-sufficing. 
He would otherwise be the most wicked of all beings, since 
He would have no motive for being wicked. 

Consequently, though there were no God, we should 
always love justice, that is, we should endeavor to resemble 
that Being of whom we have formed so grand an idea, and 
who, if He existed, would necessarily be just. Even if we 
succeeded in freeing ourselves from the yoke of religion we 
should not free ourselves from that of equity. 

You see, Rhedi, why I consider justice eternal, and 
independent of human conventions ; and, if she were de- 
pendent on them, that would be a truth so terrible that we 
should be forced to conceal it from ourselves. 

We are surrounded by men stronger than we are ; they 
can injure us in a thousand different ways, and can do so 
three fourths of the time with impunity ; what tranquillity 
does not the knowledge give us that in the heart of all these 
men is an innate principle which fights in our favor, and 
shelters us from their attacks! 

Except such were the case, we should be in a state of con- 
tinual alarm ; we should pass in front of men, as if in front 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



157 

of lions; and we should never for a moment be sure of out 
life, our property, or our honor. 

All these thoughts excite my indignation against those 
philosophers who represent God as a Being who makes a 
tyrannical use of His power ; who make Him act in a man- 
ner we ourselves would shrink from through fear of offending 
Him ; who load Him with all the imperfections He punishes 
in us, and, by their contradictory opinions, represent Him at 
one time as an evil Being, at another as a Being who hates 
evil and punishes it 

What a satisfaction must it be for the man who examines 
himself to discover that he has a righteous heart I That 
pleasure, austere though it be, should ravish him. He per- 
ceives that his nature renders him as superior to those who 
have it not, as it does to bears and tigers. Yes, Rhedi, if 
I was sure of always obeying the voice of justice, I would 
believe myself the most exalted of mankind. 

Paris, the first of the moon of Gemmadi i, 1715. 



LETTER LXXXV. 

RICA TO . 

I VTsrnn> the Invalides yesterday ; I would rather, were I a 
prince, have founded this establishment than have won three 
battles. The hand of a great monarch is visible on every 
part of it. I think it the noblest institution in the world. 

What a grand spectacle it is to behold, gathered within its 
waUs, all those who have bled for their country and lived 
only to defend it I and who, still possessed of the same 
courage, but not of the same strength, only complain of their 
impotence, because it hinders them from sacrificing them* 
selves for it once more 1 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



158 

What nobler ng^t than that of those disabled waniois 
observing as strict a disciptine, in their retirement, as if they 
were constrained to it by the presence of an enemy* seeking 
their last satisfiiction in the semblance of war, and sharing 
dieir heart and soul between the duties of religion and those 
of their profession ! 

I shonkl like to see the names of those who have died 
for thebr country preserved in the temples and written in reg- 
isters which would be the fountain-head of all gk>ry and 
nobility. 

Famu, the isth of the moon ol Gcmmsdi i, 1715. 

LETTER LXXXVL 

^ USBEK TO MIRZA 
At Ispahan. 

You are aware, Mirza, that certain ministers of Shah Soliman 
formed the design of obliging all the Armenians of Persia to 
either quit the kingdom or become Mahometans, thinking 
that the country would continue polluted as long as it kept 
these infidels in its bosom. 

It would have been all over with the greatness of Persia, 
if, on that occasion, blind devotion had been listened to. 

It is not known why the project failed ; neither those who 
planned it, nor those who rejected it, had any idea of what 
the consequences would be : chance did what reason and 
policy would never have accomplished, and saved the king- 
dom from a peril greater than it would have incurred by the 
loss of three battles or the capture of two cities. 

By the proscription of the Armenians, it was intended to 
destroy all the merchants and almost all the artisans in the 
realm. I am sure that the great Shah Abbas would have 
preferred to lose his two arms rather than sign such an 
order. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



159 

The persecution of which the Guebres have beec the 
victims on the part of our zealous Mahometans has com« 
pelled them to escape in crowds to India, and has deprived 
Persia of that laborious nation, which, by its intelligent 
devotion to agriculture, was alone fit to overcome the 
sterility of our soil. 

But fanaticism had still in its power to deal a final blow at 
the interests of the country : it could ruin industry ; as a 
consequence, the empire fell by its own act, the natural result 
being that the very religion it was intended to render so 
flourishing fell also. 

Speaking without prejudice, I am inclined to believei 
Mirza, that, after all, a diversity of religions in a country may 
be a benefit 

It has been noticed that the members of a merely tolerated 
religion render more useful services to the country, as a 
general rule, than those of the predominant creed, because, 
not being allowed to fill any public office, or attain any dis- 
tinction except that arising fi-om the possession of wealth and 
affluence, they are impelled to acquire these by engaging in 
the most laborious occupations. 

Moreover, as all religions contain precepts useful to society, 
it is well that these precepts be zealously observed; now, 
nothing can be more conducive to this than a multiplicity of 
creeds. 

They are rivals, constantly on the watch for one another's 
failings. The individuals composing them are jealous of the 
reputation of their particular sect. Each of them is on his 
guard, and fears to do things that would redound to the 
discredit of his own religion, and excite the unrelenting 
scorn and condemnation of the opposite party. 

It has therefore been shown that the introduction of a new 
sect into a state is always the surest method of correcting the 
abuses of the old one. 

It is all very well to say that the toleration of several 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i6o 

creeds in a state is amtiaij to the interests of the sovereign. 
Though all the sects in the world were gathered under his 
dominion, it would not do him any harm ; for there is not a 
single one of them in which the duties of obedience and 
submission are not ordained and preached. 

I acknowledge that history is full of religious wars ; but 
k is an indisputable fiict that these wars have not been 
produced by the multiplidty of religions, but rather by the 
intolerance of the dominant creed. 

This spirit of proselytism the Jews inherited from the 
Egyptians, and it then spread, like some epidemic disease, 
among the Mahometans and Christians. 

It is a kind of frenzy, the progress of which can only be 
regarded as a total eclipse of human reason. 

For, in fine, even if the attempt to trouble the conscience 
of our neighbor was not in itself inhuman, if the manifold 
evil effects which spring from it had no existence, the mere 
contemplation of such a course would be an evidence of 
mental unsoundness. 

The man who would have me change my religion does so 
doubtless because he would never change his own, no matter 
what force was brought to bear upon him : yet he thinks it 
strange that I should refuse to do a thing he would not him* 
self do for the empire of the whole world 1 

Paeis, the sdth of the moon of Gemmadi r, 171^ 



LETTER LXXXVn. 

RICA TO . 

It would seem as if in this country every individual of a 
family exercised the right of self-government : the authority 
of a husband over his wife, a father over his children, a 
master over his slaves, is almost a shadow ; the law inter 



Digitized by 



Google 



i6i 

meddles in all their dissensions; and you may take for 
granted that it is always in opposition to the jealous husband, 
the afflicted fother, and the exacting master. 

I went the other day to a place where justice is dispensed. 
Before reaching it, you have to run the gauntlet of a multi- 
tude of young saleswomen who call to you in seductive tones. 
The spectacle at first is rather attractive ; but it becomes 
lugubrious when you enter the great halls ; there you see 
none but people whose garb is graver even than the ezpres* 
sion of their feces. At last you reach the sacred spot where 
all family secrets are revealed and the most hidden actions 
brought to light. 

On one side, a modest young person makes confession of 
the torments of a virginity too long preserved, her struggles 
and her dolorous resistance; she is so little elated by the 
victory that she is always expressing an anticipation of defeat 
in the near future ; and, that her father may not be igno- 
rant of her eager desires, she exposes them to the whole 
people. 

A shameless woman comes forward next, and recapitulates 
her trespasses against her husband, as a ground for separa- 
ting firom him. 

With equal modesty, another proclaims that she is tired 
of bearing the name, without enjoying the privileges of 
a wife : she reveals the hidden mysteries of the wedding 
night; she is willing to submit to the gaze of the most 
skilful experts, so that a decision of the court may restore 
her all the rights of virginity. 

There are some even who dare to challenge their hus- 
bands, and who demand a public ordeal: a test rendered 
exceedingly difficult by the presence of witnesses, and as 
infamous for the wife who succeeds as for the husband 
who fails. 

A crowd of ravished or seduced girls make men ont 
to be much worse than they are. This tribunal resounds 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I62 

wUi the cries of love : angry fathers, deceived daaghten^ 
fiuthkss loversy and aggrieved husbands ate the tmiveisal 
theme. 

According to the law observed in this quarter, every 
child bom during marriage is assumed to be the husband's. 
It doesn't matter if he have good reasons for not believing 
this to be the case ; the law believes it for him, and relieves 
him from the necessity of all unpleasant inquiries and 
scruples. 

In this court, the decbion is determined by a majority 
of votes; but experience teaches that a minority would 
be more likely to be right; and this is very natiual: the 
number of well-balanced minds is limited, while there is 
a pretty general agreement that the number of ill-balanced 
ones is infinite. 

Paub, the lit of the moon of Gemmadi 2, 1715. 



LETTER LXXXVIIL 
RICA TO 

Man is said to be a sociable animal. If this principle is 
correct, the Frenchman, in my opinion, is more a man 
than anybody else ; he is pre-eminently fJke man : for he 
seems to have been made solely for society. 

But I have noticed among them that certain persons 
are not only sociable, but are themselves society universal 
They multiply themselves in all comers, and people in an 
instant the four quarters of a city ; a hundred men of this 
species are more in evidence than two thousand citizens; 
to the eye of a stranger they would seem to be able to 
repair the ravages of the plague or of famine. One of 
the questions debated among the schoolmen was whether 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i63 

a body could be io several places at once; they furnish 
the proof of what the philosophers called in question. 

They are always in a terrible hurry, for they are always 
having an important affair on hand — it is to ask every one 
they see whence he comes and whither he goes. 

It would be impossible to knock it out of their heads 
that it is good form to visit the public individually, without 
reckoning their visits to it in the aggregate in those places 
where crowds do most collect ; but, as these latter visits 
are necessarily brief, they count for nothing in their code 
of social observance. 

Their performances on the knocker make the doors of 
houses more tired than could storms and tempests. They 
spend their lives in attending funerals, in condoling sincerely, 
and in nuptial congratulating. The king does not bestow a 
fovor on one of his subjects without it costing them the 
price of a carriage, wherein they proceed to the happy 
recipient to testify their joy. At length, they return home, 
utterly fetigued, to take that repose which will enable them 
to resume on the morrow their painful functions. 

One of them died the other day of exhaustion; and 
this was the epitaph engraved on his tomb : Here rests 
one who never rested. He was present at five hundred 
and thirty funerals. He rejoiced at the birth of two thou- 
sand six hundred and eighty children. The pensions he 
congratulated his friends on receiving — always in different 
terms — amounted to two million six hundred thousand 
livres. The number of furlongs he has trotted along in 
the city were nine thousand six hundred ; the number in the 
country, thirty-six. His conversation was amusing. He 
had a capital-stock of three hundred and sixty-five stories 
always within reach of his hand ; he was also in possession, 
ever since the days of his youth, of one hundred and 
eighteen apothegms taken from the ancients ; these he fired 
off when a brilliant opportunity was the mark. At length 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i64 

lie died in the sixtieth jrear of his age. Tnrdkt, here 1 
hoU my peace : for how could I have ever done telling thee 
all he did and all he saw? 
PAaiib the jd ol the moon of Genmudi 2, 1715. 



LETTER LXXXIX. 

USBEK TO RH£DI 
At Vsnics. 

At Paris liberty and equality reign supreme. 

birth or virtue, or even his services in war, however brilliant 

these may be, do not save him from being confounded with 

the crowd. Jealousy of rank is unknown. It is said that 

the first man in Paris is he who keeps the best carriage 

horses. 

A great lord is a man who^sees the king, speaks to the 
ministers, has ancestors, debts, and pensions. If he can, in 
addition to this, conceal his indolence under an appearance 
of business, or a feigned attachment to pleasure, he believes 
himself to be the most fortunate of mankind. In Persia* 
the only grandees are those to whom the monarch has given 
a share in the government. Here, there are people who 
may be styled grandees, as far as their birth is concerned, 
but they have no influence in the state. The kings are 
like skilful artisans, who, in executing their works, always 
make use of the simplest tools. 

Favor is the great divinity of Frenchmen. The minister is 
her high priest, and offers her many victims. Those who 
surround her are not dressed in white : sometimes sacrificers 
and sometimes sacrified, they devote^ themselves to their 
idol along with the whole people. 

Paxis, the 9th of the moon of Gemmadi a, 17151 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i6S 



LETTER XC. 

USB£K TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

Trb desire of g lory does not diflfer from that instinct which 
all creatures have for their self-preservation. We acquire 
through it a new life, which becomes as precious to us as 
that which we have received from the Creator. But, as all 
men are not equally attached to Ufe, so they are not equally 
affected by the prospect of glory* This noble passion is^ 
indeed, always engraved in their hearts, but imagination and 
education modify it in a thousand various ways. 

This difference, which is found between man and man^ 
makes itself also felt between people and people, and that in 
a higher degree. 

It may be laid down as a maxim that, in every state, the 
desire of glory is proportional to the growth and diminution 
of the liberty of the subject : glory is never the companion 
of slavery. 

A man of sound judgment said to me the other day : ** In 
many respects, we are freer in France than you are in Persia ; 
as a consequence, our love of glory is greater than yours. 
This happy conception will make a Frencihman do with 
pleasure and enjoyment what your sultans can only obtain 
from their subjects by placing constantiy before their eyes 
the alternative of rewards and punishments/ 

'' Therefore, among us, the prince is always jealous of 
the honor of the meanest of his subjects.* For its defence 
there are tribunals which are held in high estimation ; it is 
the treasury of the nation, and the only treasury of which 
the sovereign is not master, because he cannot be so with- 
out dealing a deadly blow to his own interests. So, if a 
subject finds himself wounded in his honor by his prince, 
either by seeing another preferred before him, or by the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i66 

mark of contempty he at once leaves his cottit, 
employment and servicei and retires into private life. 

''The difference between our troops and yours is that, 
in the case of the latter, composed of slaves, who are natu- 
rally cowards, the fear of death can be surmounted only by 
the fear of punishment; now this, as it were, dulls the soul 
by introducing into it a new species of teiror; while the 
former rush into the thickest of the fight with joyful enthu- 
siasm, and fear is banished by a delight superior to it. 

** But the sanctuary of honor, fiEune, and virtue has ap- 
parendy its firmest foundation in republics and in countries 
where the word Fatherland may be boldly uttered. In 
Rome, Athens, Lacedaemon, honor was sufficient recom- 
pense for the most signal services. An oaken or laurel 
crown, a statue, a panegyric, was the glorious reward for 
battle won, or city taken. 

'' There a man who had done a fine action found sufficient 
requital in the action itself. Whenever he saw a fellow- 
countryman, he had the pleasurable feeling that he was his 
benefactor. The number of his fellow-citizens was the 
measure of that of the^services he performed in their behalf. 
'Every man is capable of doing good to his neighbor ; but 
to contribute to the happiness of an entire community is 
(^ to resemble the Gods. 

u -^Qyff^ must not this noble emulation be entirely extinct 
in the hearts of your Persians, among_.whom..empk)yments 
* and dignities depend solely on the whim of the sovereign? 
Reputation and virtue are regarded as imaginary, if not 
accompanied by the favor of the prince, for of that favor are 
they bom and with it they die. Though a man have the 
esteem of the public, he is never sure that to-morrow he may 
not be dishonored : he is a general one day ; on the next, 
the prince makes him his cook, and his only chance of at* 
taining fame is by making a good ragout." 
Paris, the 15th of the moon of Gemmadi 2« 171^ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i67 

LETTER XCL 

USBEK TO THE SAME 
At Smyrna. . 

Prom this geaeral passion of the French for glory has been 
formed in the minds of individuals a certain something 
which they call " the point of honor." Properly speaking, 
it is the characteristic of every profession, but peculiarly so 
of that of military men ; among them it is the indispensable 
condition. It would be very hard for me to convey to you 
an idea of its meaning : we have nothing exactly like it in 
Persia. 

Formerly the French, and especially the nobles, obeyed 
no other laws except those of this point of honor : by them 
they regulated the whole conduct of their lives, and these 
same laws were so severe that a man would shrink, under a 
penalty worse than death, not only from infringing them, 
but even from daring to elude the most trivial clause in any 
one of them. 

When they had to settle their differences, there was only 
one method prescribed for this purpose: the duel, which 
resolved all difficulties ; but the system had one serious evil, — 
it was that persons not immediately interested often engaged 
in the combat 

However slight the acquaintance of one man with another, 
he was obliged to be a party to the quarrel, and pay with 
his person, just the same as if he himself had ground for 
anger. He always felt honored by such a choice and by 
a preference so fiattering; and a person who would not 
give four pistoles to a man to save him and all his family 
from the gibbet, would make no difficulty about risking hte 
life for him a thousand times. 

This method of deciding a question was a poor concep- 
tion enough ; for it did not follow that a man had right on 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i68 

his side, because he was stronger and readier than another. 
Kings have therefore forbidden duelling under very severe 
penalties, but in vain : honor, which wishes always to retgn, 
revolts, and refuses to recognize the laws. 

Accordingly, the French are in a very perturbed condition ; 
for the laws of honor compel a gentleman to avenge himself 
when he has been insulted ; and, on the other hand, justice 
punishes him with the severest penalties when he has 
avenged himself. If a man obey the laws of honor, he dies 
on the scaffold ; if he obey the laws of justice, he is forever 
shunned by his fellow-men ; this, then, is the cruel alternative, 
either to die, or to be unworthy to live. 

Paei% the i8th of the moon of Gcmmadi 3, 171^ 



LETTER XCII. 

USBEK TO RUSTAN 
At Ispahan. 

An individual has appeared here who is a caricature of a 
Persian ambassador, and insolently makes sport of the two 
greatest kings in the world. He brings with him presents to 
the French monarch which ours would not offer to the king 
of Irimetta or of Georgia, and by his base avarice, he has 
dishonored the majesty of two empires. 

He has made himself ridiculous before a people who daim 
to be the most polished in Europe, and has given the West 
occasion to say that the King of Kings reigns over none but 
barbarians. 

He has received honors he seemed unwilling to accept ; 
and, as if the court of France had the honor of Persia more 
at heart than he, it forced him to appear with due dignity 
before a people who despise him. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i69 

Do not mention this at Ispahan ; spare the head of a 
miserable creature. I am not willing that our ministers 
should punish him for their own imprudence and for the 
unworthy choice they made. 

Pari% the last day of the moon of Gemmsdi s, 171^ 

LETTER XCIIL 

USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 

Thb monarch who reigned so long is no more. He made 
people talk much about him during his life ; every one was 
silent at his death. Firm and courageous in his last moments, 
he appeared to yield to destiny alone. So died the great 
Shah Abbas, after filling the whole earth with his name. 

Do not believe that moral reflections are the only consider- 
ationsy to which this great event has given rise. Each has 
thought of his own afiairs, and how they might be advanta- 
geously affected by the change. The king, great-grandson 
of the defunct monarch, being only five years old, a prince, 
his uncle, has been declared regent of the realm. 

The late king made a will limiting the authority of the 
regent ; but that able prince went before the parliament, and, 
setting forth the rights to which his birth entitles him, caused 
them to annul thesettlement made by the monarch, who 
apparently wished'lo survive himself and claimed to rule 
even after his death. 

Parliaments resemble those ruins which, though trodden 
under foot, always recall some temple, made famous by the 
ancient religion of a people. Their functions now are almost 
entirely judicial; their authority grows weaker every day, 
and must continue to do so, except some unforeseen con- 
juncture restore them to strength and vitality. These great 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I/O 

bodies have followed the destiny of human things : they have 
yielded to time, which destroys everything; to moral comip- 
tion^ which weakens everything ; and to absolute power, which 
overturns eveiything. 

But the regent, who wished to become popular, appeared 
at first to respect this image of public liberty ; and, as if it 
was his purpose to raise from the ground the temple and the 
idol, he was desirous that the parUament should be regarded 
as the support of the monarchy and the foundation of all 
legitimate authority. 

Famim, the 4lh of the moon of Rhegeb^ 1715. 



LETTER xcnr. 

US6£K TO HIS BROTHER, 
Samton at thk MoNASTsay or Casbin. 

I HUMBLE and prostrate myself before you, holy santon ; I 
regard your footprints as the apple of my eye. Your sanctity 
is so great that you seem to possess the heart of our holy 
prophet; your austerities astonish Heaven itself ; the angels 
have looked down upon you from the pinnacle of glory, and 
have said : " How is it that he is still on earth, since his 
spirit is with us, and floats around the throne which is up- 
borne by the clouds?" 

And why should I not honor you, — I who have been taught > 
by our doctors that all dervishes, even though they be in- 
fidels, have always an impress of holiness that excites the 
reverence of true believers, and that God has chosen unto 
Himself in every comer of the earth souls purer than others, 
which He has separated fix>m the impious world, in order that 
their mortifications and their fervent prayers might suspend 
His anger, ready to fall on so many rebellious nations? 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



171 

Marvellous ate the tales the Christians tell of their first 
santons, who flocked in thousands to the frightful deserts of 
the Thebaid, and whose chiefr were Paul, Antony, and 
Pacomus. If what is said of them be true, their lives are as 
full of prodigies as those of our most sacred imaums. They 
sometimes passed, ten whole years without seeing a single 
man, but dwelt night and day with demons, and were 
incessandy tormented by these malignant spirits ; they found 
them in bed; they found them at table; no refuge fh>m 
them anywhere. If all this be true, venerable santon, it must 
be confessed that no people ever lived in worse company. 

Sensible Christians regard all these stories as a very natural 
allegory, depicting the wretchedness of human life. In vain 
do we seek quiet in a desert ; temptations follow us thither; 
our passions, figured by the demons, never wholly leave us ; 
those monsters of the heart, those illusions of the mind, 
those vain phantoms of error and falsehood, are always 
at hand to seduce us, and attack us even in our fasts and 
hair-shirts, that is to say, in the very things that constitute 
our strength. 

As for me, venerable santon, I know that the ambassador 
of God has enchained Satan and hurled him into the abyss ; 
he has purified the earth, formerly the seat of his empire, 
and rendered it worthy to be the dwelling-place of angeb 
and prophets. 

Paris, the 9th of the moon of Chahban, 1715. 



LETTER XCV. 

US6EK TO RHEDI 

At Vbnicb. 

Whenever I have heard public law discussed, the subject 
has always been preceded by a careful inquiry into the origin 



Digitized by 



Google 



172 

of society, which appears to me absurd. If men did not ibrm 
a society, if they avoided and fled one another, it would 
then be necessary to ask the reason of this, and inquire why 
they kept apart ; but they all have a mutually related exist* 
ence from their birth : a son is bom near his father, and stays 
there ; now you have society and the cause of society. 

Public law is better known in Europe than in Asia; how* 
ever, it may be said that the passions of princes, the patience 
of their subjects, and the flattery of writers have corrupted 
all its principles. 

As it stands to-day, it is a science which teaches princes 
just to what point they may carry the violation of justice 
without violating their own interests. Can you conceive, 
Rhedi, of such a purpose as this? — to deaden the sensi- 
bilities of kings, they would reduce iniquity to a system, 
would prescribe its regulations, settle its principles, and from 
these principles infer the natural consequences ! 

The boundless power of our sublime sultans, which is a 
law unto itself, produces nothing more monstrous than this 
shameful art which would bend justice itself, inflexible 
though it be. 

It would look, my dear Rhedi, as if, forsooth, there were 
two sorts of justice, and these quite different : one, regulating 
the affairs of Individuals, and reigning in civil law ; the 
other, regulating the differences arising between nation and 
nation, and tyrannizing in international law, — as if interna- 
tional law was not itself a civil law, not indeed of a particular 
country, but of the world. 

I will explain in another letter my thoughts on this subject 

Pakis, the itt of the moon of Zilhage. 17 id 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



173 

LETTER XCVL 

USBEK TO THE SABiE. 

Magistrates ought to dispense justice between citizen and 
citizen, and every nation between itself and other nations. 
In this second administration of justice, no maxims can be 
employed different from those employed in the first 

There is seldom need of a third party to arbitrate between 
nation and nation, because the questions in dispute are always 
clear and easy to determine. The interests of two nations 
are generally so distinct that, in order to discover where 
justice lies, it is only necessary to love it 

It is not the same with the differences that occur between 
individuals. If they live in society, their interests are so 
intermingled and blended, and so varied in character, that a 
third party is needed to lighten what the cupidity of the 
other two obscures. 

There are only two kinds of just wars : those made to 
repel an enemy who attacks, and those made to succor an 
ally who is attacked. 

There would be no justice in waging war on account of 
the private quarrels of a prince, unless the wrong was so 
grave as to justify the death of the prince or people commit* 
ting it. Thus a prince cannot make war because he has 
been refused an honor due to him, or because of some disre* 
spect shown his ambassadors, and other such things, any more 
than a private individual can kill a person who refuses him 
precedence. The reason is that, as a declaration of war 
ought to be an act of justice, in which it is always necessary 
that the punishment fit the crime, it must be ascertained 
whether he upon whom war is declared deserves death. For 
to make war on any one, is to wish to punish him with death. 

In international law, the severest act of justice is war, sinoo 
its object is the destruction of a community. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



174 

Reprisals are of the second degree. To measure the pen* 
ahy by the crime is a law which the tribunals have not been 
able to refrain from observing. 

A third act of justice is to deprive a prince of the advan- 
tages he may draw from us^ always adjusting the penalty to 
the offence. 

The fourth act of justice, which ought to be the roost 
frequent, is the renunciation of all alliance with the people 
who have given cause of complaint This penalty corre- 
sponds to that of banishment, established by the tribunals 
for the purpose of cutting ofif the guilty from the com- 
munity. Thus a prince, whose alliance we renounce, is 
thereby cut off from our community, and is no longer one 
of our members. 

No greater affront can be offered a prince than to re* 
nounce his alliance, and no greater honor can be paid him 
than to contract one with him. There is nothing so honor- 
able to men, and even so usefril, as to see others taking 
thought of their preservation. 

But, in order that an alliance may be binding, it must be 
just : thus, an alliance made between two nations to oppress 
a third, is not legitimate, and may be violated without crime. 

It is not even consistent with the honor and dignity of a 
prince to ally himself with a tyrant It is said that a certain 
Egyptian monarch expostulated with a king of Samos on 
his tyranny and cruelty, and summoned him to change his 
conduct ; as he did not do so, he sent word to him that he 
renounced his friendship and alliance. 

Conquest does not give a right of itselfl As long as a 
people subsists it is a pledge of peace and of the reparation 
of wrong; if it is dispersed or destroyed, it is a monument 
of tyranny. 

Treaties of peace are so sacred among men, that k would 
seem as if they were the voice of nature demanding her 
rights. They are aD legitimate when the conditions are such 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



that both nations can preserve themselves ; unless this b the 
case, the community which must perish, if deprived of its 
natural defence by peace, may seek it in war. 

For nature, although she has established different degrees 
of strength and weakness among men, has often equalized 
strength and weakness by means of despair. 

Paris, the 4th of the moon of Zilhage, 1716. 



LETTER XCVIL 

THE FIRST EUNUCH TO USBEK. 
At Paris. 

Several yellow women have reached here from the King- 
dom of Visapour. I have purchased one of them for 
your brother, the governor of Mazenderan, who sent me, a 
month ago, his sublime commands and a hundred tomans. I 
am an expert as far as women are concerned, especially as 
they can no longer deceive me, and my eyesight is not dis- 
turbed by the throbbings of my heart 

I have never before seen such regular and perfect beauty ; 
her sparkling eyes give wonderful animation to her face, and 
let off a glowing complexion that would cast into the shade 
all the charms of Circassia. 

The first eunuch of a merchant of Ispahan bid against 
roe for her ; but she turned away disdainfully from his eyes, 
and seemed to invite mine, as if she would say to me that a 
vile tradesman was not worthy of her, and she was destined 
for a more illustrious spouse. 

I confess I feel a secret joy within my breast when I think 
of the charms of this lovely person ; it seems to me as if I 
beheld her entering the seraglio of your brother. I take a 
delight in foreseeing the astonishment of all his wives ; the 
imperious grief of some, the mute, but more painful, afflio* 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



1/6 

tion of otheis; the malicious condolences of those who 
hope no morei and the enraged ambition of those who hope 
stilL 

I am going from end to end of the kingdom in order to 
change the aspect of an entire seraglia What passions am 
I not about to arouse 1 What fears and sorrows am I not 
preparing \ 

However, in spite of this internal disturbance, matters 
external will be as quiet as ever ; great revolutions will be 
hidden in the depths of the heart ; sorrow will be crushed 
down and joy restrained ; obedience will not be less thorough, 
nor the rules of order less inflexible. Gentleness, being 
constrained to outward show, will emerge even from the 
depths of despair. 

We notice that the more women we have under our eye, 
the less trouble they give us. There is then a greater neces- 
sity of pleasing, less facility for forming combinations, and 
more examples of submission, all of which serve to fetter 
them. They are constantly on the watch for one another ; 
It looks as if they worked with us to render themselves more 
dependent They perform almost half our labor, and open 
our eyes when we close them. What do I say? They irri- 
tate their master against their rivals, and see not how close 
they are to the punishment which these have to endure. 

But all this, magnificent lord, all this is nothing without 
the presence of the master. What can we do with the vain 
phantom of an authority which is never communicated to us 
in its entirety? We are but feeble representatives of the 
half of yourself; we can only show them a severity that 
renders us odious. You temper fear with hope more abso- 
lute when you caress than when you threaten. 

Return, then, magnificent lord, return, and bear to every 
quarter of your domicile the impress of your sovereign 
sway. Come and assuage despairing passion; come and 
remove every excuse for straying ; come and appease mur- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



177 

muring love, rendering even duty lovable. Come, in fine^ 
and relieve your faithful eunuchs fix>m a burden that growa 
heavier eveiy day. 
The Seraglio at Ispahan, the 8th of the moon ol Zilhage, 1716 



LETTER XCVIIL 

USBEK TO KASSEIN, DERVISH OF THE MOUNTAIN 

OF GARON. 

O WISE dervish, whose inquisitive mind is illuminated by so 
many various sciences, hearken to what I am about to tell 
you. 

There are philosophers here, who, indeed, have not at- 
tained the summits of oriental wisdom ; thfiy have not been 
wafted up to the luminous throne, nor have they heard the 
words ineffable, wherewith angelic choirs resound, nor felt 
the dread access of lunacy divine ; but, left to themselves, 
deprived of these holy marvels, they silently pursue the foot- 
prints of human reason. 

You would never believe whither this guide has led them. 
They have interpreted chaos, and explained, by a simple 
mechanism, the order of divine architecture. The Author 
of nature gave motion to matter ; and this was all that was 
necessary in order to produce the prodigious variety of 
effects to be found in the universe. 

Ordinary legislators may propose laws for the regulation 
of human society, laws subject to change, like the minds of 
those who propose and of those who obey them: those 
speak only of general, immutable, eternal laws, which are 
obeyed, without any exception, with order, regularity, and 
illimitable readiness in the immensity of space. 

And what think you, O man divine, are these laws? Yon 
imagine, perhaps, that you are about to enter into the coun- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I7« 

teb and to be astonished by the sublimity of mystery ; you 
renounce in advance all idea of comprehending; you are 
content to admire. 

But you will soon change your thoughts: these laws do 
not dazzle us by an assumed awfuUiess ; it is because they 
are so simple that they have been so lightly esteemed, and 
it is only after much reflection that all the fecimdity and all 
the extent of them have been recognized. 

The first of these laws is that every body tends to describe 
a straight line, unless it meet with some obstacle which turns 
it aside ; and the second, which is only a consequence of 
the first, is that every body revolving round a centre has a 
tendency to fly from it, because the farther it is from that 
centre, the nearer is its course to a straight line. 

And now, O sublime dervish, you have the key to the 
secrets of nature ; here you have certain fruitful principles, 
and from these principles consequences may be drawn of 
which we have as yet no conception, as I intend proving (o 
you in a private letter. 

The knowledge of five or six truths has rendered their 
phOosophy fuU of miracles, and enabled them to perform 
more wonders and prodigies than all those which are related 
of our holy prophets. 

For I have a strong persuasion that if one of our doctors 
was asked to weigh in a balance all the air that surrounds 
the earth, or to measure all the water that falls each year 
upon its surface, he would be rather embarrassed ; and he 
would have thought over the problem at least more than 
four times, before telling the number of leagues sound travels 
in an hour, the time it takes for a ray of light from the sun 
to come to us, the number of fathoms between the earth 
and the planet Saturn, or the curve according to which a 
ship should be cut in order to make it the best sailer 
possible. 

Perhaps if some holy man had adorned the works of these 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



179 

philosophers with lofty and sublime expressions, if he had 
introduced bold figures and mysterious allegories into them, 
he might have made a fine work, ranking next to the Koran. 

However, if you will allow me to say what I feel, I do not 
care very much for the figurative style. Our Koran con- 
tains a great n umber of chil dish things ; at least so it appesui 
to me, although I acknowledge theyHre rendered respect- 
able by the force and vigor of the style. It would seem at 
first sight that inspired books are simply divine ideas stated 
in human language : on the contrary, in our inspired books, 
we find the language of God and the ideas of men ; as if, by 
some whimsical marvel, God had dictated the words and 
man had supplied the thoughts. 

You will, perhaps, say that I speak too freely of what we / 
hold most sacred ; you must consider this 9S the result of / 
the independence characteristic of the countr y in whic h I ' 
live. 

Paus, the 15th of the moon of Chahban, 17 16. 

Q) LETTER XCIX. 

USBEK TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

There is no country in the world in which fortune is so 

fickle as in this. Revolutions happen every ten years, which 

plunge the rich into misery, and raise the poor on rapid 

wings to the pinnacle of opulence. The former are aston- /^^^ ^ 

ished at their poverty ; the latter, at their affluence. The 

newly-made rich man admires the wisdom of Providence ; 

the poor man is amazed at the blind fatality of destiny. 

Those who levy the taxes swim in wealth, and there are 
not many Tantaluses among them. When they enter on 
this business, they are in the lowest misery ; they are de- 



.<rUi 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



■'/ 



i8o 

sptsed like dirt when they are poor; when they become 
rich, they are rather looked up to ; they like to be looked 
up to, so they use every effort to become rich. 

They are at present in a dreadful situation. A Chambe r 
of Justice — so called; apparently, because organized to strip 
tRem d? their wealth — has been lately established. They 
can neither transfer nor conceal their property ; for they are 
obliged to make an exact return of its value, under penalty 
of death : so they have to pass through a rather naiiow 
defile, with money on one side and life on the other. To 
crown their misfortune, there is a minister, famous for his 
wit, who honors them with his jokes ; indeed, for that matter, 
he makes a jest of all the deliberations of the council It is 
not every day that ministers can be found disposed to make 
the people laugh, and this one is at least entided to their 
gratitude for attempting to do so. 
y Nowhere has the corporation of footmen attained ^uch a 

. •; ;» •.' r' 't degree of estimation as in France : it is tKe nursery of great 
h,f J . lords; it fills up the vacuum made in other ranks. Those 

^ ' who compose it take the place of unfortunate noblemeUi 

ruined magistrates, and gentlemen killed in the fury of war; 
and when they are unable to do so in their own persons, 
they re-establish all the great families by means of their 
daughters, who are a sort of manure for the fertilization of 
mountainous and barren soils. 

Wonderful, Ibben, do I find the ways of Providence in 
its distribution of riches. If wealth had been allotted to the 
good alone, the line between it and virtue would not have 
been marked out with sufficient distinctness, and so its 
worthlessness would not have been sufficiently recognized. 
But, when we examine the people who have the largest share 
f!/ 1^ f 7 / / Ji ^^^ of it, by dint of despising the wealthy, we at last come to 
despise wealth itself. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i8i 



LETTER C 

RICA TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 

The caprices of fsashion among the French are really aston- 
ishing. They have forgotten how they were dressed last 
summer, they have still less knowledge as to how they will 
be dressed this winter; but, above all, you would never 
have any idea of how much it costs a husband to have his 
wife in the fashion. What would be the use of me de^ 
scribing to you their habiliments and adornments ? A new 
fashion would come and destroy all my work, as it does that 
of their workwomen, and, before you had received my letter, 
all would be changed. 

A woman who has stayed six months in the country re- 
turns from it almost as much of an antique as if she had 
lived there thirty years. The son does not recognize his 
mother's portrait, so strange does the dress in which she 
was painted appear to him; he imagines it is some fair 
American that is represented there, or else the painter has 
tried to express some fancy of his own. 

Sometimes the coiffures go up slowly and come down 
suddenly — there has been a revolution 1 There was a time 
when their immense height placed the face of a woman in 
her middle ; there was another when it was the feet that 
were in this position. The heels formed a pedestal that 
held them suspended. Would you believe it? architects 
have been obliged to raise or lower or widen doors, to keep 
up with the changes in the dresses of the women, and the 
rules of their art had to bend to such freaks. Sometimes a 
prodigious quantity of patches is seen on a face ; look for 
them the next day and they are all gone. Formerly women 
had figures and teeth ; to-day you don't see either. In this 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I82 

dianging natkm, the daughters are differentljr made from 
their mothers, whatever critics may say to the contzary. 

What I have said of their fiu^ons may also be said of 
their mamiers and style of living. The French change their 
manners with the age of their king. The monarch could 
succeed even in making this people serious, if he chose to 
undertake the task. The prince impresses his mental char« 
acteristics on the court, the court on the city, and the city 
on the provinces. The soul of the sovereign is a mould in 
which all are formed. 

PakiSi the 8th of the moon of Saphar, 1719^ 



LETTER CL 
RICA TO THE SABIE. 

I SFOKX to you the other day of the extraordinary fickleness 
of the French as to their fashions. The obstinacy with 
which they cling to them is inconceivable. The laws of 
fashion determine their opinion of other nations; to this 
standard everything is referred. All that swerves finom it 
always appears to them ridiculous. I confess I cannot rec- 
oncile this furious devotion to fashion with the inconstancy 
which makes them change it every day. 

When I told you they despised everything foreign I should 
have added that this is so only in the case of trifling mat- 
ters ; for, in important ones, they seem to want confidence 
in themselves so much as almost to be open to the charge of 
self-degradation. 

They acknowledge cheerfully that other nations are wiser, 
provided it be granted that they are better dressed. They 
would willingly agree to accept the laws of a foreign nation 
if French peruquiers were in turn to legislate on the form 
of foreign wigs. Nothing makes them feel so proud as the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



i83 

«ipectac]e of their cooks reigning from north to soatfa, and 
their hair-dressers having the mir^ into eyerj dressing* 
room in Europe. 

With these noble advantages, what does it matter if com* 
mon-sense comes to them from other quarters, and if they 
borrow from their neighbors everything of importance in 
their political and civil government? 

Who would ever think that, since more than ten centuries, 
the oldest and most puissant realm in Europe has been 
governed by laws not made for it? If the French had been 
conquered, this would have been hard enough to under- 
stand ; but it is they who are the conquerors. 

They have abandoned the old laws made by their first 
kings in the general assemblies of the nation ; and it is a 
singular fact that the Roman laws they took in their place 
were partly made and pardy arranged by emperors contem- 
poraneous with their own legislators. 

And, that their indebtedness might be complete, and that 
all their common-sense might come from elsewhere, they 
have adopted the constitutions of the Popes in their en- 
tirety, and have made them a new part of their law; that la 
to say, a new species of servitude. 

It is true that, in more recent times, some provincial and 
dvic statutes have been drawn up ; but these are almost all 
taken from the Roman law. 

This abundance of laws adopted and, so to speak, natur- 
alized, is so great that it overwhelms both justice and judges. 
But these volumes of laws are nothing in comparison with 
the awful army of glossers, commentators, and compilers, 
men as weak in intellectual capacity as they are strong in 
virtue of their numbers. 

This is not all : these foreign laws have introduced for- 
malities which are the shame of human reason. It would 
be difficult to decide whether the introduction of formalism 
into jurisprudence has had more pernicious results than its 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



1 84 

ivitrenchment in medicine; whether its ravages have been 
greater under the robe of the jurisconsult than under the 
broad- brimmed hat of the physician; and whether it has 
ruined more people in one case than it has killed in the 
other. 

Paris* the I7tfa of the moon of Saphar, 1717. 



LETTER CIL 

USBEK TO . 

CoMVUtSATiON here is eternally turning on the '^Constita- 
tion.** The other day I entered a house where I saw a cor- 
pulent individual with a ruddy complexion. He was saying in 
a loud voice, ** I have issued my pastoral ; I shall not answer 
your objection ; but read that pastoral, and you will see that 
I have setded all doubts. I sweated over it, I can tell you/* 
he added, pressing his hand to his forehead '^ I had need 
of all my learning, and I have had to read mflny Latin 
authors.** — '^ I can well believe it,'' said another man. *' It 
is a fine work^ and I defy that Jesuit who comes so often to 
see you, to make a better one." ^ ** Read it then,** answered 
the other, ^^and you are sure to learn more about these mat- 
ters in a quarter of an hour than if I spoke to you for two." 
In this way he avoided engaging in conversation, and giving 
a display of his incapacity. But when he was pressed hard, 
he had to leave his intrenchments, and he began to utter 
many theological absurdities, in which he was supported with 
great respect by a dervish. On two of those present denying 
one of his principles, he at first said : ''That is certain ; we 
have so decided, and we are infallible judges." — " But how,'* 
I asked, " are you infallible judges ? " — " Do you not know,'* 
he retorted, " that we are enlightened by the Holy Ghost?" 
— * '' That is fortunate," I rejoined, ** for after the manner in 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



185 

which I heard jaa speak to-day, you have great need cl 

enlightenmeDt" 

PAEia^ the i8Ui of tlie moon of ReblatH I7I^ 



LETTER cm. 

USBEK TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

Thb most powerful states in Europe are those of the Em- 
peror, and of the kings of France, Spain, and England. 
Italy and a great part of Germany are cut up into an infi- 
nite number of petty states, whose princes are, properly 
speaking, martyrs to sovereignty. Our glorious sultan has 
more wives than most of these princes have subjects. Those 
of Italy, not being united, are the most to be pitied ; their 
states are open like caravansaries, in which they are obliged 
to lodge the first comers ; they have, therefore, to ally them- 
selves with^ great princes, with whom they share their fears 
rather than their fidendship. 

Most European governments are monarchical, or rather 
are styled so : for I do not know that there ever has been a 
really monarchical government ; if there has, it cannot have 
existed long. It is a highly strained condition, which always 
ends in a despotism or a republic. Power can never be 
equidly divided between prince^and people; the balance is 
too difficult to keep: power must diminish on one side, 
while it increases on the other ; but the advantage is gener- 
ally with the prince, for he controls the army. 

Accordingly, the power of the kings of Spain is very 
great ; indeed, it may be said to be as great as they wish to 
make it ; but they do not exercise it so extensively as our 
sultans. In the first place, because they are unwilling to 
ofiend the manners and religion of their subjects; and 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



l86 

•econdlyi because it is against their interests to cany it so 
far. 

Nothing brings our princes nearer to the condition of 
their subjects than the immense power they exercise over 
them; nothing renders them more subject to the reverses 
and the caprices of fortune. 

Their custom of putting to death all those who displease 
them, for the slightest fault, destroys the proportion which 
ought to exist between crime and punishment, and which is 
the life of states and the harmony of empires ; and this 
proportion, being scrupulously observed by Christian princes, 
gives them an immense advantage over our sultans. 

A Persian who by imprudence or ill fortune has drawn 
down upon his head the wrath of the monarch is certain of 
death ; the slightest error or the slightest caprice determines 
his fJEite. But, if he had attempted the life of his sovereign, 
if he had intended to delivier his fortresses to the enemy, he 
would have expiated the crime by the loss of his life : he 
runs no greater risk in the latter case than in the former. 

Accordingly, at the slightest loss of favor, seeing that no 
greater misfortune could happen to him, the only resource 
left him is to throw the state into confusion and conspire 
against the sovereign. 

It is not the same with the grandees of Europe, who, when 
out of favor, simply lose the good will and countenance of 
the prince. They withdraw from court, and are satisfied to 
live a quiet life and enjoy the advantages of their birth. As 
their lives are seldom in danger except for the crime of high 
treason, the knowledge that they have thereby little to gain 
and much to lose is an effectual bar to any attempt in that 
direction ; as a consequence, there are few rebellions, and 
few princes die a violent death. 

If, with their unlimited power, our princes did not use so 
many precautions looking to their self-preservation, they 
would not live a day ; and if they had not in their pay a 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



187 

multitude of soldiers to tyrannize over the rest of their sub 
jects, their empire would not last a month. 

Some four or five centuries ago, a king of France raised 
guards, contrary to the custom of the times, to protect him- 
self from the assassins a petty prince of Asia had sent to kill 
him ; till then, the French kings had lived tranquilly among 
their subjects, like fathers among their children. 

Although the kings of France have no power to deprive, 
of their own motion, a single one of their subjects of hfe, as 
our sultans have, yet, on the other hand, they always carry 
about with them mercy for criminals. It is sufficient for a 
man to be fortunate enough to see the august features of his 
prince to become at once worthy of living. These monarcha 
are like the sun, bringing warmth and life everywhere. 



LETTER CIV. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

To follow out the train of thought in my last letter, I will teD 
you in this what a rather sensible European said to me the 
other day : — 

" The worst course the princes of Asia could adopt is to 
conceal themselves as they do. Their intention is to excite 
the veneration of their subjects ; but it is royalty they cause 
to be venerated and not the sovereign, and whatever attach* 
ment they awaken is for the throne, not for its occupant 

" When the governing power is invisible, it is always the 
same for the people. Although ten kings, whom it knows 
only by name, may have had their throats cut one after the 
other, it does not feel any difference ; it is as if it had been 
governed by a succession of spirits. 

" If the detestable assassin of our great King Henry IV. 
had murdered an eastern sovereign, he would have taken 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



188 

possession of the royal seal and of an immense treasare, 
apparently amassed for his benefit, and would have timnquilly 
seized the reins of power, undisturbed by a single protest on 
behalf of his king^ or his king's family and children. 

" Astonishment has been expressed at the absence of 
change in the governments of eastern princes ; but is not 
this due to the hideous tyranny exercised by these govern- 
ments? 

" Changes can be introduced only by the prince or by 
the people ; but there the princes do not care for change, 
because they have all the power they can have ; any change 
would be to their disadvantage. 

** As for the subjects, if any of them should have a certain 
plan in view, he cannot execute it on the state ; to do so, it 
would be necessary that he should at once introduce some 
counterpoise for the formidable and unique power abready 
existing ; but time is wanting to him as well as means ; he 
has only, however, to march straight to the source of that 
power, and then he requires Qnly an arm and a moment 

** The murderer mounts the throne ; the monarch descends 
from it, Ms, and expires at his feet. 

** In Europe a malcontent's hopes of success depend on 
carrying on a secret correspondence, joining the enemies ot 
his country, seizing on some foitress or exciting vain mur- 
murs among the people ; in Asia, he would go direcdy to 
the prince, astonish, strike, and overthrow. He would blot 
out the very memdry of his sovereign ; and, in an instant, 
would be slave and master, in an instant, usurper and lawful 
prince. 

*' Unhappy the king who has oniy^one head 1 Upon it 
would seem to be united all his power solely for the purpose 
of showing to the first usurper where he shidl find that power 
in its entirety 1 " 

Paris, 17th of the moon of Refaiab i, 1717. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



189 



LETTER CV. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

All the nations of Europe are not equally submissive to 
their princes. For example : the impatient temper of the 
English allows their king little time to strengthen his author- 
ity. Submission and obedience are by no means the virtues 
on which they pride themselves. On this subject they say 
some very extraordinary things. According to them, grati- 
tude is the only bond of attachment between man and man. 
A husband, a wife, a father and son, are united only by the 
love they bear one another, or the services they render one 
another; and these different motives of gratitude are the 
origin of all kingdoms and of all communities. 

But if a prince, instead of making his subjects happy, 
tries to oppress and ruin them, the ground-work of obedience 
is removed ; no bond or tie attaches them to him, and they 
recover their natural liberty. They hold that unlimited 
power cannot be legitimate, because it cannot have a legiti- 
mate origin. " For we cannot," they say, " give more 
power over us to another than we have over ourselves. But 
we have not unlimited power over ourselves ; we cannot, for 
instance, take our own life. Nobody on earth, therefore,'^ 
they conclude, " has such power." 

The crime of high treason is, according to them, nothing 
else than the crime which the weaker commits against the 
stronger by disobedience, nor does the nature of the disobe- 
dience matter. Thus, the English nation, finding that it was 
the stronger in a contest with one of its kings, declared 
that it was treason for a prince to make war upon his sub- 
jects. The English have good reason, then, for saying that 
the precept of their Koran enjoining submission to the 
powers that be, is not very hard to follow, since it is impos- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I90 

sible for them not to obey it, inasmuch as they are under an 
obligation to submit, not to the most virtuous, but to the 
strongest 

They teU how one of their kings, after he had conquered 
and taken prisoner a prince who disputed his right to the 
crown, reproached his rival with his fisuthlessness and per- 
fidy. ''Only a moment ago/' retorted the unfortunate 
prince, ** it was decided which of us was the traitor." 

A usurper declares those who have not oppressed the coun- 
try, like him, to be rebels ; and, believing there are no laws 
where he sees no judges, he causes the caprices of chance 
and fortune to be revered as if they were decrees of heaven. 

Paris, the aoth of the moon of Rebiah a, 17 17. 



(.: LETTER CVI. / J[^ / 

RHEDI TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

You have discoursed much, in one of your letters, of the 
s ciences and a rts cultivated in the West. I am afraid you , 
will regard me as a barbarian when I say that the advantage 
derived from them does not compensate mankind for the ill 
use to which they are put every day. 

I have heard it stated that the invention of bombs has 
deprived all the nations of Europe of their liberty. Princes 
no longer able to intrust the defence of their towns to the 
citizens, who would surrender them at the furst bomb, have 
found this a pretext for keeping large bodies of regular 
troops, by whose agency they have been enabled to opprq t 
th^r subj ects. 

You know that, since the invention of gunpowder, no for- 
tress is impregnable ; that is to say, Usbek, that there b no 
longer upon earth an asylum against injustice and violence. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



191 

I am always In terror lest some secret or other should be 
at length discovered that will not only kill men, but destroy 
entire tribes and nations. 

You have read the historians: give them, then, your 
serious attention. Almost all monarchies have been foun ded 
on^ an ignorance of the arts, and have perished becaus e they 
have ^eelTcuIt ivatedntb excess. In the ancient empire of 
Persia, we havel domestic example. 

I have not been a very long time in Europe, yet I have 
heard a good deal about the ravages of chemistry, and that, 
too, from sensible people. It would seem to be a fourth 
plague, destroying men, and destroying them one by one, 
and yet continually ; while war, pestilence, and famine de- 
stroy them wholesale, but at intervals. 

How have we been benefited by the invention of the 
compass, and by the discovery of so many nations, who have ,• ' ' • • '/ 
communicated to us their diseases rather than their wealth? y| */ i /f 
Gold and silver had been established, by a general agree- 
ment, as the purchasing medium for all merchandise and a 
token of their value, because these metals were rare and 
useless for any other purpose. What did it matter to us, 
then, that they should become more common, and that, in 
order to mark the value of a commodity, we must have 
two or three signs instead of one? This was only more 
inconvenient 

But, on the other hand, this invention has been the ruin 
of the countries in which it has been discovered. Entire 
nations have been destroyed, and those who escaped death 
were reduced to a slavery so frightful that the recital of it 
had made Mussulmans shudder. 

Happy are the children of Mahomet in their ignorance ! } t '],' ' '^ 
Amiable simplicity, so dear to our holy Prophet, thou le- : ^ , \. 
mindest me alwatys of the innocence of ancient times, and [ '^^ f>'f'<''(^'<f 
the peace that reigned in the hearts of our first fathers I 
Venice, the 5th of the moon of Rbamaunn, 1717. 



wM 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



r 



,•■-/ •. '.'.•/■/ 



© 



192 

(IO(j) 



LETTER CVIL 



V^'l'j ll 



^ USBEK TO RHEDI 

At Vbnici. 



ErTHER you do not think as you say, or you act better than 
you think. You left your country for the sake of knowl- 
edge, and now you tell me you despise all knowledge ; you 
come to a country where the fine arts are cultivated, and 
you regard them as pernicious. Shall I tell you my thought, 
Rhedi? I am in better accord with you than you are with 
yourself. 

Have you well reflected on the barbarous and unfortunate 
condition into which the loss of the art s would plunge us? 
It is not necessary to imagine it ; it can be seen. There are 
still communities upon the earth among whom a passably 
educated monkey might live with honor; he would find 
himself pretty nearly on a level with the rest of the inhabi- 
tants. They would not consider his disposition peculiar, or 
his character fantastic \ he would not be thought at all differ- 
ent from his fellows, except in the possession of a certain 
degree of elegance to which they were strangers. 

You say that the founders of empires have almost a ll 
been ignorant of the arts. I do not deny that barbarous 
races have 'spreaS over the earth, rushing like impetuous 
torrents, and covering with their ferocious armies the most 
/ civilized kingdoms. But do not forget this fact : they have . 

' '^ ^ / i^ then either learned the arts themselves, or made the nations ,' 
/ / .H^iA^f they conquered continue to cultivate them; had they not/ 
done so, their power would have passed away like the roar^ 
of a thunder-storm. 

You fear, say you, the invention of some method of de- 
struction more cruel than any in present use. No ; were 
such a fatal invention to be devised, it would soon be pro- 



f.H 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



193 . 

hibited by t he law of nations and cnlshed out of ex istence O^w rt5 /i' 
by unanimous consen t To make conquests by such meant ^(Lftrr.i ^uvrt fJ" 
is not in harmony with the interests of princes : they seek 
subjects, not lands. 

You complain of the invention of gunpowder and bombs; 
you are amazed that no fortress should be any longer im- 
pregnable ; and this means, if it mean anything, that you are ^ a^ ^^^^ A ^ /^ 
amazed because wa rs are to-day more speedily termin ated /' 

than they were formerly. 

Surely you must have remarked, if you read history, that, 
since the invention of gunpowder, battles are much less y-t ttU^ u ^^ *'^ ^' 
bloody than they were, because there are now hardly any ^ 
hand-to-hand encounters. 

And why should an art be rejected because in some par- 
ticular case it is found to be injurious? Do you think, 
Rhedi, that because the religion brought down from Heaven 
by our holy Prophet shall one day confound the faithless 
Christians, it is, therefore, to be rejected? 

You believe that the arts debilitate nations and are the 
cause of the fall of empires. You speak of the destruction 
of the ancient Persian kingdom, which was the consequence 

of the effeminacy of its inhabita nts ; but very far, indeed, is »v ^t' H 'f f ' ^ - 1 ' 
this example from being decisive, for the Greeks , who sub- 
dued it, were infinitely more devoted to the cultivation of 
the arts than they. 

When it is affirmed that the arts make men unmanly, the 
statement can certainly not refer to those who work at them, ^^ l/y/ss^ 
for they cannot be accused of idleness, which, of all vices, is 
the most fatal to courage. 

The allusion, then, must be to those who enjoy the fruits 
of production. But, as in every civilized country, those able 
to enjoy the products of one art are obliged to cultivate 
another, if they do not wish to see themselves reduced to a 
shameful poverty, it follows that idleness ancf effeminacy aie 
incompatible with the arts. 

13 



*/ ' t f i^i ^, 



\ n 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



194 

Taris is perhaps the most luxurious city in the worid, the 
i ' ''^/^ one in which the various pleasures are brought to the most 

delicate perfection, and yet, in no other city is life so labo- 
rious. In order that one man may live delicately, a hundred 
must work incessandy. A woman takes it into her head 
that she must appear at a party in a certain dress ; from that 
moment, fifty workmen must bid £uewell to sleep and give 
up all thought of eating and drinking. She commands, and 
she is more promptly obeyed than our monarch would be, 
for self-interest is the greatest monarch on the earth. 

This ardor for labor, this passion for wealth, passes from 
rank to rank, from the artisan to the nobleman. No one 
would be poorer than the man immediately below him. 
You may see a man at Paris who has enough to support 
him till the day of judgment, yet who toils on unceasingly 
and runs the risk of shortening his days, to make a liveli- 
hood, he will tell you. 

The same spirit exbts throughout the country ; labor and 
•/ ' • '' ' .' industry meet the eye everywhere : where, then, is the effem- 
"! inate people of which you speak so much ? . 

Let us suppose, Rhedi, a kingdom in which only those 
arts absolutely necessary for the cultivation of the soil are 
allowed — and, by the way, these are very numerous — and 
that all those are banished which subserve the needs of 
luxury or &ncy ; I hold that such a kingdom would be the 
most wretched in the world. 

Though the inhabitants were courageous enough to dis- 
pense with so many dimgs that they would yet need badly, 
the people would gradually perish, and the nation would 
become so enfeebled that any petty litde power could con- 
quer it with ease. 

I might enter into long details, and show you that the 
incomes of individuals would almost cease entirely, and, 
consequendy, th#se of the prince as well. There would be 
hardly any exchange of goods among the citizens ; that cir- 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



;lifr:, f:'(* 



195 

eulation of wealth and that extension of incomes, which is 
the result of the interdepeng ^ce of the art s, would come to 
an absolute standstill ; each one would live on his land, and 
would take from it precisely what was needed to prevent 
him from dying of hunger. But, as that would not be the 
hundredth part of the revenue of a kingdom, the number of 
the inhabitants would have to diminish proportionally, and 
only a hundredth part of them would remain. 

Give your careful attention to the amount reached by tlie'^ 
revenues of industry. Land produces annually to its owner 
just the twentieth part of its value ; but, with the colors for 
which he pays a pistole, a painter will make a picture worth 
fifty. The same may be said of goldsmiths, workers in wool 
and silk, and of all kinds of ^jlisans* 

From all which it may be inferred, Rhedi, that, if a prince yf/^ y:< 1 7 ^^ ^^c^ ' 
is to be powerful, his subjects must live in luxury ; and he . < 
must labor with as much earnestness to procure them all '^ ^ V 
the superfluities of life, as he should to procure them its 
necessities. 

Paus» the 14th of the moon of Cbalval, 1717. 



LETTER CVIII. 

RICA TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

I HAVE seen the young monarch : his life is very precious 
in the eyes of his subjects, and not less so in those of 
Europe, because of the serious calamities his death might 
produce. But kings are like gods, and, as long as they live, 
must be thought immortal. His countenance is majestic, 
but charming withaL A fine education seems in him to 
harmonize with a happy disposition, and there is akeady 
promise of a great prince. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



196 

It is said that the character of western Icings can never be 
known until it has been tested by two great trials : the selec- 
tion of their confessor and of their mistress. We shall soon 
be witness of the efforts of both to control the mind of this 
young prince, and may look forward to terrible struggles. 
For, under a youthful sovereign, these two powers are always 
rivals; but, under an old one, they are conciliatory, and 
form a coalition. Under a young prince, the dervish has a 
very difficult character to sustain : the strength of the king 
is in his weakness ; but the mistress triumphs over both his 
strength and weakness. 

When I arrived in France, I found the late king absolutely 
governed by women. And yet, at his age, one might have 
imagined that there was no monarch in the world who had 
less need of them. I heard a woman saying one day: 
"Something must be done for this young colonel; his 
merit is well known to me ; I will speak to the minister." 
Another remarked : '< It is surprising that young abb^ should 
have been forgotten ; he should be a bishop ; he is a man of 
birth, and I can answer for his morals." You must not 
imagine, however, that the speakers were favorites of the 
prince ; they had not, perhaps, addressed a word to him 
twice in their lives, and European princes are, nevertheless, 
very easy of access. But, in fact, there is not a single person 
employed at court, in Paris or the provinces, who has not 
a woman through whose hands pass all the favors, and some- 
times all the wrongs, he can do. These women are all con- 
nected together in some way or other, and form a species of 
republic whose members are always active in the task of 
mutual aid and succor : it is a sort of state within a state ; 
and the observer at court, or in Fans and the provinces, who 
is a witness of the acts of ministers, magistrates, and prelates, 
if he be not acquainted with the women governing them, is 
like a man who sees a machine at work, but knows nothing 
of the springs. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



197 

Do you think, Ibben, that a woman takes it into her head 
to be the mistress of a minister solely in order to sleep with 
him ? What an idea ! she does so in order to lay before 
him five or six petitions every morning; and the natural 
goodness of the sex is evidenced by the eagerness these 
women display in helping along a multitude of unfortunate 
people, whereby they acquire incomes of a hundred thou- 
sand livres for themselves. 

It is a frequent complaint in Persia that the kingdom is 
governed by two or three women. It is worse in France, 
where women universally govern, and not only take posses- 
sion of all authority wholesale, but afterwards even proceed 
to retail it among themselves. 

PxaiSy the last day of the moon of Chalval, 1717. 



LETTER CIX. 
USBEK TO 



They have a species of book here with which we are unac- 
quainted in Persia, but which would seem to be very fash- 
ionable in France; it is the journal. Idleness feels itself 
flattered by its perusal. It is enchanting to be able to run 
through thirty volumes in a quarter of an hour. 

In most books the author has hardly paid the usual com- 
pliments before he has his readers in confusion. He plunges 
them, in an almost lifeless condition, into a subject sub- 
merged under a sea of words. One writer would immor- 
talize himself by a duodecimo; another, by a quarto; 
another, with vaster ambitions, by a folio. He must, there- 
fore, extend his subject in proportion, — and this he does 
pitilessly, reckoning his unfortunate reader's trouble as noth- 
ing, who kills himself in the effort to reduce what the author 
has taken such pains to amplify. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



I9S 

I cannot see, , what merit there is in such works. 

I could make as good ones myself if I wanted to ruin my 
health and a publisher. 

The great error of journalists is to speak only of new 
books ; as if truth were ever new I It seems to me that, 
until a man has read all the old books, there b no reason 
why he should prefer the new. 

But, when they established a law for themselves that they 
must never speak of any works except those hot from the 
press, they also established another which is very tiresome. 
They do not, for some reason or other, care to criticise the 
books from which they make extracts ; and, in fact, where is 
the man so daring 'as to risk the creation of ten or twelve 
enemies every month? 

Most authors resemble poets, who will take a caning with 
equanimity, but who, though uninterested in their shoulders, 
are so jealous of their works that they cannot bear the 
slightest criticism of them. It is, therefore, very necessary 
to be careful not to attack them in a spot so sensitive, and 
the journalists know this well, consequently they begin with 
a laudation of the subject treated. This is the first sign of 
their stupidity. Then, they praise the author, and any one 
can see the praise is forced ; and yet they have to do with 
people who are always on the watch, always ready to insist 
on a large measure of justice for themselves, and alwajrt 
ready to annihilate an over-bold journalist with pen-thrusts. 

Pxais, the 5th of the moon of Zilcade, 171S. 



LETTER ex. 

RICA TO . 

The University of Paris is the eldest daughter of the kings 
of France, and very *' eldest " she may be styled, for she is 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



199 

more than nine hundred years old ; accordingly, she dotea 
now and then. 

I have been told that, some time ago, she had a terrible 
quarrel with certain doctors anent the letter Q,^ which she 
would have pronounced ''K." The dispute became so warm 
that some had their property taken from them in conse- 
quence. It required the intervention of the Parliament to 
terminate the quarrel, which it did by a solemn decree grant- 
ing permission to all subjects of the king of France to pro- 
nouijce this letter as their fancy dictated. It was a glorious 
spectacle, that of the two most illustrious bodies in Europe 
occupied in deciding the fate of a letter of the alphabet. 

It would seem, my dear , as if the heads of the 

grea test men grow narrow when thev are brought togeth er, 
and^ that where wise men m /^ct ^q nrxn^^^f^^ »K#>r^ y/^M 

have least wisdojp . Great bodies are always so absorbed in 
petty details, vain usages, and forms, that the essentials have 
often to go to the rear. 

I have heard that a king of Aragon,* having assembled 
the States of Aragon and Catalonia, the first sessions were 
employed in deciding as to the language in which the pro- 
ceedings were to be conducted. The dispute was lively, 
and the States would have broken up a thousand times, if an 
expedient had not been devised. This lucky expedient was 
that the question should be put in Catalan and the answer in 
Aragonese. 

Paris, the 25th of the moon of Zilhage, 1717. 

LETTER CXI. 

RICA TO . 

The role of a pretty woman is much more serioas than yoa 
would fancy. Nothing could be of graver consequence than 

^ H« means the quarrel of Ramus. ^ It was in t6ia 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



200 , 

k 

what takes place at her toilet every o|pmmg among her ser- 
vants. The general of an army does not give more atten- 
tion to the disposition of his right or of his reserves than 
she to the arrangement of a patch, which may miss fire, but 
from which she hopes or predicts a conquest 

What mental anxiety and care is incessantly required to 
reconcile the interests of two rivals, in order to appear neu- 
tral towards both, while she has surrendered to each, and 
act as mediatrix on all the subjects of complaint, of which 
she is really the cause ! 

And then, what an engrossing occupation it is to arrange 
party after party, to be responsible for their success and 
revival, and to anticipate all the accidents that might cause 
their failure 1 

Nor are these the most serious troubles ; the greatest of 
all is, not to be amused, but to appear to be so. Bore the 
ladies as much as you choose, they will pardon you, 
provided you can make them believe you think they are 
enjoying themselves. 

Some days ago, I was at a supper given by certain ladies 
in the country. On the way they never stopped saying, 
*' At least, we are sure of plenty of amusement, and we shall 
all be very gay." 

We were rather badly assorted, and consequently rather 
slow. ** We are having quite a pleasant time, are we not ? " 
said one of the women. " I am quite sure there is not a 
party in Paris so merry as ours is to-day." As I was begin- 
ning to be utterly wearied by the whole thing, a woman 
shook me, and said : " WeU, is not this delightful ? "— *' Yes," 
I answered with a yawn, " I am ready to die with laughing." 
But all our efforts could not make head against our dulness; 
as for myself, I felt myself fisJling from yawn to yawn into • 
drowsy condition that ended all my pleasure. 

Fxais, the nth of the moon of Maharram, 1717. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2f K> 

• / Likc <^ ;■!..' r» , '. » i(>.!«'t e\crv ni-Mn> .; .1:11 • • 
..<-j.s 'i . • : .r >f an ;v.i:y (i..<*s uoX LT.ve •• 

r. ,;] t ) t' . • • ' '11 I'f ! « ri^i.t ^-r 01 1 '^ ' 
sh»» u> *• K .• '.".'jux <A a i'.ii«"u \vlii< :; may . 

fr.)ni %^ • .I'l'^s or \,ri'' - *^ a 'Xh:- •:«>t. 

\\ ' • • ' :i:.\' ty aT '1 .'i' is iiK'cs^in^y i* 

Tf . ' . -Is of * . n\,»V. in Oi'l'T to .. 

, "*' ■ lias -.uircii'.!'. tih! i.j 

. ' :i -ul'jf '^ of coi'.jn /.:;*. 



aM ' : "tf! :«'.i .'.I- ::(( i '..;.' I its li.ai ii 



I 



N'^r a"* * " t.'if' I'- -• .- * .< s troui ' s : t' 
a.l is, not *. ' - ■..^•■•1, . » Nj a' i^fir to I' - . 
la iu-.i a> : . as > . '.•.».♦., i-.-y w..; . •■ 
pr-'.'iltj. , ' 111 ni » '• '.. 1) I) li' vo y(»u I'.", 
erj )vi-i.> •. . ■.^ivs, 

S": :- . a,o, I •• .1 ^^^l"l(.•r gl\t*n by ce- . 
'II t ■ • '.try. t ■• : .■* way ir* y n^'\er st- ,>;■' 
•• ' ' •\wc;i:f''> • : jH't'iiiy of ai.'.u .^" ijf'nt, «i' ' 
; ^.>.y.'" 

•■'.' r.r'' • ■ . V r "' v], and consen*i 

AC \- . J •^*. . a;'''asa':t l.ri.c, t 

• ■' • '. "I :tni •', 'it'* s'lre ■ 

- (^'irs is ti)-«iav.*' .'\* 

- >\ 1)V t!i^» \\:i./i'.' '"• 

.". ;!.:s ii A iWiii d'] 'mI:*" 
■ ' . •.., " I am T' .vl\ t(/ i.-f* wi'i' . 

!>.* • ' ■ ^a m.'l.c lur-1 v-'^^^-^t oar 

ai. t. . . "* <"'' . .t: tr >:i> \. ^mi lo y i •• ■ 

di'iw'jy .1' * :' '"1 all my \ ' i are. 

Pa- a liC n-iv)v,r' ). .l.i'. ii'Ai'i, 1717. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



20I 

LETTER CXIL 

USBEK TO . 

The reign of the late king was so long that its end had made 
the beginning forgotten. It has now, however, become the 
fashion to be interested in the events that occurred during 
his minority, and the memoirs of those times are being 
eagerly devoured. 

I send you a discourse which one of the Paris generals 
pronounced in a council of war; I confess I cannot make 
much of it. 

'' Messieurs, although our troops have been repulsed with 
loss, I think it will be easy for us to repair this check. I 
have six couplets ready for publication which, I am assured, 
will restore the balance. I have selected some wonderfully 
clear voices which, issuing from the cavity of certain veiy 
powerful chests, will have a marvellous effect upon the 
people. These couplets are set to an air that has hereto- 
fore created much enthusiasm. 

" If this does not succeed, we intend bringing out a print 
representing the hanging of Mazarin. 

'' Fortunately for us, he does not speak French well, and 
his mispronunciation is of such an absurd character that his 
fortunes must decline. 

" We are constantly pointing out the ridiculous nature of 
it to the people. We discovered him committing a gram- 
matical mistake, a few days ago, of such a ludicrous character 
that it has thrown all the streets into convulsions. 

" I expect that before eight days the people will make the 
name Mazarin a generic epithet for all beasts of burden and 
all beasts of draught. 

" Since our defeat, our songs about original sin have stung 
him so terribly that, from the dread of seeing his partisans 
reduced to half, he has dismissed all his pages. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2Q2 

^ Rcmse yourselves then ; take courage, and be sme that 
we shall before long hiss him across the mountains back into 
his own country." 

Pau% the 4th of the moon of Chahhan, 171S. 



LETTER CXIIL 

RHEDI TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

I AM reading during, my residence in Europe, the ancient 
and modem hbtorianst and comparing the different ages. 1 
feel a certain pleasure in seeing them pass in review before 
me, and my attention is especially arrested by those great 
changes which have rendered century so different from 
century, and the earth so unlike herself. 

You may have had your attention, perhaps, attracted to a 
circumstance that causes me fresh surprise every day. How 
is it that the world is so little populated to-day, in com- 
parison with what it was formeriy? How is it that nature 
has lost the marvellous fecundity she possessed in eariier 
ages? Is it that she has already attained old age and is now 
on the verge of decline ? 

I have been for more than a year in Italy, where I have 
seen only the remains of that ancient Italy so fiunous of 
yore. Although all the natives live in towns, yet are these 
towns almost deserted and uninhabited. It would seem as 
if they still existed only to mark the sites of those powerful 
cities of which history has so much spoken. There are 
people who claim that the single city of Rome formerly con- 
tained more inhabitants than the laigest kingdom of Europe 
has to-day. It was no uncommon circumstance for a 
Roman citizen to have ten and even thuty thousand slaves, 
not reckoning those who worked in his country houses ; and 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



203 

as the number of citizens is supposed to have amounted to 
four or five hundred thousand, to attempt to fix the number 
of inhabitants would astound the imagination. 

Sicily formerly possessed powerful kingdoms and numer- 
ous nations, which have since disappeared ; it has now noth- 
ing worthy of consideration except its volcanoes. 

Greece is so deserted that it does not contain the hun- 
dredth part of its former inhabitants. 

In Spain, once so populous, we see to-day only deserted 
plains ; and France bears no comparison in this respect with 
that ancient Gaul of which Caesar speaks. 

The countries of the north are thinned ; the people there 
are very far from the time when, on account of their excess 
of members, they were obliged to send forth tribes and col- 
onies and entire nations to seek for new homes. 

Poland and Turkey in Europe have almost no inhabitants. 

In America, the two hundredth part of the men who 
formed such great empires on that continent can no longer 
be found there. 

Asia is but little better off in this respect That famous 
Asia Minor, which held within its bosom so many potent 
realms and so prodigious a number of great cities, has now 
but two or three of either. As for greater Asia, the por- 
tion of it subject to the Turks is not better supplied; and if 
we contrast the present state of the part which our kings 
control with its flourishing condition formerly, we shall see 
that it contains but a very small proportion of the countless 
numbers that owned the authority of Xerxes and Darius. 

As for the litde states around these great empires, they 
are really deserts : such are the kingdoms of Irimetta, Cir- 
cassia, and Guriel Their princes, although their realms are 
wide, have hardly fifty thousand subjects. 

What has been stated with regard to other countries can 
also be said of Egypt 

In fine, I travel tiirough the whole earth, and find on iti 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



204 

mahct nothing but decay : it presents the aspect of a planei 
ravaged by pestflence and famine. 

Africa has always been an unknown continent, and cannot 
be described with the same exactness as the other parts of 
the world. But the coasts of the Mediterranean have been 
well known in all ages, and their condition affords sufficient 
evidence of how greatly it has fallen away since the time 
when it was a Roman province. To-day, its princes are of 
less account than those of any part of the world. 

After making a calculation as precise as can be attempted 
with reference to a subject of this nature, I have come to the 
conclusion that the earth has not now the fiftieth part of the 
population it had in the time of Caesar. The most surpris- 
ing phase of the question is that it is becoming less and less 
populous every day, and if this continues, in ten centuries it 
will be a desert 

And now, my dear Usbek, you have before your eyes the 
most terrible catastrophe that has ever happened in the 
world ; but it has scarcely received any attention, because it 
has happened imperceptibly and in the course of a great 
number of ages ; now, this must be the symptom <^ an inter- 
nal disease, a secret and hidden poison, a malady of decay 
which is scourging human nature. 

ViMica, the lotfa of the moon of Rh^ieb^ 1718b 



LETTER CXIV. 

^^ USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venici. 

The world, my dear Rhedi, is not incorruptible ; not 
the heavens are, for that matter: astronomers are ocular 
witnesses of all the changes that are the very natural effects 
of the universal movement of matter. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



205 

The earth, like the other planets, is subject to the same 
laws of motion ; she has to endure a perpetual internal 
struggle among her elements : sea and continent appear to 
be engaged in everlasting war; every instant produces new 
combinations. 

The abode of men being so liable to changes, their condi- 
tion must be equally uncertain : a hundred thousand causes 
may be in action, the most insignificant of which can destroy 
them, and, with stronger reason, increase or diminish their 
number. 

I will not speak of those particular catastrophes, so 
common among historians, which have overwhelmed cities 
and entire kingdoms: there have been general ones also, 
which have often brought the human race within an inch of 
annihilation. 

History is full of those universal plagues, which have in 
turn desolated the universe. They tell of one, among many 
others, so violent in its nature that it burned up the roots of 
plants, and its effects spread through the known world, even 
to the Empire of Cathay ; had it attained one degree more 
of corruption, all human nature would, perhaps, have perished 
in a single day. 

Not two centuries ago, the most shameful of all diseases 
reached Europe, Asia and Africa ; in a short time, it pro- 
duced prodigious effects : had its progress continued with 
the same fury, the human race would have been swept away. 

Consumed by diseases from their birth, incapable of sup- 
porting the burden of social obligations, they would have 
miserably perished. 

What would have been the result, if the poison had been 
a little more virulent? — and it would have doubtless become 
so if a remedy had not fortunately been discovered more 
powerful than the disease. Perhaps this malady, attacking 
the organs of generation, would, at last, have attacked gene- 
ration itself. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2o6 

But why speak of the destniction which might have hap- 
pened to the human race ? Has it not happened in reality, 
and did not the Deluge reduce mankind to a single family? 

Can those who are acquainted with nature, and have a 
reasonable idea of God, comprehend that matter and all 
created things have existed only six thousand years; that 
God has post[>oned His works during all eternity and used 
His creative power only yesterday? Was it because He was 
not able, or because He was not willing? But, if He was not 
able at one time, He could not be able at another. It is, 
then, because He was not willing. But, as there is in God 
no order of succession, if it is admitted that He has willed 
anything once, He has willed it always, and from the beginning. 

We need not, then, calculate the years of the world's 
existence ; as weD attempt to calculate the number of the 
sands at the bottom of the sea. 

However, all historians speak of a first father ; they show 
ns human nature at its birdi. Is it not reasonable to think 
that Adam was saved from a common misfortune, as Noah 
was in the Deluge, and that these great events have been 
frequent on the earth, since the creation of the universe? 

But all destruction is not of a violent character. We see 
several parts of the earth grow weary of furnishing subsistence 
to men ; how do we know that the entire earth is not af- 
fected by universal causes of lassitude, — causes that are slow 
and imperceptible? 

I have been very glad to give you these general ideas 
before answering in more detail your letter on the depopula- 
tion that has been occurring during the last seventeen and 
eighteen centuries. In my next letter, I wOl prove to you 
that moral causes independent of physical ones have pro« 
duced this effect 

Pxais, th« 8th of the moon of Chahban, 171S. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



207 

LETTER CXV. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

Yoir ask why the earth is less populous now than it was for- 
merly ; if you pay close attention^ you will be able to see 
that the cause of this difference is purely moral. 

Ever since the Christian and Mahometan religions have 
shared the Roman world between them, there has been a 
marvellous change. These two religions are far from being 
as favorable to the propagation of the species as was that of 
the masters of the universe. 

By the latter polygamy was forbidden, and in this it had 
a very great advantage over the Mahometan religion ; but 
divorce was permitted, and in this it had an equally great 
advantage over the Christian religion. I find nothing so 
contradictory as that plurality of wives allowed by the sacred 
Koran, and the order to satisfy them commanded by the 
same book. " Visit your wives,*' says the Prophet, '* because 
you are as necessary to them as their garments, and they are 
as necessary to you as your garments." Now this is a pre* 
cept which renders the life of a Mussulman very laborious. 
Must not the man who has the four wives ordained by the 
law, even if he have only the same number of concubines 
and slaves in addition, be in rather a crushed condition 
under the weight of so many garments? 

"Your wives are your plough-lands," says the Prophet, a 
second time ; " approach, therefore, your plough-lands ; do 
good for your souls' sake ; and it shall be one day returned 
to you.'* 

I regard a good Mussulman as an athlete destined to com- 
bat without any interval of relaxation, but who, becoming 
enfeebled and prostrated by his first toils, soon droops on the 
very field of victory, and finds himself buried| so to speakf 
under his own triumphs. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



208 

Natme ahrajs acts slovljr, and if I may ao o^rm mjwfM, 
thriftily. Her operadons are never violent ; even in her own 
productions she wishes temperance ; she always acts by rule 
and measure ; if she is hurried, she soon £dls into a decline ; 
she employs all her remaining strength in self-preserva- 
tion, lodng absolutely her productive virtue and generative 
power. 

To this state of delnlity we are always reduced by the 
excessive number of our wives ; they exhaust rather than sat- 
isfy us. It is very common to see a man in a crowded 
seraglio with very few chiklreny and these children are, for 
the most part, weak and unhealthy^ and inherit the lassitude 
of their fiuhers. 

Nor b this alL These women, £aited to a life of enforced' 
continenc e, must be guarded, and their guardians must be 
eunuchs ; religioDy jealousy, and even reason, do not permit 
any others to approach them. These guardians must be 
numerous, in order to maintain tranqufllity within among 
women who are incessantly quarrelling, or to prevent any 
attempts from the outside. Tlius a man who has ten wives 
or concubines requires at least that number of eunuchs to 
guard them. But what a loss to society is such a number of 
men, dead, you might say, from their birth ! What an eflfect 
must it not have on the increase of population ! 

Then the female slaves who, together with the eunuchs, are 
the attendants on all these women, continue unwilling virgins 
until old age overtakes them. They cannot marry while in 
the seraglio, and their mistresses, having become accustomed 
to them, never consent to release them. 

And now you see how one single man can monopolize the 
services of so many agents of both sexes for his pleasure, can 
render them utteriy unprofitable fw the state and nsdess for 
the propagation of the species. 

Constantinople and Ispahan are the capitals of the two 
greatest empires in the world, and should be each the centre 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



209 

of all its interests and the point to which all its inhabitants 
should be drawn by a multitude of attractions. Yet these 
cities are perishing, the instruments of their own destruction, 
and would soon M into ruins did not their sovereigns, 
almost during every century, force whole nations to come 
thither and repeople them. I shall conclude in another 
letter. 

PAais» the 13th of the moon of Chahban. 171& 



LETTER CXVI. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

The Romans had not fewer slaves than we, they had more ; 
but they made a better use of them. 

Far from preventing the multiplication of their slaves by 
violent methods, they favored it, on the contrary, by all the 
means in their power. They united them, as much as they 
could, by a kind of marriage. In this way they filled their 
houses with domestics of both sexes and of all ages, and the 
state with an innumerable population. 

Children, who were to constitute the wealth of their mas- 
ter, sprang into existence in crowds around him ; he, alone, 
reared and trained them. Their fathers, freed from the bur- 
den of their support, followed the propensities of nature, and 
multiplied, without fear of a too numerous family. 

I have said that, among us, all our slaves are occupied 
solely with the guardianship of our wives, and that they are, 
as £u' as the state is concerned, in a perpetual lethargy, so 
tliat the cultivation of the arts and of the soil is restricted to 
a few freemen, to the heads of a few families, who devote 
themselves as littie to this pursuit as they possibly can. 

It was not so in the case of the Romans. The republic 
utilized this horde of slaves, and did so to its infinite advan* 

14 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2IO 

tage. Eachof them bad his own private property or /«»• 
iium^ which he held on terms imposed by his master. This 
peculium he utilized in whatever direction his inclinations 
tended One became a banker, another dealt in cargoes ; 
one sold goods by retail, another gained employment as an 
artisan, or tilled a fiarm ; but every one of them used all his 
energy to increase Mi&pecuUumy which obtained for him com- 
fort in his present slavery and the prospect of future liberty. 
This created an industrious people, and gave life to art and 
industry. 

When thrift and toil had made the slaves rich they pur- 
chased their freedom and became citizens. The republic 
was incessantly repairing its losses, and receiving new fami- 
lies into its bosom according as the old ones faded away. 

I shall, perhaps, find an opportunity in my next letters of 
proving that the more men there are in a state the more 
commerce flourishes. I will also prove, and with quite as 
much ease, that the more commerce flourishes the more the \ 
number of the population increases, as these two things are 
of necessity redprocaUy helpful and advantageous. 

This being the case, what must have been the growth and 
increase of that enormous population of industrious and tire- 
less slaves I Industry and plenty gave them birth ; and they, 
in their turn, gave birth to industry and plenty. 



LETTER CXVII. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

Wb have heretofore spoken of Mahometan countries, and 
have sought the reason why they are less populous than were 
those under the government of the Romans. Let us now 
examine the causes of the same effect among Christians. 
Divorce was permitted by the pagan religion and forbidden 
by the Christian. This change, which at first appeared of 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



211 

Ktde consequence, had gradually results so terrible that they 
would seem almost incredible. 

Not only was all the sweetness of the marriage tie 
destroyed, but its grand aim was also attacked ; the bonds* 
intended to be drawn closer, were loosened, and, instead of 
hearts being united, as was claimed to be the object of the 
prohibition, they were sundered forever. 

Into an act so free, an act in which the heart ought so 
largely to participate, were introduced weariness, necessity, 
and the fatality of destiny itself. Disgust, caprice, and in- 
compatibility of temper were accounted of no importance ; 
the heart, the most variable and inconstant object in nature, 
was to be fixed ; persons utterly tired of each other, and 
almost always badly matched, must be yoked in a thraldom 
from which there never was to be relief or escape, resem- 
bling the living human beings which certain tyrants used to 
bind to dead bodies. 

Nothing contributed more to mutual affection than the 
fecility of divorce : a husband and a wife were induced to 
support domestic trials patiently, knowing that they could 
end them when they wished ; and the knowledge that they 
were free to use this power often kept them from doing so 
during their whole lives. 

But in the case of Christians, their present trials render 
them desperate with regard to the future : all they can see 
in the annoyances incidental to the marriage state is their 
duration, and, so to speak, their eternity; hence mutual 
disgust, discord, and contempt ; and this is so much lost for 
posterity. They have been scarcely three years united 
when the essential object of their union is neglected ; then 
come thirty years of coldness ; then private separations, as 
lasting as if they were public, and perhaps even more 
pernicious than if they were. They confine themselves to 
their own apartments, and, of course, all this works to the 
prejudice of future races. A man soon becomes disgusted 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



212 

with one everlasting woman, and frequents the company of 
courtesans: a commerce fraught with shame, and detri- 
mental to the interests of society, for it represents the 
pleasures of marriage without fiilfiUing its object 

If one of the two persons thus united be unfit to carry out 
the designs of nature and the propagation of the species, 
either on account of temperament or old age, such a person 
renders his or her companion equally unfortunate and 
equally useless. 

It is not surprising, then, that so many marriages among 
Christians should result in so few children. Divorce is 
abolished : for badly assorted marriages there is no remedy ; 
women no longer, as in the times of the Romans, pass from 
the hand of husband to husband, who all used to turn them 
to the best possible account on the way. 

I venture to assert that i( in a republic like Lacedsemon, 
which harassed its citizens continually with strange and 
subtle laws, and permitted the existence of only one family, 
namely, the state, there had been established a regulation 
compelling husbands to exchange wives every year, an 
innumerable population would have been the result 

It is rather hard to understand the reason which led 
Christians to abolish divorce. Marriage among all nations 
is susceptible of any number of arbitrary customs, and it is 
a duty to banish such of these as tend to weaken its object ; 
but Christians do not regard it from this point of view; 
accordingly, they have a good deal of trouble in telling what 
it really is. They do not make it consist in sensual pleasure ; 
on the contrary, as I have mentioned already, they would 
seem to desire to banish sensual pleasure from it as much 
as they can ; in their eyes, it is an image, a figure, and 
something mysterious which I do not comprehend. 

Paeis, the 19th of the mooD of Chahban, 1718. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



213 

LETTER CXVIIL 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

The prohibition of divorce is not the only cause of the 
depopulation of Christian countries; the great number of 
eunuchs they have amongst them is not a less considerable 
one. 

I speak of the priests and the dervishes of both sexes, 
who are devoted to perpetual chastity : this is pre-eminently 
the virtue of Christians ; I do not understand it^ as I am 
utterly at a loss to know what kind of a virtue that virtue 
must be which produces no result 

The statements of their doctors on this question appear 
to me to involve a manifest contradiction: they say that 
marriage is holy, and that celibacy, which is its opposite, is 
holier still, never taking into account the fundamental dogma 
and principle that the good is always the best. 

The number of people who make profession of celibacy 
IS prodigious. Formerly, fathers condemned their children 
to it from the cradle ; to-day they do not do so until they 
have reached the age of eighteen, which is pretty much the 
same thing. 

This traffic in continence has destroyed more human 
beings than pestilences or the most sanguinary wars. 

Every religious house contains an un-ending family, in 
which nobody is bom, and which is maintained at the 
expense of all the others. These houses are always open, 
like so many gulfs in which future races are to be buried. 

Such a policy is very different from that of the Romans, 
who established penal laws against all who rejected mar- 
riage and decided to enjoy a liberty detrimental to the 
public utility. 

I am here speaking of Catholic countries only. The 
Protestant religion allows every one to beget children : it 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2|4 

does not suffer either priests or dervishes ; and if^ at the 
time of the creation of this religion, which claimed to refer 
everything to the first ages, its founders had not been inces- 
sandy accused of unchastity, we cannot doubt that, after 
rendering the practice of marriage universal, they would 
have still further lightened its yolk, and in the end removed 
all the barriers which, on the point of marriage, separate 
the Nazarene from Mahomet 

However this may be, it is quite certain that religion gives 
the Protestants an infinite advantage over the Catholics. 

It is my firm belief that, if the present condition of Europe 
lasts, the Catholic religion cannot exist for five hundred 
years longer. 

Before the decline of Spanish power, the Catholics were 
much stronger than the Protestants. The latter have gradu- 
ally reached a position of equality, and to-day the balance 
leans to the other side. This superiority must increase, the 
Protestants becoming richer and more powerful and the 
Catholics weaker. 

Protestant countries ought to be, and are really, more 
populous than Catholic countries. From this it follows, in 
the first place, that the revenues of the former are more con- 
*siderable, because they increase in proportion to the number 
who pay ; secondly, that the lands are better cultivated ; and, 
lastly, that commerce is more prosperous, as there are more 
people who have a fortune to make, as well as more needs 
to be supplied and more resources to supply them. When 
the number of the inhabitants of a country is barely sufficient 
to till the soil, trade must perish, and when it is barely suffi- 
cient for carrying on trade, tillage must be ruined ; that is to 
say, both must fall at the same time, because he who devotes 
himself to the one does so at the expense of the other. 

As for Catholic countries, not only is agriculture aban- 
doned, but industry itself is harmful ; it only consists in 
learning five or six words of a dead language. As soon as a 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



245 

man has made this provision for himself, he need have no 
further concern about his future ; he finds in the cloister a 
tranquil existence, which only immense exertion and labor 
would give him in the world. 

Nor is this all : the dervishes have in their hands almost 
the entire wealth of the state ; they form a community of 
grasping persons, who are always taking and never returning ; 
they are continually accumulating revenue in order to ac- 
quire capital. So much riches produce, so to speak, palsy, 
and there is no longer either circulation or commerce, arts 
or manufactures. 

There is no Protestant prince in Europe who does not 
levy on his subjects ten times the amount of taxes that the 
Pope does on his; yet the latter are wretched, while the 
former live in affluence. Commerce gives life to the one ; 
monarchism, death to the other. 

Paris, the i6th of the moon of Chahban, 171S. 



LETTER CXIX. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

We have done with Asia and Europe ; let us now pass to 
Africa. 

We can speak only of its coasts, for the interior is 
unknown. 

The Barbary coast is not so populous as in the time of 
the Romans, for reasons we have already shown. As for the 
coast of Guinea, it must have been fearfully depopulated 
during the last two hundred years, as its petty kings and 
village chiefe have been engaged in selling their subjects to 
European princes for transportation to the American colonies. 

A circumstance worth noting is that this same America, 
which is every year receiving new inhabitants, does not profit 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2l6 

by the continual drain on Africa. The slavea, conveyed 
to another climate^ perish there by thousands; and the 
labors of the minesi in which both the natives of the country 
and foreigners are constantly employed, the poisonous ex- 
halations arising from them, and the quicksilver, which must 
of necessity be continually used, all conspire to render their 
destruction unavoidable. 

Nothing more outrageous can be conceived than this 
slaughter of countless numbers for the purpose of drawing 
gold and silver from the bowels of the earth, metals in them- 
selves absolutely useless, and constituting wealth solely be- 
cause they have been selected as its symbols. 

Pau^ the last day of the moon of Chahban, 17 1& 



LETTER CXX. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

Thb fecundity of a people sometimes depends upon the 
most trivial circumstances imaginable, so that often all that 
is necessary to render it more numerous than it was before is 
to give a new turn to its impressions. 

The Jews, always exterminated and always springing to 
life again, have repaired their losses and their desolation by 
this one hope, in which every family indulges, that amongst 
them shall be bom a powerful king who will rule the whole 
world. 

The immense population subject to the ancient kings of 
Persia owed its existence to the Magian dogma that the 
acts most agreeable to God are the begetting of a child, the 
tilling of a field, and the planting of a tree. 

If China holds in her bosom such prodigious multitudes, 
it is because her people retain a certain notion peculiar 
to themselves : the children regard their fathers as gods. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



217 

whom they reverence as such duriDg this Ufe, and honoi 
with sacrifices after their death, believing that, through these 
sacrifices, their souls, absorbed in the Tyen, recover a new 
life ; consequently, every one finds it his interest to increase 
a family which wiU be so submissive to him in this world and 
so necessary when he is in the next. 

On the other band, Mahometan countries are becoming 
every day more deserted, on account of an opinion which, 
though holy in itself, has fatal results when it is deeply rooted 
in minds. We regard ourselves as travellers who ought to be 
always thinking of another home ; works of utility and dura- 
tion, concern about the future of our children, plans that 
look beyond our short and fleeting lives, appear to us as 
something extravagant Tranquil as to the present, un- 
troubled as to the future, we neither care to repair our public 
buildings, nor to reclaim our waste lands, nor to cultivate 
those that are capable of tillage ; we pass our time in a state 
of utter indifference, and allow Providence to do everything. 

A spirit of vanity has impelled Europeans to establish the 
unjust law of primogeniture, a law unfavorable to propaga- 
tion, inasmuch as it rivets the attention of a father upon a 
single one of his children to the exclusion of the others, and 
obliges him, in order to assure the fortunes of one, to dis- 
regard the claims of the rest; finally, because it destroys^ 
that equality among citizens which constitutes the real wealth \ 
of a nation. 

Pxais, the 4th of the moon of Rhamatan, 17 18. 

LETTER CXXI. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

CouMTRixs inhabited by savages are ordinarily thinly peo- 
pled, because of the repugnance they have dmost always 
for labor and agriculture. This unfortunate aversion is so 



Digitized by LjOOQ IC 



2l8 

itrong that, when they utter any imprecation against one ot 
their enemies, the worst fitte they can wish him is that he 
may be reduced so low as to plough a field, believing that hunt- 
ing and fishing are the only pursuits befitting their dignity. 

But as there are often years when hunting and fishing give 
but a poor return, fitmines are frequent and widespread; 
apart fiom the &ct that fish and game can never be in such 
plenty as to support a numerous population long, because 
animals always desert those countries in which the inhabi- 
tants increase in number. 

Moreover, the villages of savages, usually consisting of two 
or three hundred persons, being isolated fix>m each other, 
with interests as antagonistic as those of two empires, cannot 
be mutually helpful, because they have not the resource of 
great states, in which all the parts have a natural connection 
and are reciprocally beneficial 

There is among savages another custom not less perni- 
cious than the first ; it is the cruel practice of abortion to 
which their women are addicted, in order that pregnancy may 
not render them distasteful to their husbands. 

In this city the laws enacted against this crime are terribly 
harsh ; in fact, excessive in their severity. Every unmarried 
woman who has not declared her pregnancy before a mag- 
istrate is punished with death if her offspring dies. Shame 
and the sense of her dishonor, even accidents, are not ac- 
cepted in extenuation. 

Paris, the 9th of the moon of Rhamazan, 17 18. 

LETTER CXXII. 

USBEK TO THE SAME. 

Ths ordinary effect of colonies is to weaken the countries 
ftt>m which they are drawn, without increasing the popula« 
tion of those to which they are sent. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



219 

Men oagfat to remain where they are. Diseases result from 
changing a good climate for a bad one ; others arise from 
the circumstance that there has been any change at alL 

The air, like the plants, of every country is chaiged with 
particles of its soil. The stability of our constitution is the 
result of its action on it. When we are transported into 
another country, we become ilL The fluids being accus- 
tomed to a certain degree of consistency, the solids to a cer- 
tain disposition of their parts, and to a certain degree of 
motion, they cannot tolerate any addition, and resist any 
alteration. 

When a country is uninhabited, this is proof positive of some 
particular defect in the climate ; consequently, when men are 
taken from a healthy atmosphere and sent to such a country, 
the issue is the exact contrary of what was intended. 

The Romans knew this by experience. They banished 
all their criminals to Sardinia^ ajid packed off the Jews there 
too. Th^y hadjoon_tQ .seek con s ol ation for Uie bereave- 
ment that ensued ; their contempt for these poor creatures 
rendered this an easy task. 

The great Shah Abbas, anxious to deprive the Turks of 
the means of raising great armies on his frontiers, transported 
almost all the Armenians frx>m their own country, and sent 
more than twenty thousand femilies into the province of 
Guilan, who nearly all perished in a very short time. 

None of the settlements that have been made in Constan- 
tinople have ever succeeded. 

The prodigious number of negroes, of which we spoke 
ah-eady, has not filled America. 

Since the destruction of the Jews under Adrian, Palestine 
has been without inhabitants. 

It must therefore be confessed that great depopulations 
are irreparable, because a people that falls to a certain point 
remains in that condition, and, if it ever does repair its losses^ 
it will take centuries to do sa 



Digitized by 'LjOOQIC 



220 

U, however, when it k in a state of dediiie» the moit ii»- 
tignificantof the drcnmstances we have detafledcoopeiates; 
then, not only does it not repair its losses^ but it sinks nx>re 
and more every day, and its annihilation is only a question 
of time. 

The results of the expulsion of the Moors from Spain are 
as patent to-day as when it first occorred ; so fiv is the void 
from being filled that it is becoming ever larger. 

Since the devastation of America, the Spaniards, who have 
taken the place of the ancient inhabitants, have liailed to 
repeople it ; on the contrary, by a duality which I should pre- 
fer calling an act of divine justice, the destroyers are destroy- 
ing and consuming themselves every day. 

Princes ought, therefore, to abandon the design of coloniz- 
ing great countries. I do not say that they may not some- 
times succeed. There are climates so excellent that the 
human race will always multiply in them: witness those 
islands ^ that have been peopled by some sick persons who 
were left behind by vessels on the coast, and who recovered 
their health immediately after. 

But, even if these colonies succeeded, they would divide, 
instead of augmenting, the power that planted them, unless 
they were of very small< extent, like those dispatched to 
occupy some post for trading purposes. 

The Carthaginians had, like the Spaniards, discovered 
America, or at least some great islands with which they car- 
ried on an enormous traffic ; but when they saw the number 
of their citizens decreasing, that wise republic forbade them 
to continue the traffic or to sail thither in future. 

It is my positive belief that, instead of sending %Mniards 
to the Indies, the Indians and all the half-breeds shouM be 
shipped to Spain, and all its scattered subjects should be 
restored to thik monarchy ; then, if Spain retained only the 
half of her great colonies, she would still become the most 
formidable power in Europe. 

1 Tbe author means the Isle of Boorbon perhaps. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



221 

Empires may be compared to a tree whose branches, when 
too much extended, deprive the trunk of its sap, and only 
shade it in return. 

The example of the Portuguese and Spaniards ought to be 
enough of itself to moderate the rage of princes for conquer- 
ing far-off lands. 

These two nations, having subdued, with inconceivable 
rapidity, immense realms, and, being more astonished at 
their victory than the vanquished nations were at their 
defeat, considered the best methods of pre^prving their con- 
quests, and each took a di fferent cou rse* 

The Spaniards, -de^pairiug of m^ing the conquered 
nations loyal, determined to extirpate them and send from 
Spain people on whom they could rely to take their place. 
Never was more horrible design more punctually executed. 
The spectacle was presented of a people as numerous as all 
the inhabitants of Europe, disappearing from the earth on 
the arrival of those barbarians, who seemed^ when discover- 
ing the Indies, to have discovered at the same time what 
were the utmost limits to which cruelty might be extended. 

Their barbarity tftiabled them to preserve this country 
under their dominion. Judge from this how fatal conquests 
are, since their effects are so much so : for this was the only 
remedy they could have adopted. How could they other- 
wise have retained so many miUions in subjection? How 
could they have successfully managed a civil war at such a 
distance? What would have become of them, if they had 
given these people time to recover from their astonishment 
at the arrival of these new gods and from the terror of their 
thunderbolts? 

As for the Portuguese, they adopted a different method ; 
they did not act with cruelty, and so they were soon expelled 
from all the countries they had discovered. The Dutch 
favored the rebellion of these nations and profited by it 

What prince would envy the lot of these conquerors? 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



222 



hmwhrd frpin them; ocbcn tnnied tbeas i 
did the nine to titeir own coontij. 
It if the dcttin J of heroes to niin 
cooqaering coonthcs which they suddenly iose, or : 
nmoos which they are themselves obliged to desmiy ; like 
that madmaui who s>eiit his substamoe in pmc hjsiM rt^ y p* * 
whx,h he threw into the sea, and glasses iHiidi he broke 
immediately aftenvards. 

Vjuli%, the i&k ct the smmm <rf Bkaiw, 171& 



LETTER CXXIIL 
USBEK TO THE SAME. 

The mildness of a government oootributes luaivelloiBly to 
the propagation of the species. Republics axe a ron^lanl 
proc^ of this fact, and espedaDy Holland and Switxeriand, 
which are the worst countries in Europe, if we consider the 
nature of their soil, and yet are the most populous. Noth- 
ing attracts stiaDgers more than liberty, and the wealth that 
follows it always ; die one b sought for its own sake, and the 
lack of the other urges men in the direction where it may be 
found. 

The human species multiplies in a country in which children 
can have abundance of food without diminishing the sopply 
of the parents. 

That very equality among citizens, which is ordinarily die 
source of equality in their fortunes, sends plenty and vigor 
through an the members of the body politic, and spreads 
them in every direction. 

It is not die same with countries subject to aibitiai y 
power : the prince, his courtiers, and some private individuals 
possess the entire wealth of the comitry, white all the rest 
groan m extreme misery. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



223 

If a man is badly off, and feels that, should he have chil- 
dren, they must be poorer than himself, he will not marry ; 
or, if he marry, he will fear to have too many children, who 
would add to the embarrassment of his property and sink to 
a lower condition than that of their father. 

Of course, the rustic or peasant, being once married, will 
increase the population, without considering whether he may 
be rich or poor ; such a consideration does not affect him. He 
has always a heritage to bequeath to his children : his plough ; 
and nothing will ever prevent him firom following blindly the 
instmcts of nature. 

But what service can the state derive from children who 
waste away in misery? They perish almost as soon as they 
are bom ; there is no chance of their growing up vigorously. 
They die off in detail in a thousand different ways, when 
they are not carried off wholesale by those frequent epi- 
demics which misery and a poor diet are always originating ; 
the survivors reach the age of manhood without acquiring its 
strength, and are feeble and languid during the remainder of 
their lives. 

Men are like plants, which never thrive if they are not 
well cultivated. Among people who live in misery, the race 
decays, and sometimes degenerates entirely. 

France can furnish strong evidence of this truth. During 
the late wars, a number of youths, under the stress of their 
dread that they would be forced to serve in the militia, were 
induced to marry at far too tender an age and in a condition 
of great poverty. Many children were bom of these mar- 
riages ; but it would be vain to search for them in France *. 
p9verty, famine, and disease have hurried them out of 
existence. 

Now, if it be possible to observe such things in a king- 
dom having such an admirable climate and such a well- 
regulated govemment as France possesses, what must be tho 
condition of other states? 

Paris, the 23d of the moon of Rhamazan, 17 18. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



224 



LETTER CXXIV, 
USBEK TO THE MOLLAH, MEHEIfET AH 

GUAMMAM OP THS THRXB TOMBS, AT KoOlf. 

What avail the £uts of the imaums and the hair-shirts of the 
mollahs? Twice hath the hand of God rested heavily on 
the children of the law, twice hath the sun enwrapped him- 
self in clouds and deigned to shed his rays on their defeats 
alone ; their armies have gathered together and been scat- 
tered like the dust 

The empire of the Osmanlis has been shaken by the two 
greatest disasters it has ever encountered : a Christian mufti 
supports it with difficulty ; the grand vizir of Germany is 
the scourge of God, sent to chastise the followers of Omar. 
He bears with him in every direction the wrath of Heaven, 
aroused by their rebellion and perfidy. 

Sacred spirit of the imaums, thou weepest night and day 
over the children of the Prophet whom the detestable Omar 
hath led astray ; thy bowels yearn at the spectacle of their 
misfortunes; thou dost wish their salvation and not their 
destruction ; thou wouldst see them once more united under 
the standard of Ali by the tears of the saints, and not scat- 
tered through mountains and deserts by the terror of tbt 
infidels. 

Paki% the 1st of the moon of Chalval, 1718. 



LETTER CXXV. 

USBEK TO RHEDI 

At Vbnicb. vJ 

What can be the motive of the unlimited generosity which 
princes show to courtiers? Is it to win their attachment? 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



225 

But thejr have already done so, as far as this b possible. 
And besides, if they gain some of their subjects by pur* 
chasing them, they lose an infinitely larger number by 
impoverishing them. 

When I think of the condition of princes, ever surrounded 
by greedy and insatiable men, I cannot suppress a sensation 
of pity ; and I pity them the more when they have not the 
strength to resist solicitations which those who never need to 
solicit anything find it so hard to reject 

I never hear their liberalities, favors, and pensions dis- 
cussed without a thousand reflections occurring to my mind ; 
ideas crowd upon one another ; and in &ncy I am listening 
to the words of the following ordinance : — 

'^ The indefatigable courage wherewith certain of our sub- 
jects demand pensions having unceasingly taxed our royal 
magnificence, we have at length yielded to the multitude of 
petitions which they have presented to us, and which have 
until now constituted the chief anxiety of the throne. These 
suitors have represented to us that they have not failed since 
our accession to the crown to be present at our levies on 
every occasion, that we have always seen them on our 
passage as motionless as posts, and that, in order to gaze 
upon Our Serenity, they have raised themselves on the 
shoulders of the tallest people. We have also received sev- 
eral petitions from persons of the fair sex, supplicating us to 
take notice of the strictness of their morals ; also from some 
antiquated dames who, with trembling heads, remind us that 
they have been the ornaments of the kings our predecessors, 
and that if the generals of the said kings' armies have rendered 
the state formidable by their prowess, they have rendered 
the court not less celebrat^3T)y their intrigues. Wherefore, 
desiring to treat these suppliants with kindness, and to grant 
their prayer, we do ordain as follows : — 

" That every laborer having five children shall cut off daily 
the fifth part of the bread which he gives them. We enjoin 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



226 

firtben of fiunilies to arrange this letrenchment in the fiureit 
manner they possibly can. 

** We expressly forbid all those who caMvale their estates, 
or who have let them as btnos, to make any improvement 
thereon, in any manner whatever. 

^* We ordain that all persons engaged in base and mechan- 
ical employments, who have never been at the levtfe of Our 
Majesty, shall henceforth never bay dothing for their wives 
and children except once every four years. We interdict 
also, under the severest penalties, those little merrymakings 
which they have been accustomed to hold in their fiunilies 
on the principal festivals of the year. 

** And, inasmuch as we have been informed that most of 
the burghers of oiu: good towns have been entirely engrossed 
in the business of establishing their daughters, whose only 
claim to regard in our state is based on a depressing and 
tiresome modesty, we ordain that said burghers shall adjourn 
the marriage of said daughters until the latter have reached 
the age fixed by the ordinances, and may legally constrain 
them thereto. We forbid our magistrates to provide for the 
education of their children." 

Paeis, the 1st of the mooQ of Chalval, 17 18. 



LETTER CXXVI. 

RICA TO . 

The adherents of every religion experience considerable 
embarrassment when they are asked to give an idea of the 
pleasures in a future life destined for those who have lived 
welL It is easy enough to terrify the wicked by a descrip- 
tion of the torments that menace them ; but it is apparency 
found impossible to know what to promise to the virtuous. 
It seems to belong to the very nature of pleasures to be of 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



227 

short duration; at least, the imaginatioii finds it hard to 
picture any which are not 

I have read descriptions of Paradise that would lead all 
sensible people to renounce it at once : some persons would 
have the happy shades play eternally on the flute ; others 
condemn them to the torture of a never ending promenade ; 
others^ who make them dream in heaven of their mistresses 
on earth, have expressed their belief that even a hundred 
millions of years would not be long enough to take from 
them the zest for amatory excitements. 

I remember hearing a story bearing on this subject from 
a man who had been in the country of the Mpgul ; it shows 
that Indian priests are just as vague in their ideas as others 
as to the pleasures of Paradise. 

A woman, after losing her husband, was paying a cere- 
monious visit to the governor of the city for the purpose of 
getting permission to bum herself alive ; but because in the 
parts of India subject to the Mahometans, this cruel 
custom has been abolished, as far as possible, she met with 
an absolute refusal. 

When she saw that her prayers were in vain, she flew into 
a furious passion. " See," said she, ** how we are oppressed ! 
A poor woman is no longer allowed to bum herself when she 
wants to do so! Did any one ever see the like? My 
mother, aunt, and sisters burned themselves I And, when I 
ask this rascal of a governor to let me do the same, he grows 
quite angry and raves like a madman." 

A young bonza happened to be standing near. " Infidel," 
said the governor, '* was it you who put this insane notion 
into this woman's head?" — " No," he replied, " I have not 
spoken to her ; but if she will take my advice, she will con- 
summate the sacrifice ; her reward will be great : she will 
meet her husband again in the other world and renew her 
marriage with him." — "What's that you say?" exclaimed 
the woman, in astonishment *' Meet my husband again ? 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



228 

Ah 1 then I sha'n't bum mysel£ He was jealous, peevish, 
and so old that unless the god firamah has wrought some 
change in him, he has certainly no need of me. Bum for 
him I — no, not if the burning of the tip of one of my fingers 
were to draw him out of helL The two old bonzas who led 
me astray and who knew how I lived with him, took good 
care not to tell me that If this b the rich present, though, 
that god Bramah is going to give roe, he may keep it for him- 
self. Mr. Governor, I am going to turn Mahometan at 
once. And as for you," she continued, turning to the bonza, 
''you can, if you like, go yourself to my husband, and tell 
him I am in the enjoyment of excellent health." 

Paris, the sd o£ the moon of Chalval, 1718. 



LETTER CXXVII. 

RICA TO USBEK 

At . 

Although I am expecting you here to-morrow, I send you 
letters that came from Ispahan. Mine tell me that the 
ambassador of the Great Mogul has been ordered out of the 
realm. It is addec} that the king's uncle, who had charge of 
his education, has been arrested, conducted to a castle, where 
he is very closely guarded, and deprived of all his honors. 
I am moved by the fate of this prince, and pity him sincerely. 

I confess, Usbek, tears always move me. The human- 
ity within me is as much affected by the miseries of the 
unfortunate, as if there were no other men but them; 
and even the great, towards whom I feel rather bitter when 
they are in power, become the objects of my tenderness 
when they are in disgrace. 

In fact, what use can they make of the most devoted 
attachment when they are prosperous? It implies too much 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



229 

equality : they prefer respect, which docs not ask for any 
return. But, as soon as they have descended from their 
lofty position, our laments serve to recall it to them. 

There was a certain degree of artlessness, and of greatness 
as well, in the remark of a prince who, just as he was on the 
point of falling into the hands of his enemies, seeing his 
courtiers around him in tears, said : ** Your tears make me 
feel I am still your king." 

Paus, the 3d of the moon of Chalral, 171S. 



LETTER CXXVIII. 

RICA TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

You have heard often enough of the femous king of Sweden : 
he was besieging a fortified town in a kingdom called Norway ; 
as he was visiting the trenches, in company with an engineer, 
he was shot in the head and killed. His prime minister was 
arrested on the spot ; the states have assembled and con- 
demned him to lose his head. 

He was accused of a great crime : by his calumnies, he 
had destroyed the confidence of the king in his people, — a 
felony, in my mind, deserving a thousand deaths. 

For, if it is a bad action to blacken the meanest of his sub- 
jects in the mind of the prince, how great must be the crime 
of him who blackens an entire nation, and deprives it of the 
good will of the sovereign specially appointed by Providence 
to work out its happiness? 

I should wish men to speak to kings as the angels do to 
our holy Prophet. 

You are well aware that, at the sacred banquets in which 
the Lord of Lords descends from the sublimest throne in the 
oniverse and mingles with his slaves, I have made unto my 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



230 

ielf a severe law to bridle an unruly tongue ; no one has ever 
heard me utter a single word injurious to the meanest of his 
subjects. When I had for a time to cease to be sober, I 
never ceased to be a gentleman ; and, in that test of our 
fidelity, I have risked my life, but never my virtue. 

I cannot tell how it is that the wickedest prince is never 
as wicked as his prime minister. 

If the former commits an evU deed, it is almost always at 
the suggestion of the latter ; so that the ambition of princes 
is never so dangerous as the baseness of his counsellors. But 
is it not incomprehensible that a man, who was appointed 
minister only yesterday, and may not be one to-moirow, 
should become in a moment the enemy of himself, his family^ 
his country, and of generation after generation of the very 
people he is oppressing now? 

A prince has passions ; the minister arouses them : in fact, 
it is through them he hopes to retain power ; he neither has, 
nor wishes to have any other aim. The eulogies of his cour- 
tiers may mislead the monarch ; but the minister's flattery 
is an element in the counsels he gives him, the designs where* 
with he inspires him, and the maxims he offers for his 
consideration. 

Paris, the 35th oi the moon of Saphar, 171^ 



LETTER CXXIX. 

RICA TO USBEK 
At . 

I WAS crossing the Pont-Neuf the other day, in company 
with a friend, who met one of his acquaintances, who was, 
he said to me, a geometer. His looks did not belie him, 
for he seemed in a profound reverie. My fnend had to pull 
him by the sleeve for a considerable time before he came 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



231 

down from the clouds, so much hada certain curve exercised 

him for the last week. They paid each other many compli- 
ments, and interchanged the Uteraiy news of the day. The 
conversation continued until we reached the door of a ca£6, 
which we entered. 

I noticed that our geometer was received by every one with 
respectful assiduity, and that the waiters made much more of 
him than of two musketeers seated in a comer. He seemed 
to find the place agreeable, for he unbended, and laughed as 
if he had not the least tincture of geometry about him. 

For all that, his methodical mind was measuring every- 
thing that was said in the course of conversation. He 
resembled the man in the garden, who cut at every flower 
that lifted its head above its neighbor. 

A martyr to exactness, he was as much offended by a sally, 
as a man of weak eyesight might be by too strong a light 
To him nothing was indifferent, provided it were true: 
accordingly, his conversation was rather odd. He had come 
on that day from the country with a man who had been to 
see a splendid ch&teau and its magnificent gardens. But 
all he saw was a building sucty feet long and thirty-five broad, 
and a wood of ten acres, which had the form of a parallelo- 
gram. He would have liked that the rules of perspective had 
been properly observed, and that the avenues had every- 
where the same width. He had an infallible method for 
realizing this. A dial he had hunted up gave him much 
pleasure, for it was constructed in a very singular fashion ; 
and a scholar near me, who unfortunately asked if it marked 
the Babylonian hours, tried his temper exceedingly. A 
newsmonger having spoken of the capture of the castle of 
Fontarabia, he at once explained to us the properties of the 
curve described in the air by the bombs ; fully satisfied with 
his knowledge on this point, their success had no interest 
for him. A man complained of having been ruined the 
winter before by a flood. "I am delighted with what you 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



232 

have tM me," said the geometer; ^I see I was not mis- 
taken in the observation I made, and that two inches more 
of water fell on the earth this year than last" 

A moment after, he passed out, and we followed him. 
As he walked £ut and neglected to look before him, he ran 
plump on another man. The shock was so violent that 
both rebounded, in redprocal ratio to the velocity and mass 
of each. When they had somewhat recovered from their 
dazed condition, the new arrival said to the geometer : '^ I 
am very glad you josded against me, for I have great news 
for you : I have just published my Horace." — "What! " 
exclaimed the geometer, *^ why, that must have been two 
thousand years ago ! " — " You do not understand," 
rejoined the other. <* It is a translation of that ancient author 
that I have just produced. I have spent twenty years in 
making translations.*' 

" What ! monsieur," said the geometer, ** for twenty years 
you have not thought! You speak for others, and they 
think for you ! " — ** Monsieur," replied the scholar, " do you 
not think I am rendering a very useful service to the public 
by familiarizing them with good authors? " 

" That is not quite my meaning. I esteem as much as any- 
one the sublime authors you burlesque ; but you do not 
resemble them, for, if you were to translate forever, you 
would never be translated yourself. 

"Translations are like those copper coins that have the 
same value as a piece of gold, and are of greater circulation 
even among the people ; but they arc always light and of 
base alloy. 

"You wish, you say, to revive these illustrious dead, and 
I willingly admit that you give them a body ; but you do 
not give them life ; they always lack a soul to animate 
them. 

" Why do you not devote yourself rather to the investigation 
of those sublime truths which simple methods of calculation 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



233 

are enabling us to discover every day?'* After these few 
words, they separated^ not by any means well pleased with 
each other, I fismcy. 

Paris, the last day of the moon of Rebiab 2, 171^ 

LETTER CXXX. 

RICA TO . 

I WISH to write to you about a certain Jnbe called Owd- 
nuDCs. They meet in a magnificent garden, where their" 
l)usy idleness is always on the go. They are utterly useless 
to the state, and the fifty years they have spent in talking are 
about as effectual as if they had held their tongues for that 
period. However, they believe they hold a very important 
position in the eyes of the world, because their discourses 
and discussions are all upon gorgeous projects and mighty 
interests. 

The basis of their conversations is a frivolous and absurd 
inquisitiveness : there is no cabinet so secret that they do 
not claim to penetrate its mysteries ; they cannot consent to 
admit their ignorance of anything ; they know how many 
wives our august sultan has, and the number of children he 
begets every year; and, although they do not go to the 
expense of spies, they are profoundly acquainted with the 
measures he is adopting to humiliate the Turkish emperor 
and the Great Mogul as well 

They have scarcely exhausted the present, when they 
make a rush on the future, and, outstripping Providence, 
anticipate its foreknowledge as to the acts of men. They 
lead a general by the hand, and, after praising him for a 
thousand follies he has not committed, they prognosticate 
a thousand others he is sure not to commit either. 

They send armies flying like cranes, and tumble down 
walls like card castles; they have bridges over all the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



234 

men, secret pitfawajfi thioogh all die moantaiiiSy 
anenabamki the burning sands of deseits: they have eveiy* 
thing — except good sense. 

The man with whom I lodge re ccif e d this letter from a 
quidnunc; as I thought it rather singular, I kept it; here 
it is: — 

Monsieur, — I am raielj deceived in mj ooojectnres as 
to the events of the times. On the ist of January. 171 1, I 
predicted that the Emperor Joseph would die in the course of 
the year ; it is true that as he was in eacellent health at die 
time, I thought I might be laughed at, if I cxplainrd die 
matter too dearly; and so the terms I used were a little 
enigmatical. But minds capable of reasoning understood me. 
On the 17th ol April of the same year, he died ol die 
smallpox. 

As soon as war was declared between die emperor and the 
Turks, I searched for the members of our body through all 
the nooks of the T^cries. I caUed them to order near die 
basin, and foretold that Belgrade would be besi^ed and taken. 
I have been fortunate enough to see my prediction accom- 
plished. It is true that, about the middle ol the siege I bet 
a hundred pistoles that it would be taken on the 18th of 
August ; ^ it was not taken until the next day: could one be 
nearer winning? 

When I saw that the Spanish fleet was lamUng troops in 
Sardinia, I judged it would make a conquest of die island. I 
said so, and this turned out true. F«ated by my success, I 
added that this victorious fleet would land troops at Final for 
the conquest of the Milanese. As I found that this idea was 
not accepted so readily, I resolved to sustain it nobly. I bet 
fifty pistoles, and — lost them; for that rascally Alberoni, in 
spite of the faith of treaties, sent his fleet to Sicily, and 
deceived two great statesmen at the same time, the Duke of 
Savoy and me. 

All this has upset me so much, monsieur, that I have 
decided to predict always, but to bet never. Formerly we 
knew nothing ol this custom of wagering in the TuilerieB» and 

* 1717. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



235 

the late Count de L. would hardly have tolerated It; but, since 
a troop of pretentious young sparks has made its way amongst 
us, we no longer know where we are. Scarcely do we open 
our mouths to tell some piece of news before one of these 
fellows ofiEers to bet against us. 

The other day, as I was unfolding my manuscript and 
steadying my spectacles on my nose, one of these swaggerers, 
seizing exactly the interval between the first word and the 
second, shouted at me : ''I bet you a hundred pistoles it is n*t.'* 
I pretended not to pay any attention to his braggadocio ; and, 
continuing, in a still louder voice, said : *< The Mardchal de 

having learned " — " That 's a lie !" he exclaimed ; " your 

news is always extravagant; there's no sense in all that 
trash I " 

I must ask you, Monsiexur, to do me the favor of lending 
me thirty pistoles : for I confess those bets have somewhat 
embarrassed me. I send you copies of two letters I have written 
to the minister. I am, etc., — — . 

A QUIDNUNC'S LETTER TO A MINISTER. 

MoNSEiGNEUR, — I am the most zealous subject the King 
has ever had. It was I who induced one of my friends to 
execute the plan I had formed of a book that would demon- 
strate that Louis the Great was the greatest of all the sover- 
eigns who have deserved the title of Great. I have long been 
engaged on another work which will do still more honor to our 
nation, if your Lordship deign to grant me a privilege. My 
object is to prove that, since the beginning of the monarchy, 
the French have never been beaten, and that all the descriptions 
of our defeats by historians up to the present time are veritable 
fabrications. I have had many opportunities of correcting 
their narratives, and I venture to flatter myself that, if I am strong 
in anything, it is in criticism. I am, monseigneur, etc., 

MoNSBiGNEUR, — As we have unhappily lost Count de L., 
we beg of you to have the goodness to allow us to elect a 
president Disorders have prevailed at our meetings, and state 
a£Eair8 have not been as thoroughly discussed as formerly. 
Our young people have absolutely no respect for their eldeiii 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2^6 

and discipline Is unknown among them. Our assemb&es are 
lUce a council of Rehoboam, in which the young men make 
sport of the greybeards. In vain do we represent to them that 
we were in possession of the Tuileries twenty years before th^ 
came into Uie world. I beUeve they will chase us from it in 
the end, and that, forced to flee from the places where we have 
so often evoked the shades of French heroes, we shall be 
compelled to hold our meetings in the Jardin du Roi, or even 
in some spot still more remote* I am, etc.« ■ 

Paus, the 7th of the moon of Gemmadi 2, 17 1> 



LETTER CXXXL 

RHEDI TO RICA 
At Paris. 

Onb of the things that most exercised my curiosity after 
my arrival in Europe was the history of republics and their 
origin. You know that most Asiatics have not even an idea 
of this species of government, and tliat their imagination has 
not, so ^r, been able to make them comprehend that there 
can be any ruling power which is not despotic. 

The first governments of the world were monarchical ; it 
was only by accident and the succession of ages that repub- 
lics were formed. 

Greece having been laid waste by a deluge, new inhabit- 
ants came to people it. Nearly all her colonies arrived 
from Egypt and the countries of Asia in her neighborhood ; 
and, as all these lands were governed by kings, the people 
who left them were naturally governed by kings also. But, 
as soon as the tyranny of these princes became intolerable, 
their yoke was shaken off, and out of the ruins of these 
kingdoms arose the republics that rendered Greece so flourish* 
Ing, and the only civilized nation in the midst of barbarians. 

The love of liberty and the hatred of kings preserved the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



23T 

independence of Greece for a long time and extended the 
republican form of government beyond her shores. The 
Greek cities found allies in Asia Minor; thither they sent 
colonies as free as they were themselves, which served as 
ramparts against the enterprises of the Persian kings. Nor is 
this all : Greece peopled Italy ; Italy, Spain, and, perhaps, 
the Gauls. We know that the great Hesperia was, at first, 
Greece, which her neighbors regarded as the abode ol 
felicity. The Greeks, not being able to discover this happy 
country at home, went in search of it to Italy ; the natives of 
Italy, to Spain ; and those of Spain, to Betica, or Portugal : 
so that all these regions bore the name at some time or 
other. These Greek colonies brought with them that spirit 
of freedom which they had inhaled in their own mUd clime ; 
and thus it is that we seldom see monarchies in Italy, Spain, 
or the Gauls, during these remote times. We shall soon 
learn that the peoples of the north and of Germany were not 
less free ; for those who have found traces of royalty amongst 
them have in reality fallen into the mistake of taking leaders 
of armies or chiefs of republics for kings. 

AH this took place in Europe ; as to Asia and Africa, they 
have always been ground down by despotism, with the ex- 
ception of the cities in Asia Minor of which we have spoken, 
and the republic of Carthage in Africa. 

The world was divided between two powerful republics, 
Rome and Carthage. We know absolutely nothing of the 
series, of African princes who reigned after Dido, or how they 
lost their power. 

The marvellous aggrandizement of the Roman republic 
would have largely contributed to the happiness of the world, 
but for the unjust distinction it made between Roman citi- 
zens and conquered nations, the excessive authority given to 
the governors of the provinces, the failure to observe the 
righteous laws enacted to check the tyranny of the latter, and, 
in fine, if these proconsuls had not been allowed to use tha 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



238 

▼try treasures accumulated by their rapacity to silence die 
voice of the iaw. 

It would seem as if liberty was suited to the naturd 
disposition of the inhabitants of Europe, and servitude to 
that of the inliabitants of Asia. In vain did the Romans 
offer to the Cappadocians the precious treasure of free- 
dom : that pusillanimous nation rejected it, and embraced 
slavery with as much eagerness as other peoples embraced 
liberty. 

Caesar oppressed the Roman republic and subjected it to 
arbitrary power. 

Europe groaned for a long time under the violence of 
military domination, and Roman moderation was changed 
into cruel oppression. 

Meanwhile, a multitude of unknown nations issued from 
the north, rushed Hke torrents over the Roman provinces, 
and, finding conquest as easy as pillage, dismembered them 
and from the fragments founded kingdoms. These popula- 
tions were free, and so excessively did they limit the power 
of their kings, that the latter were, properly speaking, only 
leaders of armies. Thus these kingdoms, although estab- 
lished by force, did not feel the yoke of the conqueror. 
When the tribes of Asia, like the Turks or Tartars, made 
conquests, being subject to the will of a single man, they 
thought of nothing but of giving him new subjects and estab- 
lishing his unlimited authority by force of arms. But the 
nations of the north, having been free in their own coi^tries, 
when they took possession of the Roman provinces, did not 
give their chiefs great authority. Some of these tribes, like 
the Vandals in Africa and the Goths in Spain, used to de- 
pose their rulers when they became dissatisfied with them ; 
and, among others, the authority of the prince was limited in 
a thousand different ways : a great number of lords shared it 
with him, and no war was undertaken without their consent ; 
the spoils were shared between the chiefe and the soldiers ; 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



239 

no impost could be levied by the prince, and the laws were 
made in the assemblies of the nation. 

Such were the fundamental principles of all such states as 
were formed out of the Roman empire. 

VxmcB» the 20th of the moon of Rhegeb, 17 19^ 



LETTER CXXXIL 

RICA TO 

I HAFPENSD to be in a ca£6 five or six months ago ; there I 
noticed a rather fashionably attired gentleman who was lis- 
tened to with much attention : he was saying how pleasant 
life was in Paris, and deploring the necessity that forced him 
to reside in the country. " I have," he said, " an income 
from land of fifteen thousand livres, and I should consider 
myself far luckier if I had a quarter of that property in money 
and in movable effects. It is all very well squeezing my 
tenants and crushing them with the costs of lawsuits ; this 
only renders them the more unable to pay their debts : I 
have never yet been able to see a hundred pistoles at one 
time. If I owed a thousand francs, and were arrested for 
the debt, I should be utterly bankrupt." 

I left without paying much attention to this discourse ; 
but, finding myself yesterday in that quarter, I entered the 
same house and saw there a grave-looking man, with long, 
pale features, who, in the middle of five or six gossipers, 
seemed gloomy and pensive, until he suddenly broke into 
the conversation, saying, in a loud voice : '* Yes, gendemen, 
I am ruined ; I have no longer enough to live on, though I 
have actually in my house two hundred thousand livres in 
bank-notes, and one hundred thousand in money. I am in a 
frightful situation ; I thought I was rich, and here I am a 
beggar : if I had only a litde plot of land to which I could 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



240 

retire, I should at least be sure of having enough to live on ; 
but I have n't so much land as this hat would cover." 

Chancing to turn my head in another direction, I saw a 
man grimacing like one possessed. '' Ah I " he cried, 
" whom can any one trust to now ? There is a traitor whom 
I believed so much my friend that I lent him all my money, 
and he has paid me back, hasn't he? Oh, yes! What 
horrible perfidy ! You may make any excuses for him you 
like, but in my mind he will always be a scoundrel." 

Close by him was another feUow, very poorly dressed, who, 
raising his eyes to heaven, said : " God bless the plans of 
our ministers i May I live to see the shares go up to two 
thousand, and all the footmen of Paris richer than their mas- 
ters ! " I had the curiosity to inquire his name. " He is a 
man in the depths of poverty," was the answer, "for his 
trade is a poor one. He is a genealogist, and has hopes 
of recuperation from his art if these sudden fortunes con- 
tinue, and our new millionnaires need his services for the 
improvement of their patronymics, the deodorizing of their 
ancestors, and the adorning of their carriages ; he fancies he 
will be able to turn out as many people of quality as he 
wishes ; and the possibility of such a multiplication of his 
customers makes his heart palpitate with joy." 

Then I saw a pale, withered old roan enter, whom I recog- 
nized as a quidnunc before he was seated. He was not, 
however, one of those who are always assured of victories 
and triumphs, and are invincibly armed against all reverses 
of fortune ; on the contrary, he was one of the quakers, who 
are always the bearers of bad news. " Our affairs," said he, 
" are not going on well in Spain ; we have no cavafay on the 
frontiers, and it is much to be feared that Prince Pio, who 
has a large force there, may exact contributions from all 
Languedoc'' A philosopher, rather out at elbows, sitting 
opposite, was regarding the newsmonger with disdainful pity, 
and shrugging his shoulders at the loudness of his tones. I 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



241 

approached him and he whispered in my ear: ''Look at that 
idiot, entertaining us with his fright about Languedoc ; and 
here am I, who discovered a spot on the sun yesterday, 
which, if it increases, may knock all nature into eternal 
smash, and yet I have not said a word I " 

The 17th of the moon of Rhamazan, 17x9^ 



LETTER CXXXIIL 

RICA TO . 

The other day I visited a large library in a convent of der« 
vishes, who are its guardians, but are compelled to admit 
the public at certain hours. 

On entering I saw a solemn-looking person walking amid 
the innumerable volumes that surrounded him. I went up 
to him and begged that he would tell me the names of some 
large volumes, which, as I remarked, were much better bound 
than the others. " Monsieur," he replied, " I am here in a 
foreign country ; I know none of the inhabitants. Many 
people bother me with such questions, but you can see for 
yourself I am not going to read all these books to satisfy 
them. But I have my librarian, who will have no objection 
to meet your request; he does nothing night or day but 
pore over those things. He is good for nothing else, and is 
a great burden to us, because he does not work for the con- 
vent — But I hear the dinner-bell ringing. Men placed, 
like me, at the head of a community, must be the first at all 
exercises." Thereupon the monk pushed me out, shut the 
door, and was off like a shot 

Paris, the aiet of the moon of Rhamazaa, 1719^ 

r- 

16 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



242 

LETTER CXXXIV- 
RICA TO THE SABfE. 

I RETUioncD to the library the next day, where I found a 
man quite different from the one I had seen before. His 
manners were simple, his features intelligent, and his address 
courteous. As soon as I acquainted him with the subject 
of my curiosity, he set about satisfying it, and as I was a 
stranger, he added some very interesting information as well 

" Father," said I, " what are those large volumes over 
there about?" — " They are," he answered, " commentaries 
on the Scriptures." — " What a number of them I " I exclaimed. 
" The Scriptures must have been very obscure formerly and 
must be very plain now ; are there any doubts still left?" — 
** Any doubts left ! Good heavens I there are almost as many 
doubts as lines 1" was the answer. — " Indeed I And what 
have those authors been doing then?" I said. — "Those 
authors," he rejoined, " have not been searching for what 
ought to be believed but for what they believed themselves. 
They have not regarded it as a book containing the dog* 
mas that ought to be received, but as an authoritative basis 
for their own ideas ; for this reason, they have corrupted all 
the meanings and twisted all the passages. It is a country 
on which men of all sects make descents, and which they 
pillage at their sweet will. It is a field of battle, on which 
hostile nations engage in conflict, attacking and skirmishing, 
all in their several ways. 

"You see, there at your elbow, the ascetic books, or 
books of devotion ; next to them are the works on ethics, 
far more useful; those on theology, utterly unintelligible, 
both on account of the matter and the treatment ; then, the 
books of the mystics, or impassioned devotees — '' " Ah 1 
a moment, father," I interrupted, " do not go so &st ; tell 
me something of the mystics.'' — "Monsieur," said he, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



243 

^ devotion warms a heart easily aroused to passion^ and the 
heart affects the brain, which is wanned also ; the result is 
ecstasies and raptures. This is the delirium of devotion ; 
often it reaches perfection; which means, it degenerates 
into quietism ; you know that a quietist is a combination of 
the madman, the devotee^ and the libertine. 

** Yonder are the casuists, who reveal to the day the se- 
crets of the night ; who shape in their imagination all the 
demons which love can produce, collect, compare, and make 
them the eternal objects of their thoughts ; happy for them 
if their hearts are not affected as well, and do not become 
the accomplices in the irregularities so artiessly described 
and so nakedly painted. 

*' You see, monsieur, that I think freely, and say what I 
think. I am naturally frank, and more so with you, who are 
a foreigner, who wish to know things, and know them as 
they are. If I chose, I might speak of all this with admira- 
tion ; I might repeat again and again : * This is divine ; that 
is worthy of veneration ; there is something marvellous in 
this ; ' and then one of two things would happen : either I 
should deceive you, or you would cease to respect me." 

We had to adjourn the conversation to the next day, as 
the dervish was called away on business. 

Paris, the 23d of the moon of Rhamazan, 17191 

LETTER CXXXV. 

RICA TO THE SAME. 

I RETURNED at the hour appointed, and my friend led me to 
the same place we were in previously. 

''There you see," said he, "the grammarians, glossers, 
and commentators." — " Father," I returned, " surely those 
people did not claim to have any title to the possession of 
good sense ? " — " Oh," he replied, " their works are not the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



244 

worse on that account, for it is never seen in them : so the 
deficiency was rather an advantage than otherwise." — '* Very 
true," I commented, ''and I know not a few philosophers 
who would do well to apply themselves to sciences of the 
kind." 

** Yonder/' he continued, '' are the orators, whose powers 
of persuasion are quite independent of reason, and the geom* 
eters, who persuade a man in spite of himself, and con* 
vince him in arbitrary fashion. 

*' On the other shelves are works on metaphysics, which 
treat of the subliraest questions, and bring you face to face 
with infinity everywhere ; the books on physics, which find 
nothing more marvellous in the economy of the vast universe 
than in the simplest machine of our artisans; books on 
medicine, those monuments of the weakness of nature and 
the potency of art, alarming us when they treat of the slight- 
est maladies, so strong is their presentation of the imminence 
of death, but restoring our sense of security, when they speak 
of the virtue of remedies, as if those would render us immortal. 

" Close by them are the treatises on anatomy, which do 
not contain so much a description of the parts of the human 
body as of the barbarous names that have been given them ; 
and this is not likely either to cure the patient of his disease 
or the doctor of his ignorance. 

" Yonder is the recess assigned to alchemy, which sends 
its adepts indifferently to the almshouses and to the insane 
asylums, as being places equally well suited to them. 

" Here are works of science, or rather of occult ignorance, 
such as those dealing with witchcraft: execrable in the 
opinion of some, pitiable in mine. Such too are the trea* 
tises on judicial astrology — " "What's that you say, father? 
IVeatises on judicial astrology!" I retorted with fire; 
" why, they are the ones we make most of in Persia. They 
regulate all the actions of our lives and determine most of 
our enterprises ; the astrologers are, properly speaking, our 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 









Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



245 

confessors ; Day, they are more : they influence the govern- 
ment of the state.'* — "If that is the case," said he, "you 
live under a much harsher yoke than that of reason : it is 
certainly the queerest of all sovereignties ; I pity a family, 
and, stiU more, a nation, that allows itself to be ruled by the 
planets." — "We use astrology," I replied, "as you use 
algebra. Every nation has its own science, according to 
which it regulates its policy. All our astrologists together 
have never committed so many follies as one of your alge- 
braists has done here. Do you not think that the fortuitous 
concurrence of stars is as safe a rule to follow as the fine 
reasonings of your system-mongers ? If the votes were taken 
on this point in France and Persia, it would be a glorious 
triumph for astrology. It is the mathematicians who would 
bite the dust : what a crushing corollary might be adduced 
against them from this fact ! " 

Our discussion was here interrupted, and we had to 
separate. 

Pxais, the 26th of the moon of Rhamazan, 171^ 



LETTER CXXXVI. 

RICA TO THE SAME. 

At the following interview, my learned friend conducted me 
into a private chamber. 

"These are the books on modem history," he said; 
"yonder are the works written by the historians of the 
Church and of the Popes. I read them for edification, but 
they often have a quite contrary effect 

" The others are the historians of the decline of the great 
Roman empire, which was formed out of the ruins of so 
many old monarchies, and, by its fall, originated so many 
new ones. Countless hordes of barbarous tribes, as unknown 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



246 

as the countries they came from, suddenly appeared, man- 
dated, ravaged, and broke it up into fragments, and founded 
aU the kingdoms which you now see in Europe. These 
people cannot properly be called barbarians, because they 
were free ; indeed, they might be said to have become so 
since, because they have been subjected to arbitrary power 
and lost that mild liberty which is so conformable to reason, 
humanity, and nature. 

'' On these shelves you have before you the historians of 
Germany, which is but the shadow of the first empire, but 
yet, I believe, the only power in the world that division has 
not weakened; the only one, I further believe, that gains 
strength by its losses, and which, though slow to profit by 
success, becomes indomitable under defeat 

** These are the French historians, in whose works you 
may see the formation of the royal power, its death on two 
occasions, its restoration to life, and its deterioration during 
several centuries ; then, as it gradually recovered its strength 
and received fresh accessions of force fit>m every direction, 
its rise to the highest degree of its grandeur; like those 
rivers which lose their waters on their course, or are hidden 
under ground, but again come into the light, swollen by the 
streams that have flowed into them, and hurry along with 
them all the obstacles that oppose their passage. 

" Here, you see the Spanish nation issuing forth fix>m 
some mountains; the Mahometan princes as slowly sub- 
jugated as they had rapidly conquered ; a number of king- 
doms again united into one vast monarchy, which became 
almost supreme, until, under the crushing burden of its ficti- 
tious opulence, it loses strength and even reputation, pre- 
serving but the arrogance derived fix>m its origin. 

" And here are the historians of England, where we behold 
liberty constantly flaming up fix>ro the fires of discord and 
sedition; the prince always tottering on an immovable 
throne ; a nation impatient indeed, yet self-restrained even 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



247 

in its fury, which^ as mistress of the seas (a thing unheard 
of until now) combines trade with empire. 

'* Beside them, are the historians of the republic of Hol- 
land, that other queen of the sea, so respected in Europe 
and so formidable in Asia, where her merchants see kings at 
their feet 

" The historians of Italy bring before your eyes a nation 
once mistress of the world, to-day the slave of all the others, 
her princes divided and feeble, and whose sole attribute of 
sovereignty is a fruitless system of policy. 

" Yonder are the historians of the republics : Switzerland, 
the symbol of liberty ; Venice, which has no resources ex- 
cept her economy ; and Genoa, superb only in her edifices. 

'* These deal with the North, and especially with Poland, 
who makes such an ill use of her freedom and of her right 
to elect her own kings, that it would seem as if she wanted 
to console her neighbors for having lost theirs." 

Thereupon, we separated until the next day. 

Paris, the 2d of the moon of Chalval, 1719. 



LETTER CXXXVII. 

RICA TO THE SAME. 

The next day he led me into another room. ^^This con- 
tains the poets," he said ; *' that b to say, the authors whose 
task it is to fetter common sense and overwhelm reason 
under the pretence of adorning it, just as women were for- 
merly buried in all their gems and jewehy. You know 
them ; they are not rare among the Orientals, where a more 
ardent sun would seem to set the imagination itself on fire. 

" Yonder are the epic poems — " " Eh ! what are epic 
poems? " — "To tell the truth," said he, " I do not know ; 
connoisseurs tell us there have never been more than two, 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



248 

and that all the other so-called epics are not epics at alL 
This also I know nothing of. They also say that it is im- 
possible to make new ones, which is still more suiprising. 

** You are now in presence of the dramatists, who, in my 
opinion, are the only real poets and the only true masters of 
the passions. There are two kinds of them : the comic 
dramatists, who are the source of such agreeable emotions, 
and the tragic, who can throw us into the most violent excite- 
ment and agitation. 

^^ Now you have before you the authors of idyls and pas- 
torals, who are exceedingly popular with courtiers; they 
please the latter by pictures of a certain tranquillity which is 
strange to them, and draw a fanciful representation of its 
existence among shepherds. 

** Of all the authors we have reviewed those before you 
now are the most dangerous : they are the persons who give 
a keen edge to epigrams, sharp little arrows that make a 
wound as deep as it is incurable. 

^ Here you may see the romancers ; they are of the same 
breed as the poets, and commit as many outrages on the 
language of the mind and of the heart as they do. They 
spend their lives in searching for nature and never finding 
her, and create heroes as impossible as winged dragons and 
hippogrifis." 

''I have seen," I remarked, '' some of your romances; 
but, if you were to read ours, you would be still more dis- 
gusted. Apart from their utter want of naturalness, our 
manners have the effect of rendering them awfully tiresome. 
A lover must go through a ten years' course of passion 
before he can even see the face of his mistress. Yet the 
author must provide some amusement for his readers during 
this monotonous preliminary stage. Now, it is impossible 
to vary the incidents ; so recourse is had to an artifice fax 
worse than the evil it is intended to remedy, namely, to prodi* 
gies. I am sure you will hardly regard it as consistent with 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



249 

the order of things for a sorceress to summon an army oat 
of the bowels of the earth, or for one solitary hero to destroy 
a hundred thousand men. Yet such incidents are familiar 
to our romancers : these insipid and often repeated adven- 
tures weary us, and these extravagant wonders revolt us." 

Pariq, the 6th of the moon of Chalval, 1719. 



LETTER CXXXVIIL 

RICA TO IBBEN 
At Smyrna. 

Ministers in this country are like the seasons : they succeed 
and destroy one another with great regularity. I have seen 
the financial system changed four times during the last three 
years. Subsidies are levied in Persia and Turkey to-day as 
they were in the time of the founders of these monarchies. 
This is far from being the case here. It is trye that we do 
not show as much ingenuity in this matter as the people of 
the West We think there is no more difference between the 
administration of the revenues of a prince and those of a 
private person than there is between counting a hundred 
thousand tomans and counting a hundred. But there is 
much more delicate handling and mystery in dealing with 
such affairs here. The greatest minds have to work night 
and day, and have to suffer all the pangs of childbirth in 
bringing forth new plans. They must listen to the advice of 
crowds of people who toil for them gratuitously ; must live 
retired in some remote cabinet which the great cannot pene- 
trate and the little regard with awe ; must always have their 
heads stuffed with important secrets, miraculous designs; and 
new systems ; and must be so absorbed in their meditations 
as to forget the use of language, and, sometimes, the dictates 
of politeness. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



250 

As soon as the late kiog closed his eyes, the question 
of establishing a new administration became prominent 
lliings were felt to be going on badly, but how to mend 
them was the difficulty. The unlimited authority of preced* 
ing ministers was not thought to have worked well : it ought, 
therefore, to be divided. For this puxx>ose, six or seven 
councils were created. The ministry thus formed has, per- 
haps, governed France with sounder judgment than any of 
its predecessors: its duration was short as well as the good 
which it effected. 

France, at the time of the king's death, was a body on 

which fed innumerable diseases. N took the knife in 

his hand, cut off the useless flesh, and applied some local 
remedies ; but the internal seat of these maladies was never 
reached. A stranger arrived and undertook its cure. After 
many violent remedies, he supposed that he had restored 
the patient to her normal plumpness, but he had only ren- 
dered her unnaturally obese. 

All those who were rich six months ago are now destitute, 
and those who had not bread are gorged with wealth. 
Never have these two extremities touched so nearly. This 
foreigner has turned the state as a dealer in old clothes turns 
a coat : he placed what was uppermost under, and what was 
under uppermost. What unexpected fortunes, fortunes in- 
credible even to those who made them ! God could not 
create human beings out of nothing faster. How many 
lackeys are now waited on by their fellows, to be waited on 
to-morrow, perhaps, by their masters ! 

These odd changes are naturally rich in surprises. The 
footmen who mac|e their fortunes during the last reign boast 
of their birth to*day. They lavish on those who have just 
stripped off their livery the seom of which they were them- 
selves the objects six months ago. They cry out, with all 
their strength : "The nobility is ruined I Such disorder in 
the state ! what confusion of ranks ! fellows utterly unknown 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



25 1 

making fortunes on every side ! " The latter, I promise you, 
will have their revenge as well, on those who come after 
them, and in thirty years these people of quality will make 
some noise. 

Paris, the itt of the moon of Zilcade, 172a 



LETTER CXXXIX, 
RICA TO THE SAME. 

I HAVE to tell you of a grand instance of conjugal affection, 
not only in a woman, but in a queen. The queen of 
Sweden, determined at all risks that her husband should 
share her throne, has sent, in order to remove every difficulty, 
a declaration to the states, informing them that she will 
resign the regency, if her husband is elected. 

Sixty years ago, another queen, named Christina, abdi- 
cated the crown, so that she might have leisure to devote 
herself entirely to philosophy. I know not which of these 
two examples is the most to be admired. 

Although I am a firm believer in every one keeping the 
position which nature has assigned him, and feel anything 
but admiration for the weakness of those who, from a belief 
that they are unequal to the duties of their state, abandon 
it, somewhat like deserters, yet am I struck by the greatness 
of soul of these two princesses, and at seeing the mind of 
the one and the heart of the other superior to their fortune. 
At an age when the mind of others is concentrated on 
enjoyment, that of Christina was fixed on the acquisition of 
knowledge, and the only enjoyment sought for by the queen 
of Sweden is to place all her happiness in the hands of her 
husband. 

Paris, the 27th of the moon of Mahamm, I7aa 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



7S2 



LETTER CZL 

RICA TO USBEK 
At 

Tbm Pariiament of Paris has just been banished to a little 
town called Pontoise. The council sent a declaration to 
be registered or approved which would dishonor it, and it 
registered it in a manner which dishonored the council 

Some other parliaments of the realm are menaced with 
similar treatment 

These bodies are always the object of hatred. They 
approach kings only for the purpose of telling them unpleas- 
ant truths ; and, while a crowd of courtiers are constantly 
assuring them that the people are happy under their rule, 
they give the lie to the flattery, and bring to the foot of 
the throne the groans and tears of which they are the 
depositaries. 

Truth, my dear Usbek, is a heavy burden when it has to 
be carried to the ears of princes : they ought to be well 
assured that those who do so are impeDed by a force they 
cannot resist, and that they could never have resolved on 
such a step, entailing such melancholy consequences on 
those who take it, were they not urged thereto by their 
duty, respect, and even love. 

Paeis, the aitt of the moon of Gemmiufi i, I7aa 

LETTER CXLL 

RICA TO THE SAICE 

At . 

I TMTKtm calling upon you towards the end of the week 
How pleasantly the days will slip by in your company I 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



253 

I was presented, some days ago, to a lady of the court, who 
expressed a desire to see my foreign countenance. I found 
her beautiful, worthy of the eyes of our monarch, and well 
deserving of an exalted rank in the sacred place where his 
heart reposes. 

She asked me a thousand questions about the manners 
of the Persians, and the way in which our women live. 
Evidently the life of the seraglio was not to her taste, for she 
intimated her antipathy to the custom of sharing one man 
between ten or twelve women. She could not contemplate 
the happiness of the former without envy, or the condition 
of the latter without pity. As she is fond of reading, and 
particularly so of reading poets and story-tellers, she wished 
me to speak of ours. What I said of them increased her 
curiosity. She begged me to translate a fragment of some of 
those I had with me. I did so, and sent her, some days after, 
a Persian tale : perhaps you might like to see it travestied. 

In the time of Sheik Ali Khan, there was a woman in 
Persia named Zulema: she knew all the sacred Koran by 
heart ; no dervish understood better than she did the tradi- 
tions of the holy prophets ; she comprehended all the mean- 
ings of every mystery propounded by the Arab doctors; 
and to all this mass of knowledge were joined a liveliness 
and gayety which left her hearers doubtful whether she 
meant to amuse or instruct them. Happening to be on a cer- 
tain day in an apartment of the seraglio with her companions, 
she was asked by one of them what she thought of the next 
life, and whether she had any faith in that ancient tradition 
of the doctors, that Paradise was made for men alone. 

" It is the common sentiment," she answered. " Nothing 
has been left undone to degrade our sex. In fact, it is the 
opinion of a nation scattered over Persia, called the Jewish 
people, that we have no souls, and they base it on tbs 
authority of their sacred books. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



254 

^Thcse insultiDg notioDs have no other origm than die 
anogance of man, who would extend his authority even 
beyond his piesent life, and forgets that, on the great day, 
an creatures will appear before God as nothing, divested of 
every privflege except that which virtue has acquired. 

^ God win not limit Himself in His rewards ; and, just as 
men who have lived well, and made a good use of the power 
they possessed over us here below, will dwell in a Paradise 
filled with beauties so divine and enchanting that, were a 
mortal to see them, he would at once kill himself, out of 
his impatience to enjoy them, virtuous women will also go 
into an abode of delight, where they will be intoxicated 
with a torrent of pleasure in the embraces of godlike men 
who wiU be placed at their service ; each woman will have a 
seraglio in which these men will be shut up, under the 
guardianship of eunuchs fax more fiuthful than ours. 

''I have read," said she, '*in an Arabian book, that a 
man, named Ibraham, was insupportable on account of his 
jealousy. He had twelve exceedingly beautiful wives, whom 
he treated with great harshness. Not satisfied with confid- 
ing them to the watchfulness of his eunuchs or trusting in 
the walls of his seraglio, he almost always kept them under 
lock and key in their several rooms. He would not allow 
them to converse together, for he was jealous even of an 
innocent friendship. All his actions were colored by his 
natural brutality : never did his lips utter a gentle word, and 
never did he make a gesture which had not the efifect of 
adding to the rigor of their slavery. 

^* One day when he had assembled them all in an apartment 
of the seraglio, a woman, bolder than the others, reproached 
him with his savage temper. ' The person,' she said, ' who 
is so industrious in his search for the means of inspiring 
fear, is always sure to find the means of inspiring hatred 
instead. We are so unhappy that we cannot help wishing 
for a change : others in my place might desire your death. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



255 

I only desire my own ; and, as I have no hope of being 
separated from you except by death, death, when it comes, 
will be the sweeter to me for that very reason/ These words, 
which should have excited his compassion, threw him into 
a furious rage ; he drew his dagger, and plunged it into her 
breast. ' My dear companions,' she said, in a dying voice, 
' if Heaven takes pity on my virtue, you will be avenged.' 
With these words, she quitted this miserable life, and passed 
into that delightful land in which virtuous women enjoy a 
happiness that is every day renewed. 

" At first she saw a smiling meadow, whose verdure was set 
off by pictures of the gayest flowers ; a stream, whose waters 
were purer than crystal, flowed through it, with a thousand 
meandering turns. She next entered an enchanting grove, 
whose silence was broken only by the sweet warbling of birds. 
Afterwards appeared splendid gardens, on which nature had 
bestowed all her tasteful simplicity as well as all her magnifi- 
cence. At length, she reached a superb palace, which had 
been prepared for her reception and filled with celestial men 
appointed for her pleasure. 

" Two of them came forward at once to disrobe her ; others 
placed her in a bath and perfumed her with the most deli- 
cious essences; she was then presented with garments 
infinitely richer than her own, and led into a large apartment, 
where a fire was burning made of odoriferous woods, and 
a table was set covered with a most exquisite repast. Every- 
thing seemed to combine to enrapture the senses : she heard 
on one side a strain of heavenly music, made even more 
so by its surpassing tenderness ; on the other, she saw the 
dances of these divine beings, solely occupied in pleasing 
her. However, aU these pleasures served only as a prepara- 
tion for pleasures still more ravishing. She was conducted 
to her.chamber, and, after having been once more undressed, 
borne to a gorgeous couch, where two men of bewitching 
beauty received her in their arms. Then she was indeed 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



255 

fntofpcated, and her tnuuports surpassed even her desireSi 
* I am beside myself with rapture/ she exclaimed ; ' I should 
believe myself dying were I not sure of immortality. It is 
too much, leave me; I am overpowered by the excessive 
vehemence of pleasure. Yes, now you restore a little calm- 
ness to my senses ; I begin to breathe and return to myself. 
Why have the torches been taken away? Why can I not 
still gaze upon your divine beauty? Why can I not 
see — But why see? You make me fall back into my 
former transports. Ye gods ! how delightful is this dark- 
ness ! What ! I shall be immortal, and immortal with you 1 
I shall be — No, grant me a respite, for I see that you 
are the kind of people who never ask for one.' 

'' After reiterated commands, she was obeyed ; but yet not 
obeyed, until she showed she was in serious earnest Lan- 
guishing, she gave herself up to repose, and fell asleep in 
their arms. It required only two moments* rest to restore 
her strength; she received two kisses which inflamed her 
at once, and made her open her eyes. 'I am anxious,' 
said she; 'I fear that you love me no more.' It was a 
doubt in which she did not wish to continue long ; and so 
she had with them as many illustrations of the contrary as 
she could desire : ' I am disabused,' she cried ; * pardon 
me ; I am sure of you : you say nothing, but your actions 
prove it better than anything you could say. Yes, yes, I 
confess it, no one has ever loved me to such a degree. But 
what! you are disputing as to which shall have the honor 
of convincing me ! Ah ! if you dispute, if you unite the 
ambition of defeating me to the pleasure of doing so, I am 
lost ; you will both be the victors, and I alone the vanquished ; 
but I will make you pay dear for your victory.' 

" All this continued without interruption until daybreak. 

*' Her courteous and faithful attendants entered her cham- 
ber and caused these two young men to rise ; two old men 
led them back to the apartment where they were kept for 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



257 

her pleasure. She rose afterwards, and showed herself to « 
court that idolized her^ at first, in the charms of a simple 
undress, and, subsequently, in the most magnificent raiment 
That night had enhanced her beauty, given firesh animation 
to her features, and a livelier fascination to her expression. 
The remainder of the day was spent in dancing, concerts, 
festivals, sports, and promenades ; and it was noticed that 
Anais withdrew from time to time and fled to her two young 
heroes. After she had interviewed them for a few moments, 
she returned to the company she had left, her countenance 
always displaying an ever increasing serenity. At length, 
towards evening, she was lost sight of entirely : she had gone 
to shut herself up in the seraglio, where she wished, she 
said, to make acquaintance with those immortal captives who 
were to live with her forever. She therefore visited the 
most remote and most charming apartments of this palace, 
where she counted fifty slaves whose beauty was simply 
miraculous. She wandered all the night from chamber to 
chamber, where the homage she received in each was always 
different, and yet always the same. 

'' Such was the manner in which the immortal Anais spent 
her life, now in the midst of brilliant pleasures, now in solitary 
ones, now the centre of a splendid circle of admirers, now in 
the arms of an impassioned lover. Often she abandoned an 
enchanted palace and retired into a rustic grotto. Flowers 
seemed to spring up under her feet, and pastimes innumer- 
able were always within her reach. 

'^ She had been more than a week in this abode of bliss, so 
transported with delights that she never gave a solitary thought 
to the past She had enjoyed her happiness unconsciously, 
and had had none of those tranquil moments, when the 
soul, so to speak, takes stock of itself, and listens to its own 
language while the passions are dumb. 

" The pleasures of the blessed are so keen that they rarely 
have such fi-eedom of mind ; being invincibly attached to the 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



258 

pRteot thej lose tbe memoiy of the pasl^ and no kmger take 
thought of what they had known and k>ved in their previous 
life. 

** Bat Anais possessed a truly phik)sophical intellect, and 
had passed her earthly career in meditation ; her reflections 
had gone much farther than was to be expected in the case 
of a woman abandoned to hersel£ It was the only advantage 
left her in the austere seclusion in which her husband kept 
her. It was this strength of mind that enabled her to despise 
the fears that appalled her companions, and to welcome 
death as the end of her sorrows and the beginning of her joys. 

'' Thus she gradually escaped from the intoxication of pleas- 
ure, and shut herself up alone in an apartment of her palace. 
There, she gave free rein to pleasant reflections on her past 
condition and present felicity; she could not help being 
moved by the wretchedness of her companions ; the torments 
we have shared afiect our sensibility. Anais did not remain 
within the mere limits of compassion; her tenderness for 
these unfortunates induced her to help them. 

" She ordered one of her young men who was by to assume 
the figure of her husband, go to the seraglio, become its 
master, expel him from it, and remain in his place until 
further orders. 

** The execution was prompt : he clove the air, and, in a 
moment, was at the door of Ibraham, who happened to be 
out. He knocked ; it was at once opened ; the eunuchs fell 
at his feet : he sped to the apartments where the wives of 
Ibraham were imprisoned. He had, on his way, taken the 
keys out of the pocket of that old growler, to whom he was 
invisible. He enters, surprises them, first, by his gentle and 
courteous demeanor, and, soon after, surprises them still 
more by the alacrity and rapidity of his enterprises. All had 
equal reason for their amazement, and they would have 
taken him for the phantom of a dream, if he had not shown 
that he was very real indeed. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



259 

''While these novel scenes were being enacted in the seia- 
glio, Ibraham thundered at the door, gave his name, stormed 
and shouted. After surmounting innumerable difficulties, he 
entered and excited the greatest alarm among the eunuchs. 
He strode along enraged, but leaped back, Uke one who had 
Men from the clouds, when he saw the false Ibraham, his 
living image, exercising aU the rights of a master. He cried 
for help, he called on his eunuchs to aid him in killing this 
impostor, but he was not obeyed. The only resource left 
him, and it was a weak one, was to submit tiie case to the 
judgment of his wives. In an hour the false Ibraham had 
seduced all his judges. He was dragged ignominiously from 
the seraglio, and would have suffered a thousand deaths, liad 
not his rival ordered his life to be spared. Thus the new 
Ibraham remained master on the field of battle, where he 
showed himself more and more worthy of his position, and 
signalized his presence by miracles till then unknown. 

** * You do not resemble Ibraham,' said these women. — ' Say 
rather/ said the triumphant Ibraham, 'that this impostor 
does not resemble me. What could he do to prove himself 
your husband, if what I do is not sufficient?' 

'' ' Ah, we shall take good care not to have any doubt on 
the matter,' said the women. ' If you are not Ibraham, it 
is enough for us that you have so well proved your title to be 
him : you are more Ibraham in a day than he has been in 
the whole course of ten years.' — ' You promise then,' he 
returned, ' that you will declare in my favor against this im- 
postor?' — 'Have no doubt on that point,' they chorused; 
' we swear eternal fidelity to you alone : too long have we 
been abused ; it was not our virtue, it was his own impo- 
tence that the traitor suspected ; we see clearly now that all 
men are not made like him; doubtless, it is you they 
resemble. If you knew how much you have made us hate 
him I ' — ' Ah I I will often give you fi^h reasons for hating 
him,' answered the false Ibraham ; ' you do not yet know 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



26o 

all the wrong he has done you.*— 'We judge of his wicked- 
ness by the greatness of your vengeance/ they answered. 
* Yes» you are right/ said the godlike man ; ' I have made 
the punishment fit the crime. I am very glad that you are 
satisfied with my method of punishment' — ' But,' said the 
women, 'if this impostor returns, what are we to do?' — 
'* It would be difficult, I imagine, for him to deceive you,' 
he replied : ' the duties of the post I have occupied near you 
are seldom discharged by trickery ; and, besides, I will send 
him so far away that you will no longer hear anything about 
him ; in the mean time, I shall undertake the care of your 
happiness myself. I will not be jealous. I know the way of 
making myself safe with you without azmbying you in any 
way. If you are not virtuous with me, with whom could you 
be virtuous?' This conversation lasted long between him 
and the women, who, more impressed by the difference 
between the two Ibrahams than by their resemblance, never 
even dreamed of seeking to have these marvels explained. 
At length, the despairing husband returned again to plague 
them ; he found lids entire household making merry, and his 
wives more incredulous than ever. It was no place for a jeal- 
ous man ; he went away in a rage, and, a moment afterwards, 
the false Ibraham followed and laid hold of him ; he then 
carried him up into the air and dropped him in a place 
four hundred leagues distant 

'' Who can picture the desolation of these women at the 
absence of their dear Ibraham I Already the eunuchs had 
resumed their natural severity ; the whole household was in 
tears ; sometimes they imagined that all that had happened 
was but a dream; they gazed anxiously on each other^s 
features, and recalled the slightest incidents in their strange 
adventures; at last, Ibraham returned, more lovable than 
ever. It soon became evident that his journey had not 
exhausted him. The behavior of the new master was so 
directly contradictory to that of the other that it excited 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



26l 

ni^enal astonishment among his ndghbon. He dismissed 
all his eanachsy and kept open house for everybody ; he would 
not even permit his wives to be veiled. It was a singular 
change to see them sitting side by side with men at banquets, 
quite as free as they. Ibraham, with good reason, had 
assumed that the customs of the country were not made for 
people like him. However, he sp^ed no expense. He 
dissipated with the utmost profusion the property of his 
jealous predecessor, who, on returning three years afterwards 
from the distant land whither he had been transported, 
found nothing left but his wives and thirty-six children." 

Paxis, the a6th of the moon of Gemmadi i, 1720. 



LETTER CXLH. 

RICA TO USBEK 
At . 

Hekx is a letter I received yesterday from a scholar : yon 
may think it singular. 

Monsieur, — Six months ago, a very wealthy uncle of mine 
left me five or six thousand livres and a bouse splendidly fur- 
nished. It is pleasant to have property, when you know how to 
make a good use of it I have no ambition and no taste for 
pleasure ; I have always remained in my study, when I lead 
the life of a scholar. It is the natural home of every curious 
investigator of antiquity. 

When my uncle closed his eyes, I was anxious to have him 
interred according to the rites and ceremonies observed by the 
ancient Greeks and Romans ; but I bad neither lacrymatories, 
nor urns, nor antique lamps. Since then, I have acquired an 
excellent store of these precious rarities. A few days ago, I 
sold my silver plate, and bought an earthen lamp which had 
belonged to a stoic. I have removed aU the mirrors that 
adorned the walls of almost every room in my uncle's mansion. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



262 

and, with the proceeds of their sale, have purchased a little 
looking-glass, somewhat cracked, ooce used by Virgil. I was 
enchanted to behold my features reflected where those of the 
Mantuan swan had been reflected before. Nor b this all : for 
a hundred louis d*or, I have acquired five or six copper coins 
which were current just two thousand years ago. I do not be- 
lieve there is at the present moment a single article of furniture 
in my house which was made before the decline of the Roman 
empire. I have a little cabinet of very rare and very costly 
manuscripts. Although I am rapidly losing my eyesight from 
poring over them, I prefer them to printed copies, which are 
not so correct, and are, besides, in the hands of everybody. 
Although I never go out, I have an uncontrollable passion for 
all the ancient roads made by the Romans. There is one near 
me planned by a proconsul who lived about twelve hundred 
years before our time : when I go to my country house, I never 
fail to use it, although It is very inconvenient and takes me more 
than three miles out of my course ; but it drives me distracted 
to see that wooden posts have been erected on it at regular dis- 
tances to show how far the neighboring towns are. To have 
these wretched signposts before my eyes, instead of the military 
columns that were there formerly, makes me frantic. But I 
expect to have them restored by my heirs, and I intend to bind 
them in my will to do so. If you happen to have any Persian 
manuscript about you, monsieur, you will do me a great favor 
by letting me have it ; I will pay you whatever you ask, and give 
you, over and above the bargain, some works written by myself, 
in which you will see that I am not a useless member of the 
republic of letters. You will notice among them a dissertation 
in which I demonstrate that the crown formerly worn in the 
triumphs was of oak and not of laurel ; you will admire another, 
which proves, by learned conjectures drawn from the weightiest 
Greek authors, that Cambyses was wounded in the left leg and 
not in the right, and another, in which I show that a low fore- 
head was a beauty in great request among the Romans. I will 
also send you a quarto, which explains a line in the fifth book 
of the iEneid of Viigil. You will receive all these things in a 
few days, and, in the mean time, I am content with sending you 
this fragment of an ancient Greek mythologist, which has never 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



263 

beien pttblished here, and which I have discovered in the dust of 
a library. I now conclude, for I am engaged on a most impor- 
tant affair, nothing less than the restoration of a fine passage in 
the natursdist Pliny, which the copyists of the fifth century have 
strangely disfigured. 

I am, etc., . 

FRAGMENT OF AN ANCIENT MYTHOLOGIST. 

In an island near the Orcades, a child was bom whose father 
was i^olus, god of the winds, and whose mother was a 
nymph of Caledonia. It was said of him that he learned, 
without any help, to count by means of his fingers, and that, 
though he was only four years old, he distinguished the dif- 
ference between metals so perfectly that, when his mother 
gave him a tin ring, instead of a gold one, he saw through 
the trick and fiung it on the ground. 

As soon as he was full grown, his father taught him the art 
of enclosing the winds in bags made of skins, and he sold 
them to such as went to sea. But as this merchandise was 
not very highly appreciated in his own country, he abandoned 
the latter and set about travelling through the world, in com- 
pany with the blind god of chance. 

He learned during his pilgrimage that Betica was a land 
where gold glistened in every direction : so he hurried thither 
as fast as his legs could carry him. But he was very ill re- 
ceived by Saturn, who was reigning at that time. But as 
soon as this god quitted the earth, he decided to go to all the 
crossways, where he cried incessantly in a hoarse voice: 
" People of Betica, you believe you are rich, because you 
have gold and silver: your error excites my compassion. 
Be guided by me, abandon the land of the vile metals and 
come into the empire of the imagination, and I promise you 
wealth at which you will be yourselves astonished." Imme- 
diately he opened a large number of the skin-bags, and di»i 
tributed his merchandise at will 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



264 

Next day he letmned to the same croaaways and ciieds 
^People of Betica, would you be rich? Imagine that I am 
very rich, and that you, too, are very rich. Get it into your 
heads every morning that your fortune has doubled duringthe 
night; then rise, and if you have creditors, go and p^ them 
with what you have imagined, and tell them to imagine in 
their turn." 

He made his appearance again a few days afterwards, and 
spoke thus : '' People of Betica, I see deariy that your imag- 
inations are not so lively as they were a while ago ; allow 
them to follow the lead of mine. I will place every morning 
before your eyes a bill which will be a source of wealth for 
you ; it contains only four words,^ but they will be very sig- 
nificant words indeed, for they will regulate the dowry of 
your wives, the fortunes of your daughters, and the number 
of your servants. And as for you," he said, turning to those 
nearest him, "as for you, my dear children (I may call you 
by that name, for you have received from me a second 
birth), my bill shall regulate the magnificence of your equi- 
pages, the splendor of your festivab, and the number and 
pensions of your mistresses." 

Some days afterwards he rushed into the crossways, quite 
out of breath, and, beside himself with rage, he shouted : — 

*' People of Betica, I have advised you to imagine, and I 
see that you don't imagine at all ; well, then, now I order 
you ! " Thereupon he abruptly left them, but on second 
thoughts he returned. ** I learn that some of you have such 
an execrable disposition that you are actually keeping a tight 
grip on your gold and silver. As for the silver, I don't so 
much mind ; but for the gold — the gold — Ah 1 I cannot 
restrain my indignation ; I swear by my sacred windbags that 
if the persons to whom I refer do not bring it to me they 
shall meet condign punishment at my hands ! " Then he 
added persuasively : ** Do you think it is because I want to 

^ The price of shares {/es ctttrt des actwmt). 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



265 

keep those miserable metals that I ask yoa to give them to 
me? In proof of my sincerity I can avouch that, when you 
took them to me a few days ago, I immediately gave you 
back the half." 

On the next day he rather kept his distance from the 
crowd, and addressed them in soft and honeyed accents: 
" People of Betica, I learn that you have a portion of your 
treasures in foreign countries ; I entreat you to bring them 
to me ; you will please me thereby, and I shaU be eternally 
grateful." 

The son of iSolus was speaking to persons who felt any- 
thing but disposed for laughter, but at this they roared ; this 
made him turn round abashed ; but recovering his courage, 
he ventured on another little petition. ** I know that you 
have precious stones ; in the name of Jupiter get rid of 
them ; nothing can bring you down to poverty fester than 
these kinds of things ; get rid of them, I tell you ; if you 
cannot do so yourselves, I 'II send you some excellent busi- 
ness people for the purpose. What wealth is about to M 
into your laps, if you do what I advise you 1 Yes, I promise 
you the very best things in my windbags." 

At last he mounted on a platform, and in a tone of more 
assurance than ever, said : " People of Betica, I have com- 
pared your present happy condition with that in which I 
found you on my arrival here ; you are now the richest peo- 
ple in the world ; but, to crown your good fortune, please 
allow me to take away the half of your possessions." After 
these words the son of iEolus soared away on rapid wing, 
and left his audience in a state of terror that cannot be de- 
scribed; which seeing, he returned on the morrow, and 
thus discoursed : '* I perceived yesterday that my language 
displeased you extremely. Well, then, consider all I said as 
unsaid. You are right, the half is too much. But I have 
other methods of attaining the end I have proposed. Let 
us all collect our wealth in the same place ; we can do so 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



266 

easfly, because it does not occupy a great space."* And 
immediately tbree-foorths of it had disappeared. 

Paris, the 9di of the moon o£ Chahban, I7aa 



LETTER CXLIII. 

RICA TO NATHANIEL LEVI, JEWISH DOCTOR, 
At Lsghoen. 

You ask me what I think of the virtue of amulets. Why do 
you address me on the subject? You are a Jew and I am 
a Mahometan ; that is to say, we are two very credulous 
people. 

I wear always on my person more than two thousand pas- 
sages of the holy Koran ; I have a slip tied round my arm 
on which are written the names of more than two hundred 
dervishes ; those of Ali, Fatme, and aU the Pure are about 
my clothes in some twenty places. 

However, I do not find fault with those who refuse to see 
any virtue in the use of certain words ; it is much more diffi- 
cult for us to answer their reasoning than it is for them to 
answer our experience. 

I carry all these holy tatters through long habit, to con- 
form to a universal practice. I believe that, if they have no 
more virtue than rings and other decorative articles, they 
certainly have not less. But it is in some mysterious letters 
that your confidence is placed, and, except for them, you 
would be in continual terror. Men are very unfortunate; 
they waver continually between (ahc hopes and ridiculous 
fears, and instead of relying on reason, they invent monsters 
who intimidate them, or phantoms who seduce them. 

What effect can the arrangement of certain letters pro- 
duce? What effect can their disarrangement interfere with? 
What relation have they with the winds, that they shoukl 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



26/ 

Appease tempests ; with gunpowderi that they should anni- 
hilate force, or with what physicians call the peccant humor 
and the morbific cause of diseases, that they should cure 
them? 

The most extraordinary thing in all this is that those who 
perplex their reason in the attempt to show a connection be- 
tween certain events and certain assumed occult virtues, 
have to make quite as great an effort in order to prevent them- 
selves from seeing their true cause. 

You will tell me that certain charms have won a battle ; 
and I shall tell you that a man must be blind not to see in 
Che situation of the field, the number or courage of the sol- 
diers, or the experience of the captain, sufficient to produce 
the effect whose cause you are willing to ignore. 

I admit, for the moment, that there are charms ; suppose 
you admit, for the moment^ that there are none : for this is 
not impossible. The concession you make me will not pre- 
vent the two armies fit>m fighting : do you hold that in such 
a case, neither of them can gain the victory? 

Do you believe that their fate will remsun undecided, until 
some invisible power come to determine it; that every 
attack will be ineffectual, all skill vain, and all courage 
useless? 

Are you convinced that the presence of death fix>m so 
many different directions cannot originate those panic terrors 
you find so much difficulty in explaining? Are you con- 
vinced that in an army of a hundred thousand men there 
cannot be a single poltroon ; that the cowardice of the latter 
will not affect another ; and that other, a third ; and the 
third, a fourth? Nothing more is necessary to render an 
army, all of a sudden, hopeless of conquering, and the larger 
the army, the more hopeless it becomes. 

Everybody knows, and everybody feels that men, like all 
creatures prompted by the instinct of self-preservation, dearly 
love life. This is recognized as a universal principle, and yet 



Digitized by VjOOQIC 



368 

it ii aiked why, on a paztkobr occasion, tiiey thoukl fear to 
lose it 

Ahhoog^ the sacred books of all nations are full of these 
panic or supernatural terrors, I can imagine nothing more 
frivolous, because, in order to be certain that an eflfect which 
may owe its origin to a hundred thousand causes, is super- 
natural, there must be first an investigation as to whether 
any of these causes has acted; and such an investigation 
is impossible. 

I do not care to enter further into the subject, Nathaniel: 
in my opinion, it hardly deserves such serious treatment 

PAais, the 20th ol the moon of Chahban, I7aa 

P. & — As I was finishing, I heard them crying out in the 
streets a letter from a physician in the provinces to a physi- 
cian in Paris (for here every trifle is printed, published, and 
purchased) ; I thought it well to send it to you, as it has 
some bearing on the subject There are many things in it I 
do not understand; but you, who are a doctor, ought to 
know the language of your brethren. 

LETTER FROM A PHYSICIAN IN THE PROVINCES 
TO A PHYSICIAN IN PARIS. 

We had a patient in our town who did not sleep for 
thirty-five days ; his doctor prescribed opium, but could not 
get him to take it ; and when the patient had the cup in his 
hand, he felt more repugnance for the draught than ever. 
At length he said to his physician : " Monsieur, grant me a 
respite until to-monow : I know a man who does not practise 
medicine, but has a multitude of remedies against insomnia 
in his house ; permit me to send for him ; and, if I do not 
sleep to-night, I promise to avail myself of your services.** 
When the doctor was gone, the sick man drew the curtains 
and said to his page : " Go at once to M. Anis, and tell him 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



269 

I want hinu" M. Asis obeyed the summons. ** My dear 
AxdSf' said the patient, '' I am dying, I cannot sleep ; would 
you not have in your shop the C. of G., or better still some 
book of devotion composed by a R. P. J., which you have 
not sold ? for the remedies longest in stock are often the best" 
— " Monsieur," said the bookseller, ** I have Father Caussin's 
' Holy Court,' in six volumes, which is at your service : I 
will send it at once, and I hope it may do you good. Should 
you desire the works of the revered Father Rodriguez, the 
Spanish Jesuit, you can also have them. But, if you take my 
advice, you '11 stick to Father Caussin. With God's help, I 
expect that a single sentence of Father Caussin will do you 
as much good as a whole page of the C. of G." Thereupon 
M. Anis left, and ran to his shop to get the remedy. The 
" Holy Court " arrived, and, after it was well dusted, the son 
of the sick man, who was a young scholar, began to read : he 
was the first person affected ; at the second page, his articu- 
lation became indistinct, whUe the rest of the company were 
already dozing ; a few minutes after, every one was snoring, 
except the sick man, who resisted for a time, but eventually 
fell into a deep slumber. 

The doctor returned in the morning : " Well, did he take 
the opium?" There was no answer; the wife and daughter 
and young son pointed to Father Caussin. He asked 
them what they meant ; they told him. " Long live Father 
Caussin I " was the cry : " we must have him rebound. Who 
could have thought of such a thing ! who could have believed 
it ! it is a miracle 1 stay, monsieur, take a look at Father 
Caussin. That is the volume that made our father sleep ; " 
and then there was an explanation of everything that had 



The doctor was a subtle man, thoroughly acquainted with 
all the mysteries of the cabala and the power of words and 
of spirits. After reflecting a long time, he resolved to 
change his method of practice absolutely. " This is a very 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



270 

ringuhr b£X!* he said; ''I have met with an experience 
which I must really utUize. Why should not a spirit trans- 
mit to a work the same qualities it possessed itself? Do we 
not see such things happen every day? At leasts the trial is 
well worth making. I am weaiy of the apothecaries ; their 
syrups and juleps and all their Galenian drugs ruin patients 
and their health as welL Suppose we alter the system, and 
see what virtue there is in spirits.'' Following out his idea, 
he invented a new pharmacy, as you will see by the descrip- 
tion I am going to give you of the principal remedies he 
used in his practice. 

Purgative Tisane. 

Take three leaves of Aristode's Logic in &eek; two 
leaves of a treadse on Scholastic Theology, the acutest you 
can find, as, for example, that of the subtle Scott ; four of 
Paracelsus; one of Aricenna; three of Porphyry; as many 
of Plotinus ; as many of lamblichus : infuse the whole for 
twenty-four hours, and take four doses a day. 

A more Violent Purgative. 

Take ten A of the C ^ concerning the B and 

the C of the L ; distil them in a water bath ; dilute 

an acrid and pungent drop that will come from the mix- 
ture in a glass of fresh water: drink off the whole with 
confidence. 

An Emetic . 

Take six harangues ; a dozen funeral orations : any ones 
will do, except those of M. of N., which are to be carefully 
excluded ; a collection of new operas ; fifty romances ; thirty 
new memoirs : put the whole in a matras Q) : let it dissolve 
for two days, then distil it in a sand-bath. And if all thb 
does not work — 

1 Chemical vessel fonnerly in ase. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2/1 



A sHU mare Powerful EmOic. 

Take a sheet of marbled paper, which has served as a 
cover for a collection of the writiogs of the J. F. ; infuse it 
for three minutes ; have a spoonful of this infusion wanned, 
and swallow it 

A very SUf^le Remedy far the Cure af Asthma. 

Read all the works of the reverend Father Maimbouxf , 
ez-jesuit, taking care to stop only at the end of each period, 
and your power of breathing is sure to return gradually, nor 
will you need to repeat the remedy. 

A Preventative against the Itch^ Rash, Sorehead^ and 
the Farcy. 

Take three of the categories of Aristotle, two metaphysical 
degrees, one distinction, six verses of ChapeJain, a phrase 
from the letters of the Abb^ of Saint-Cyran: write the 
whole on a slip of paper, which you will fold and tie with a 
ribbon : then wear it round the neck. 

Miraculum chymicum, de Violenta FermentaHane cum 
Fiimo, Igne^ et Mamma. 

Misce Qnesnellianam infusionem cum infusione Lallema- 
niana ; fiat fermentatio cum magna vi, impetu et tonitru, 
acidis pugnantibus, et invicem penetrantibus alcalinos sales : 
fiet evaporatio ardentium spirituum. Pone liquorem fermen- 
tatum in alembico: nihil inde extiahes, et nihil invenies^ 
nisi caput mortuum. 

Lieitftwum. 

Recipe Molinse anodyni chartas duas ; Escobaris lelaxa- 
tivi paginas sex ; Vasquii emollientis folium unum : infunde 
in aquse communis libias iiij. Ad consumptionem dimidiss 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



{Mfftb roifntnr et exprimantur; et in espfOBone dmttm 
Bauni detenivi et Tan^xirim ablncntb folia ig. 
Fiat clyster. 

Im ChiofViimptam Vulgus PaUidos Q^oraaui RMm 
AwuUoriam t^peUat. 

Recipe Aietini figuras quatuor; R. Thonue Sanchii de 
matrimoiiio folia ij. InfondaQtur in aquae commiinis libras 
qulnque. 

Fiat ptisana aperiens. 

Such are the drugs which our doctor uses in his piacticey 
and with notable success. He does not wish, he says, to 
employ remedies the cost of which would ruin his patients ; 
especially as they are very rare and hardly ever found : as, 
for instance, a dedication which has never made anybody 
yawn, a preface too short, a pastoral that was really the 
work of the bishop issuing it, the work of a Jansenist con- 
demned by another Jansenist or pndsed by a Jesuit. He 
said that these kinds of remedies were only to be found in 
the repertory of quacks, and for quacks he had an invincible 
antipathy* 

LETTER CXLIV. 

USBEK TO RICA. 

I MET two scholars, a few days ago, in a country-house where 
I was visiting, who have a great reputation in this country. 
Their characters certainly astonished me considerably. The 
conversation of the first, evidendy highly valued, amounted 
to this : '' What I have said is true, because I said it'* 
The conversation of the second might be epitomized thus : 
''What I have not said is not true, because I did not 
say if 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



273 

I rather pre f erred the first : a man's obstbacy does no^ 
after aD, affect me; but a man's impertinence does sq 
considerably. The first defends his opinions: they are his 
property ; the second attacks the opinions of others, and 
they are the property of the whole world. 

Oh, my dear Usbek, how banefiil is vanity to those who 
have a larger dose of it than is absolutely needed for self- 
preservation 1 Such people wish to attract admiration by 
rendering themselves offensive to others. They try to be the 
superiors of their fellows, and they are not even their equals. 

Come hither, ye modest men, and let me embrace you. 
You give to life aXL its sweetness and chann. You think you 
have nothing, and I tell you you have everything. You 
believe you never humiliate any one, and you humiliate 
every one. And, when I compare you in my own mind 
with those arrogant men I see everywhere around me, I 
hurl them fi-om their tribunals, and stretch them prostrate 
at your feet 

Paris, the 22d of the moon of Chahban, I7aa 



LETTER CXLV. 

USBEK TO . 

A HAN of great intellect is difiicult to please in society ; he 
selects very few acquaintances, and is bored by that numer- 
ous class which he is pleased to term bad company. He 
cannot hinder this feeling of distaste from finding outward 
expression, and, consequently, has many enemies. 

Sure that he can make himself agreeable when he wishes, 
he very often neglects to do so. 

He is inclined to criticise, because he sees more things 
than others and feels them more keenly. 

He almost always ruins his fortune, because his intellect 
j8 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



274 

a great mioy more methods of dcring tliif 
icach. 

He faib in his e nleipi i ac s, becanse he is too ventnresome. 
Hb iaucakj of extended vision leads him to see objects at 
too great distances, even if it is not taken into account that, 
when his mind fonns a phm, he b less stmck by the difficul- 
ties it entails dian by the means of conquering them he will 
find in his own resources. 

He n^lects small details^ on which, however, depends 
the success of almost all great en te rprises. 

The man of moderate abilities, on the other hand, turns 
everything to account : he sees dearly that trifles are not to 
be neglected. 

He is usually the object of universal approval Peof^ 
feel as much delight in according it to him as in withholding 
it from the man of genius. While every one assails the latter, 
to whom nothing is pardoned, everything the former does 
is interpreted in his fistvor : vanity takes his side. . 

But if the man of genius has so many difiiculties to contend 
with, what shall we say of the man of science? 

I never think of the subject without recalling a letter from 
one of them to a friend of his. Here it is. 

Monsieur, — I am a man who spends all his nights in 
observing through telescopes thirty feet long those bodies which 
revolve above our heads, and, when I wish to have some recrea- 
tion, I take my litde microscopes and examine a maggot or a 
mite. 

I am not rich, and have only one room. I do not dare to 
make a fire, because I keep my thermometer in it, which the 
additional warmth would cause to rise. Last winter I thought 
I should die of the cold ; and yet, although my thermometer, 
which was at the lowest degree, warned me that my hands were 
about to freeze, I was not disturbed in the least : now I have 
tiie consolation of having an exact knowledge of all the most 
Insensible changes in the weather during the past year. 

I hold very little intercourse with people, ami know veiy 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



275 

few amongst all those I see. But there is a man in Stockholm, 
another in Leipsic, and another in London, whom I have never 
seen, and doubtless never shall see, with whom I correspond so 
regularly that I never let a post pass without writing to them. 

However, although I am not acquainted with a single person 
in mj neighborhood, my reputation is so bad that I shall, in 
the end, be forced to leave it. I was rudely insulted five years 
ago, by a woman living near me, for dissecting a dog, which she 
claimed belonged to her. The wife of a butcher, who happened 
to be present, took her part, and, while the former was outrage- 
ously abusing me, the latter pelted me with stones, as well as 

Doctor , who was with me, and who received terrible blows 

on the OS frontal and occipital, whereby his mind was very much 
shaken. 

Ever since, when a dog strays away from the end of the street, 
it is at once decided that he has passed through my hands. A 
worthy bourgeoise who had lost her pet, which she loved, she 
said, better than her children, came the other day and fainted 
in my room, and not finding it, summoned me before a magis- 
trate. I believe I shall never be freed from the pertinacious 
malice of these women, whose shrill voices stun me incessantly 
with funeral orations on all the automata that have died during 
the last ten years. 

I am, etc. 

Every learned man was formerly accused of magic. I am 
not astonished at this. Each said to himself, " I have brought 
my natural talents to as high a pitch of perfection as they can 
reach ; yet a certain scholar has surpassed me : clearly there 
roust be some sorcery in this.'' 

Now that these sorts of accusations have fallen into dis- 
credit, another course has been adopted, and a learned man 
can seldom avoid the reproach of irreligion or heresy. It 
does not matter whether he is held guiltless by the people 
or not ; the wound is made, and will never entirely heal. 
It will be always a sore spot with him. Perhaps, thirty years 
after, an adversary will say to him, unobtrusively: '*God 
forbid I should assert that the accusation was true I Still you 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



376 

tame been pot on jour defence." And in dnt vqr bh vcijr 
jwtMtnttiffw if tmned agiiiwl him* 

If he write a lustory, though it nu^ gite endenoe of 
loftinew of mind and poritj of heait^ he it the nctini of 
endles penecation. He wiD be hanled betee the magis- 
trale on acooant of bis Tcnion of some fatt dial ooconed a 
thousand years ago ; and as his pen is not far sale, it will be 
attempted to make it a prisoner. 

Yet soch scholars are more to be envied dian dioae nii»> 
creants who abandon their fiuth for a trifling pension ; who 
scarcely gain a sin^ obolns by all their impostures; who 
overtom the a»stitation of the state, diminish the rights of 
one power, increase those of another, give to princes what 
they wrest from the people, revive obscdete rights, flatter 
the passions that are fashionahle in dieir time and the vices 
that are seated on the throne, imposing on posterity the 
more shamelessly that it has less means of noDifyiog their 
testimony. 

Bat it is not enough for an author to have to endure these 
insults ; it is not enough for him to be in a condition of per- 
petual anxiety as to the success of his woik. That woik 
vdiich has cost him so much sees the li^t at last It brings 
down upon him attacks from every direction. And how 
was he to avoid them? He had an opinion ; he has main* 
tained it in his writings: litde knew he that a man two 
hundred leagues away from him had stated the exact 
contrary ; and so war is declared. 

Stilly if he could hope to obtain a certain degree of reputa* 
tion I ^ No. He is at most esteemed by those who have 
devoted themselves to the same department of knowledge in 
which he has been engaged. A philosopher has a sovereign 
contempt for a man whose head is stuffed widi fiurts ; and 
he, in his turn, is regarded as a visionary by tlie peraoo who 
has a good memory. 

As fiir those who make profession of a soomfel ig 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



277 

they would wish all mankind to be buried in the same obEv- 
km reserved for themselves. 

A man who lacks a certain talent compensates himself by 
despising it : he removes the obstacle placed between him 
and merit, and thereby finds himself on an equality with the 
person whose labors he dreads. 

Finally, the doubtful reputation which an author may gain 
IS acquired at the sacrifice of every pleasure and the loss of 
health besides. 

Paus, the sotfa of the moon of Chahban, 172a 



USBEK TO RHEDI 
At Venice. 

It was said of old that good faith was the soul of a great 
minister. A private person can be at ease in the obscurity 
in which he is placed ; he can become discredited only in 
the eyes of a few Mends ; he wears a mask before all others ; 
but the witnesses of a minister who lacks probity are as 
numerous as the people he governs. 

May I venture to add that the greatest evil caused by a 
dishonorable minister is not the ill service he does the prince 
or the ruin he inflicts on the people? In my opinion, there 
is another a thousand times more dangerous : it is the bad 
exam ple w hich he gives. 

You know that I have travelled much in India. There I 
have seen a naturally noble nation perverted in a moment, 
from the lowest to the highest in the land, by the evil exam- 
ple of a minister; I have seen an entire people, among 
whom generosity, {Nobity, smcerity, and good faith were 
accepted at all times as being their distinguishing character- 
isticst become suddenly the basest of races ; I have beheU 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



2/8 

the disease spread, not sparing even the healthiest members ; 
the most virtuous men descend to mean actions, and violate 
at every opportunity the first principles of justice, on the 
vain pretext that these principles had been violated in their 
regard. 

They appealed to odious laws to shield the vilest deeds, 
and to injustice and perfidy they gave the name of necessity. 
p I have witnessed the £uth of contracts banished, the ho* 
liest conventions and all the laws of the £unily overthrown ; 
avaricious debtors, insolent in their poverty, becoming the 
base instruments of the fury of the laws and the harshness of 
the times, make a feigned payment instead of a real one, 
and plunge the knife into the bosom of their benefactors. 

I have seen others, more unworthy still, purchase for 
almost nothing, or rather pick up fi'om the ground, oak 
leaves, and substitute them for the substance of widows and 
orphans. 

I have seen an insatiable thirst of riches suddenly spring 
up in all hearts, and a detestable conspiracy formed to 
acquire opulence, not by honest labor and noble industry, 
but by the ruin of the prince, the state, and the fellow-citizens 
of the conspirators. 

I have seen a worthy citizen, in these unhappy times, 
never retire to rest without saying : " I have ruined a femily 
to-day ; I shall ruin another to-morrow." 
~ " I am going," said another, " with a man in black, who 
carries an inkhom in his hand and a pointed weapon behind 
his ear, to assassinate all those to whom I owe anything." 

Another said: ''I see that matters are going well with 
me ; it is true that, when I went, three days ago, to make a 
certain payment, I left a whole family in tears ; that I made 
away with the dowries of two well-bom girls, and deprived a 
little boy of all chance of an education ; it will kill their 
father, and the mother is broken-hearted ; but I did nothing 
that was not permitted by the law." 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



379 

What greater crime can any one commit than that of the 
minister who corrupts the morab of a whole nation, degrades 
the most generous souls, tarnishes the splendor of rank, and 
exposes the highest birth to universal contempt? 

What will posterity say, when it has to blush for the shame 
of its fathers, when it compares the steel of its ancestors 
with the gold of those to whom it immediately owes exist- 
ence ? I doubt not that the nobles will erase from their 
escutcheons a degree of nobility which dishonors them, and 
leave the present generation to the frightful infruny into 
which it has sunk. 

Paxis, the nth of the moon of Rhanuuan, 1720. 



LETTER CXLVII. 

THE GRAND EUNUCH TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

Matters have arrived at a stage where they are no longer 
endurable : your wives imagined that your departure luid 
given them entire impunity; horrible things are occurring 
here ; I myself tremble at the harrowing tale I am about to 
narrate. 

Zelis^on her way to the mosque, a few days ago, dropped 
her veil, a nd appeared with almost her entire face expose d 
be fore the people^ 

ad Zachi slee ping with one of her maids. — a thi ng 



By the merest chance, I mtercepted a letter, which I send 
you ; I have never been able to discover the person to 
whom it was addressed. 

Yesterday evening, a young boy was found m the garden 
of the seraglio, and escaped by climbing over the walL 
Add to this all that has not come to my knowledge, and yon 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



^8o 

will have Ktde doubt tbat yoa are betrayed I await your 
orden, and, until the happy moment I receive them, my 
position will be unendurable. But, unless all these women 
are placed at my discretion, I cannot be responsible fcx any 
of them, and will have sadder news to send to you everyday. 
The SengUo at Ispahan, the ut of the moon of Rh^eb, 1717. 

LETTER CXLVIIL 

USBEK TO THE FIRST EUNUCH 
At the Sbraguo at Ispahan. 

RiCBivi by this letter unlimited power over the entire serar 
glio : command with all the authority I could exercise my- 
self; let fear and terror march before you ; run from rx>om 
to room, bearing punishment and chastisement in your train ; 
let consternation seize upon all, and let tears flow whenever 
you appear ; question the whole seraglio ; begin with the 
slaves ; spare not my love ; let all bend before your awful 
judgment-seat ; shed light upon the most hidden secrets ; 
purify that infamous place, and let banished virtue return 
thither. For, from this moment, on your head shall be the 
slightest faults committed. I suspect the intercepted letter 
was addressed to Zelis ; do you examine the matter with the 
eyes of a lynx. 
At — -, the nth o£ the moon of 2:ilhage» 1718. 

LETTER CXLDC 

NARSrr TO USBEK 
At Pakis. 

Tke grand eunuch has just died, magnificent lord. As I am 
the oldest of your slaves, I have taken his place^ untfl yo« 
inform me upon whom you have deigned to cast your eyes. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



28l 

Two days after his death, a letter was brought to me which 
you had addressed to him : I took good care not to open it» 
bnt respectfully covered it up and locked it away, until such 
time as your sacred wishes in its regard might be known. 

On yesterday a slave came to me in the middle of the 
night, and told me he had discovered a young man in the 
seraglio : I rose, examined into the aflS ur, and found that it . 
was a vision . 

1 kiss your feet, sublime lord, and entreat you to rely on 
my zeal, my experience, and my old age. 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the 5th of the moon of Gemmadi i, 1718b 



LETTER CL. 

USBEK TO NARSrr 
At thb Skraglio at Ispaham. 

Wretch that you are 1 you have in your hands letters re- 
quiring the most prompt and severe action ; the least deUy t 
may drive me to despair, and you remain inactive under a I 
vain pretext 1 

The most horrible crimes are of daOy occurrence : perhaps 
the half of my skives are deserving of death. I send you 
the letter which the first eunuch wrote to me on this subject 
before his death. Had you opened the despatch addressed 
to him, you would have found bloody instructions there. 
Read these instructions then, and rest assured you shall 
perish, if they are not executed. 

At ^the 95th of the bbooii of Chalval, 1718b 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



28a 



LETTER CLL 

80UM TO USBEK 
At Paris. 



Did I hold my peace any longer, I should be ai criminal as 
all the culprits in the seraglio taken together. 

I was the confidant of the grand eunuch, the most £suthful 
of your slaves. When he saw death approaching, he sum- 
moned me and said these words : " I am dying ; but the ■ 
only sorrow I feel in quitting life is that my last looks have I 
rested on the guilt of my master's wives. May Heaven pre- ' 
serve him from all the misfortunes which I foresee ! May 
my menacing shade appear to these traitresses after my death 
to warn them of their duty and intimidate them still I Here 
are the keys of those dreaded retreats ; go bear them to the 
oldest of the black eunuchs. But, should he eschibit a lack 
of vigilance after my death, be sure to inform your master." 
When he had spoken these words, he expired in my arms. 

I know not what he wrote to you some time before his 
demise as to the conduct of your wives. A letter exists in 
the seraglio which would have been the messenger of dismay, 
had it been opened ; that which you have since written has 
been intercepted three leagues from here : I do not know 
how it is, but everything seems to turn out unfortunately. 

Meanwhile, your wives act as if they were wholly free from 
all restraint ; apparently, since the death of the grand eunuch, 
they regard everything as permitted to them. Roxana alone 
is controlled by a sense of duty, and preserves her modesty. 
I^ut the morals of the others powL more corrupt every day, - 
You would no longer behold the impress of that stem and 
austere virtue on the features of your wives which reigned 
there formerly : the unfamiliar gayety that prevails around 
me is, in my opinion, infallible proof of the presence of an 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



283 

unfamiliar pleasure also ; in the smallest things I notice that 
liberties are taken which have been heretofore unknown. 
Th ere is even among your slaves a certain remissness in thcirl 
dufca and in'thg nhUrvanri> nf \h^ rules which amazes me t 

t hey no ly nff**^ ^vhihit that arA^nt taoI in y/^»f- cj^wn'/^ ■'hlfjl 



fnrmerlv animated the e^\\xr '^^^ffi^ 

Your wives have been eight days in the country at one of 
your most remote houses. It is said they have succeeded in 
bribing the slave in charge of them, and that on the day 
before they arrived, he had concealed two men in a stone 
recess that happens to be in the wall of the principal apart- 
ment, and from which they emerged at night after we retired. 
The old eunuch who now governs us is a dotard, and believes 
everything he is told. 

I am agitated by a wrathful desire to inflict vengeance oh 
these traitresses, and if Heaven wiUed that, in your interest, 

you sho uld judge me Can^ fr^^ "^f g^^*'"''"g, ^ prnmic^ ynn I 

th at if vour wives were not virtuous, the y would at least be ^ 
faithful.^ ~ 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the 6th of the moon of Rebiab i, 1719^ 



LETTER GUI. 

NARSIT TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

RoxANA and Zelis have expressed a desire to go into the 
country ; I did not believe it consistent with my duty to 
refuse them. Happy Usbek ! you have faithful wives and 
vigilant slaves ; virtue would seem to have chosen the spot 
where I rule for her dwelling-place. Rest assured that 
nothing can pass here which your eyes would not love to 
look upon. 
A mischance occurred lately which has caused me great 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



^«4 



bptthas, had broa^ a letter far me from joa; I weaft a 
flare far it, but he was robbed on hk vaj back, and the 
letter was lost Write to me, then, at once ; far I fanqr, m 
riew of the late changes^ yoa most hare mattcn of impor- 
taoce to <'if wwmM^i i f^ tf>^ 

Tbs Scng^P St Fstme, tiie Ah «f tiie amia of Sdisb i» 1 719. 

USBEK TO SOUM 
At the Skeaguo at Ispakav. 

I rLACB the sword in your hand. I confide to joa the 
dearest thing at present in my possession, my rengeaace. 
Exercise your new authoiity without pity or remorse. I 
have written to my wives to obey you blindly. Confomided 
by so many crimes, they will fall abashed before your eyes. 
To you must I owe my happiness and repose ; restore to t 
me my seraglio as I left it But begin by purifying it ; ^ 
exterminate the guilty, and see to it that all tremble who 
mediute becoming so. What rewards may you not hope 
for from your master for services so signal ? With you it 
rests to rise even above your condition and win tokens of 
my approbation greater than you ever contemplated. 
Paeis, the 4th of the moon of Chahban, 1719. 

LETTER CLIV. 

USBEK TO HIS WIVES 
At tmx Sbeaguo at Ispahait. 

Mat this letter fall upon you Uke a thunderbolt hurled ftans 
the heavens amid lightnings and tempests I Solun is yo«r 
first eunuch, not to guard but to punish you. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



285 

Let all the seraglio bow to the dust befiyre hinu He wiH j 
judge your past actions, and, for the future, will compel yoiy 
t glive under a yoke so rigor o n^ that yg ^ ] wjP «» '^'^^ '^CT *^ 
T OUT libertyy if you do not regret your virtue * 

Paris, the 4th of the moon of Chahban, 171$^ 

Blest is the man who, conscious of all the value of a calm 
and easy life, centres his entire happiness in his own fisimily, / 
and knows no other land except that in which he has fiist I 
seen the light of day I 

I am living in a barbarous clime, where all that pains me « 
is ever present to my gaze. ^and all that comf orts is izx away. / 
A sombre sadness has me in its grasp, and th€ ilUjtitUuu iulu 
which I fall is frightful : it seems to me as if I were sinking 
into annihilation ; and I only if^r^vpr mygplf lyh ^n a fj;loomy . 
j ealousy flam es in my s oul, and there begets fear and sua - ) 




foil knew m^TJesSrjyouTiavelilways read Siy hearTm 
your own. If you could perceive my deplorable condition 
now, it would arouse your pity. I have been expecting 
news from my seraglio for the last six months ; I count the 
moments as they slip by; my very impatience lengthens 
them, a nd when the time so long expected arrives, a sudde n 
r evolutio n breaks oui m my hfijtrt, and mv han< i| y-ffmhlpgag 

it nppns thg fatal letter. Xhff very anYJgty whirh drives me 

to despair, I find a happier condition, and dread that a dis- 
aster worse for me than a thousand deaths may force me 
to abandon it 

But, whatever the cause that induced me to quit my 
country, although my flight from it saved my life, I can no 
l onger^N essir, remain i n thjs jpghtfn^ ^^'^^ Were I to do 
so, shoiflZf I iiui die all Pie sam^ a victim to my vexations? 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



286 

I have urged Rica a thousand times to leave this fore^ 
land ; but he pays no attention to my exhortations ; he pre- 
tends a thousand pretexts for remaining here ; he seems to 
have forgotten his country, or rather he seems to have for- 
gotten me, so insensible is he to my mortifications. 

Wretch that I am 1 perhaps were I to behold my country 
again, the sight would but increase my misery. Ah I what 
shall I do? I am about to place my head at the disposal of 
my enemies. That is not all : when I enr ?t fMY f^^F^'^i I | 

must jf munH an a^^yint nf th^ fefrol timA nf my ah^nr^ j I 

^d, if I find criminals there, how am I to deal with them? 
And, if the very thought overwhelms me at such a distance, 
how must it affect me when I am obliged to see and hear 
what I dare not imagine without a shudder? How will it . 

be, in fin#>^ if th^ yfry jllflymfinft ^ pmnnnnri^ yyrlr »n my / 

own conf ""'7n aH ^^-^^p"*- > 

I must imprison myself within walls more terrible for me 
than for the women who are guarded by them, and look into i 
every comer with an eye of suspicion ; their eager show of j 
affectio n can hide from me nothin g : on mv couch and in ' 
their embrace^, my yneqsiness w ill be an obstacle to m y 

aopo awi oni of 



tlie huestfonj piy j^aln^^sy ^^^ ffl^^ birth tO theiQ * Vilc 
refuse of human nature, base slaves whose hearts have beenj 
shut forever to the emotions of love, ye would no longeq 
groan over your condition, if you knew the misery of mine I - 

LETTER CLVI. 

ROXANA TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

Horror, darkness, and terror reign in the seraglio ; a pall 
of mourning enfolds it in funereal gloom ; a tiger at every 
moment gluts his rage ; he has put the two white eunuchs 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 






Digitized by LjOOQIC 



till , • . 

evtT) . 






Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



28/ 

to the torture^ who have confessed nothing except their 
innocence; he has sold a part of our attendants, and 
obliged us to interchange the services of those left. Zachi 
and Zelis have been shamefiilly outraged, during the obscurity 
of the night, in their own rooms. The sacrilegious wretch 
feared not to lay his vile hands upon them. He keeps us 
each locked up in her apartment, and though alone we have 
to wear the veil ; we are no longer allowed to speak to one 
another. It would be a crime to write, — nothing is free to 
us but our tears. 

A band of new eunuchs has entered the seraglio ; they 
waylay us night and day ; our sleep is incessantly interrupted 
by their feigned or real distrust. My sole consolation in my 
misery is, that it cannot last long, and that death will put an 
end to my sorrows : it will soon arrive, cruel Usbek 1 I will 
not give you time even to put a stop to all these outrages. 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the 2d of the moon o£ Maharram, lyaa 

LETTER CLVII. 

ZACHI TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

O Heaven ! a barbarian has outraged me even by the very 
nature of the punishment inflicted. He has had recourse to 
that method of chastisement whose first peculiarity is that it 
alarms modesty, a chastisement which revives the memory 
of childhood's hour. 

My soul was at first paralyzed with shame ; but my self- 
respect soon awoke, and I made the vaults of the apartments 
ring with my cries. I might be heard appealing for mercy 
to the most degraded of mankind, and attempting to excite 
his pity, while he only became the more inexorable. 

Since then, his insolent and servile soul has dominated 
mine. His presence, his looks, his words, all kinds of mi»* 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



a88 

fertunesi prat on me with cnuhing force. When I am 
alone, I have at least the consolation of shedding tears; but 
fri^en he appeals before my eyes, I am transported with fury ; 
then I discover that it is impotent, and I M into despair. 

The tiger dares to tell me that you are the author of all 
these horrors. He would wrest from me my love and pro- 
£uie even the sentiments of my heart When he utters be- 
fore me the name of him I love, I can no longer complain, I 
can only die. 

I have borne your absence and kept my love warm by 
love's own strength. Night and day every moment has 
been devoted to you* My love for you made me, perhaps, 
even a little imperious, and yours for me made me respected 
But now — No, I can no longer endure the humiliation into 
which I have fallen. If I am innocent, return that you may 
love me ; if I am guilty, return that I may expire at your 
feet 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the sd of the moon oC Blahamua* lyao 

LETTER ^ 

ZEUS TO USBEK 
At Paris. 

You are a thousand leagues away from me, and yet yon 
deem me guilty ; you are a thousand leagues away from me^ 
and yet you punish me. 

The barbarous eunuch who laid his vile hands upon me 
did so by your orders ; it is the tyrant who outrages me, not 
the instrument of his tyranny. 

You can, as your fancy dictates, redouble your ill usage. 
My heart is tranquil, for it no longer contains any love far 
you. You have degraded your soul, and become jnlmiitafi. 
Rest assured that you are not happy. Adieu. 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the sd o£ the moon ci ICahanam» I7aa 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



289 



LETTER CLDL 

SOUM TO USBEK 
At Paus. 

I my myadf and I pity you : never hn U&tul icmmt 

sunk to such a depth of despair. W^e are both equally 
unfortunate; I write to you with a tremblmg hand. 

I swear to you by all the prophets of Heaven that, ever 
since you confided your wives to my care, I have watched 
over them night and day, and that my anxiety in their regard 
has never been a moment at rest I initiated my ministry 
by punishments ; and I suspended Uiem without my natural 
austerity being affected by the change. 

But what am I saying? Why do I boast of a fidelity that 
has been useless? Forget all my past services; look upon 
me as a traitor, and punish me for all the cranes I have been 
unable to prevent 

Rpxana, the imperious Roxana — O Heaven 1 whom 
shall we henceforth trust? You suspected Zachi, but you 
had the utmost trust in Roxana; yet her inexorable virtue 
was a cruel imposture ; it was the mask of perfidy. I have 
surprised her in the arms of a young man, who, as soon as 
he saw he was discovered, attacked me and struck me twice 
with a dagger. The eunuchs ran up, when they heard the 
noise, and surrounded him ; he defended himself long, and 
wounded several of them ; he then tried to return to her 
chamber to die, he said, beneath the eyes of Roxana. But 
at length he was overpowered by numbers, and fell at our 
feet. 

I do not know, sublime lord, whether I ought to await 
your rigorous commands. You have placed the work of ven- 
geance in my hands, and I ought not to let it languish. 

The SeragUp at Ispahan, the 8th of the moon of Relnab i, tymk 

IQ 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



290 




CLX. 



SOUM TO USBEK 
At Paris. 



I HATi decided ; the disasten yoa sufiered aze on the retgt 
of disappearing; I am about to punish* 

Abeady I fed a secret joy ; my soul and youa will have 
full satisfaction ; we shall exterminate crime, and make even 
innocence turn pale. 

O ye, who seem created withacontempt for all the senses, 
and who are filled with indignation at the {»omptings of your 
own voluptuousness ; ye eternal victims of shame and mod* 
csty, why cannot I summon you in crowds to this unfortunate 
seraglio, that you may be astonished at all the blood I am 
about to shed 1 

The SengUo at Ispahaiitthe 8th of die noott of Rafaiab I, lysa 




ROXANA TO USBEK 
At Pakis. 

Yes, I have deceived you ; I seduced your eunuchs, made 
sport of your jealousy, and turned your hofiiUe aen^^ into 
an abode of pleasure and delight 

I am about to die ; the poison is coursing through my 
veins. Why should I stay here when tfie only «"•« yhff 
b ound ine to life is no mo »'^f I ly* dving : but mv apint 
^ ^isbom Its mortal home splendidly attended ; I havem t 
sent before me those sacrilegious guarriians who have spilt 
the finest blood in the world. 

How could you ever have imagined that I could be ao 
credulous as to believe I was stationed on this earth to wo^ 



Digitized by LjOOQ IC 



291 

ship your caprices, and that, while everything was permitted 
to yourself you had the right to curb my desires ? No 1 
T}|g ^i|| rh J h^nn |„ ii | I I I ! ||i n !iiiii| p I Urn iliiir 
I have modified your ^^^ ^n ^«""^"y ^»^ »^^^«^ ^^ natlg^j^ 
a nd my spi rit h^ ever hrfin f1iiy^»>^"»"^^ 

Yet you ought to be grateful for the sacrifice I have made 
in lowering myself to appear faithfiil to you ; in having crav- 
enly held within my heart that which I should have pro- 
claimed to the whole world, and finally, in profaning virtue 
in allowing my submission to your fancies to be decked with 
that name. 

You were astonished that you did not find in me the trans- 
ports of love ; ,had you known me well, you would hav e 
fnnnH igs^ ead all the violence of hate. 

But you had long the advantage of believing that a heart 
like mine was meekly submissive to you; we were both 
happy: you thought I was deceived, and it was I who 
deceived you. 

My language, doubtless, appears strange to you. Do you 
thin k it is in my power to force you to ad mire my courage, 

nth 



you with anguish ^ But H tt lldailv 



~the poison consumes me ; my strength is leaving me ; 
the pen fsdls from my hand ; even my hatred grows weak ; I 
am dying. 

The Seraglio at Ispahan, the 8th of the moon of Rebiab i, tytx 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized'by LjOOQ IC 



i 



NOTES. 



I These ** Reflections " were not published until 1751, 

at the head of the " Supplement," to which the 
** Lettres Turques " are added. 

7 Letter I was suppressed in the second edition (Co- 

logne, Pierre Marteau, 1721)* 

7 2" The virgin who bore twelve prophets ** : Fatima, 
daughter ol Mahomet and wife of All. 

12 Letter V is suppressed in the second edition of 1721. 

22 Letters X and XI form one in the second edition of 

1721, with some modifications. 

32 Letter XV is the first in the Supplement of 1754. 

33 Letter XVI is suppressed in the second edition, 1721. 
33 16 The '' three tombs " are those of Fatima and two of 

her relatives. 
43 Letter XXII is the second of the Supplement 

46 21 An allusion to the belief that the kings of France 

could cure the scrofula by touching it. The tnu 

dition goes as far back as Robert the Pious, son 

and successor of Huges Capet. 

46 34 The celebrated bull Unigenitus issued by Clement 

XI on the 8th of September, 1713. The opponents 
of P^re Quesnel, whose propositions the bull con- 
demned, were called " Constitutionaires." 

47 7, 8 ^' A book. . . . brought from Heaven ": the Bible. 
47 24 The Jansenists, according to M. Laboulaye. 

47 27 ** Certain dervishes " : the Jesuits, and especially P^e 

la Chaise. 

48 Letter XXV is suppressed in the second edition, 1721. 
54 The green-rooms of the theatres. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



294 

Fagt. Um. 

$6 32 (and following)*' CerUin dervishes '* : die Inquisitors ; 
<«litde wooden balls": beads; ''pieces of doth:" 
scapulars. Santiago was once the capital of Gali- 
da. Its cathedral contains the tomb of Saint 
James of Compostella, to which frequent pilgrim- 
ages are made. 

U> Letter XXXII is suppressed in the second edition, 

. 1 721. The house it describes is the Hospice des 

Quinze-Vingts, founded by Saint Louis for three 

hundred gentlemen whose eyes the Saracens had 

plucked out. 

66 ^A Greek poet": Homer. The quarrd as to the 

respective merits of the Andents and Modems 
lasted through the whole seventeenth century, and 
was revived in the eighteenth by J. B. Rousseau, 
Madame Dacier, and others. 

6f 9 (and following). " Who use a barbarous language ** : 
the theologians of the Sorbonne; *'an entire na- 
tion": an allusion to the Irish college in Paris, 
founded by Irish refugees in 1677. 

68 8 ** The mistress of eighty '* is Madame de Maintenon. 
She was seventy-eight in 1713. 

74-76 The letters XLI to XLIII inclusive are suppressed 
in the second edition, 1721. 

82 Letter XLVII is suppressed in the second edition, 

1 72 1, as are also letters LXV and LXX. 

138 10 The Dictionary of the Academy, the first edition of 
which appeared in 1694. 

138 10 "A bastard." The Dictionary of Tretifcre, which 
was published in 1685 and which caused the expul- 
sion of its author from the French Academy, because 
he had encroached on its exclusive privilege. This 
work, which was frequently revised by the Jesuits, 
after Basnage de Beauval, is known to-day as the 
** Dictionnaire de Trevons." 

144 Letter LXXVII is the third in the Supplement of 

1754. 
148 I Without accepting the severe judgment of Montes- 
quieu, it must be admitted that if " Don Quixote,** 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



295 



Piga. LiM. 



to which he refen, is not the only great work in 

Spanish literature, it is among the best. 
148 4 An allusion to the valley of Las Batuccas in Estrema- 

dura; it was almost deserted, though not so un- 

known as Montesquieu implies. 
153 y ** Osman " : Othman 1 1., deposed in 161 8 and replaced 

by his uncle, Mustapha I. 
161 4 The reference here is to the galleries of the Palais, 

which have formed the subject of one of Comeille*s 

first comedies, and, before the Revolution, were the 

rendezvous of lovers quite as much as of business 

people. 
161 2p '^h>s shameful and absurd ordeal was abolished by 

decree of Parliament, dated the i8th of February, 

1677. 

168 Letter XCII is the fourth in the Supplement of 

1754. 

169 31 Allusion to the famous ZiV dejustia^ held on the 2d 

of September, 171 5, in which Philip of Orleans, 
with the connivance of Mesmes, Count of Avaux, 
first president of the Parliament, annulled the will 
of Louis XIV., which instituted the Duke of Maine, 
natural son of Louis XIV. and Madame de Mon- 
tespan, commandant of the household, and con- 
ferred on him the rights of a prince of the blood. 

180 4, 5 This chamber was instituted on the 19th of March, 
1 71 7, and suppressed a year afterwards. 

180 II Adrien Maurice, Count of Ayen, Duke of Noailles, 
Marshal of France, President of the Council of 
Finance from the 15th of September, 17 15, to 
January, 1718. 

187 3 Philip Augustus, threatened by the emissaries of the 
Old Man of the Mountain. 

§99 19 Philip III., King of Spain. The Kingdoms of Ara« 
gon and Catalonia had been united a century before 
the time mentioned by Montesquieu in a note. 

aoi Letter CXI I is the fifth in the Supplement. Most of 

it was published in the second ^tion of Marteau, 
1 721. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



396 

Fagt. Um. 

aoi t According to Liboiilajre,aiark8deMoiKh7,Maiqiiii 
of Uocquincourtf Marshal of Fiance in 1651 : one 
of the chanurton in Saint-£¥remood*a cekbralMl 
'* Convenation of Marshal d'Hocqnincoort and 
Father Canaye.** 

217 3 The Heaven of Chinese Cosmogony. 

224 1 1 Prince Eugene, who took Belgrade in 1717 and ^gned 
the peace of Passarowitz in 1718. 

224 Letter CXXV Is the sixth in the Snpplement of 

1754- 

229 13 Charles XII. 

229 16 Baron Goetz. 

239 28 The p^er of the bank was worthless, and holders of 
bills had to pay cash into the Treasury. The de- 
preciated paper retained its nominal value in law, 
and the debtor could ruin his creditor by paying 
him with it 

235 I Count of Lionne. 

269 4 R. P. J., ''Reverend p^re Jesuite**: Reverend Jesuit 
father. 

271 A chemical miracle by violent fermentation, with 

smoke, fire, and flame. Mix an infusion of Ques- 
nel with an infusion of Lalande ; let it ferment with 
great violence, bubbling, and thunder, the acids 
fighting together, and each penetrating its alkar 
line ; there will be an evaporation of burning spirits. 
Put the fermented liquor in the alembic; you will 
take nothing from it and leave nothing in it but a 
caput martuum (a useless drug). 

271 Lenitive. Take two leaves of the anodyne Molina, 

six pages of the laxative Escobar, a single leaf of 
the emollient Nasquez; infuse in four pounds of 
common water. When half has evaporated, strain 
and squeeze, and dissolve in the extract three 
leaves of Baun as a detergent, and three of Tam- 
Imrini as a purifier. Make a dyster* 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



297 

P««. LfaMi 

272 Against chlorosis, vulgarly called greensicknessy or 

amorous fever. Take four plates from Aretino, two 
leaves from Sanchez* work on matrimony. Infuse 
in five pounds of common water, and a pleasant 
aperient will result 

363 25 "Saturn": Louis XIV. 

272 Letter CXLIV is the seventh in the Supplement of 

1754- 

273 Letter CXLV is the eighth in the Supplement of 

1754. It is also found, with some insignificant 
variants, in die edition of 1721. 
280 It will be noticed that Letter CXLVII and the seven 

following are dated earlier than those before; we 
have respected, however, the order adopted bj 
Montesquieu. 

287 Letter CLVII is the ninth of the Supplement 

288 Letter CLVIII is the tenth of the Siq^plement, and 

Letter CLX is the eleventh. 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



(<i 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



NX 000 &Z7 745 



ALDBBMAM LDSABT 

PLEASE RETURN TO 
ALDERMAN LIBRARY 



c 



DUE 



/hKo 



DUE 




Digitized by LjOOQIC 



Digitized by LjOOQIC 



